Fleventh plenary meeting
29 November 1982 at 3. 05 p.m.  President: Mr LARAKI (Morocco)  later: Mr DARRACQ (Uruguay)  Mr MARGAN (Yugoslavia)  [IY , A ex  Onzième séance piénière
29 novembre 1982 à 15 h. 05  Président: M. LARAKI (Maroc)  puis: M. DARRACQ (Uruguay)  M. MARGAN (Yougoslavie)  Undécima sesion plenaria
399   GENERAL DEBATE ON THE DRAFT MEDIUM-TERM PLAN FOR 1984-1989 (continued)/DEBAT  GENERAL SUR LE PROJET DE PLAN A MOYEN TERME POUR 1984-1989 (suite)/DEBATE  GENERAL SOBRE EL PROYECTO DE PLAN A PLAZO MEDIC PARA 1984-1989 (continuacion)/  OBMAS IHCKYCCHH NO MPOEKTY CPEIHECPOYHOI'O TIJIAHA HA 1984-1989 TOME (NpononxenHe)
1984— 1989 FH AH) EE — A Marit (4) ty  Bol au shy + BINT oF Jao plSte JY dedSIl help + Bye doll ola hull loss ost  © Sly Sg ety + Set gel sad plod gate ll il lag, oY pow]
(1) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Arabic):
1 declare the eleventh plenary meeting open. I now give the floor to the first speaker on the list,  His Excellency Ambassador Lazare Nzorubara, Permanent Delegate to Unesco and Head of the Delegation of  Burundi.
2.1 M. NZORUBARA (Burundi).-  Monsieur le Président, la délégation burundaise s'associe à toutes les délégations qui l'ont  précédée à cette tribune pour adresser à M. Ivo Margan ses chaleureuses félicitations pour son  élection à l'unanimité à la présidence de la quatrième session extraordinaire de la Conférence  générale. La manière efficace et digne, le tact et la compétence avec lesquels il a dirigé les  travaux de la vingt et unième session ordinaire, ses éminentes qualités d'homme d'Etat et son  engagement pour la défense des idéaux et des objectifs de l'Unesco sont un gage sûr du succès  de la présente session.
2.2 Que le Conseil exécutif et son Président trouvent également ici l'expression de notre haute  appréciation pour l'intense travail accompli depuis deux ans afin de préparer nos présentes  assises.
2.3 Ma délégation estime que le Projet de plan à moyen terme élaboré par le Directeur général de  l'Unesco est dans son ensemble en parfaite conformité avec les directives de la Conférence géné-  rale et en particulier avec la résolution 21 C/100 adoptée à Belgrade. De plus, il reflète fidè-  lement les propositions et recommandations présentées par les Etats membres, les organisations  gouvernementales et non gouvernementales et les milieux intellectuels les plus divers. Les qualités  incontestables de ce Plan à moyen terme, tant du point de vue du fond que de celui de la forme,  conduisent ma délégation à exprimer sa gratitude à ceux qui l'ont élaboré. A leur tête figure  M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow, directeur général de l'Unesco, pour qui ma délégation éprouve beaucoup  d'admiration et d'estime. Le gouvernement du Burundi, dont je svis le porte-parole, lui renouvelle  sa confiance et son soutien dans ses efforts pour faire de notre Organisation un creuset où va se  former une communauté embrassant toute l'humanité engagée dans la coopération et dans la solida-  rité pour la réalisation des grands projets de l'avenir.
2.4 Monsieur le Président, l'universalisation de l'Unesco et surtout les premières démarches  constructives entreprises en vue d'apporter une solution aux problèmes vitaux de l'humanité qui  ont marqué de leur empreinte ses résolutions et ses actions sont sans aucun doute les points  essentiels de l'activité de l'Organisation au cours des dix dernières années.
2.5 Les multiples actions de l'Unesco en faveur du renforcement et de la sauvegarde de la paix,  la lutte contre le colonialisme, le racisme et l'apartheid, les efforts qu'elle déploie depuis 1974 en  vue d'étendre la coopération internationale dans ses domaines de compétence ont contribué à re-  hausser sensiblement son prestige international et lui ont conféré une nouvelle dimension. En  outre, l'Unesco a le mérite d'avoir été la première institution du système des Nations Unies à  adopter un Plan à moyen terme et à donner sinsi une orientation prospective à son activité.
2.6 Les efforts entrepris sur une longue période pour l'élaboration du nouveau Plan à moyen  terme se sont concentrés logiquement sur la détermination des grands axes, des problèmes uni-  versels, de leur priorité et de leur interdépendance. Une des grandes catégories de problèmes  concerne la satisfaction des besoins sans cesse croissants de l'humanité. Le développement de la  science et de la technologie offre la possibilité de mieux y répondre. Parmi ces problèmes figurent  aussi celui de l'épanouissement harmonieux de l'homme en tant que but suprême du progrès social,  le problème de l'analphabétisme et celui de la démocratisation de l'éducation, la préservation du  patrimoine culturel et de l'humanité, la garantie de l'accès le plus large aux richesses de la  culture pour toutes les couches de la population et le problème de la suppression définitive du  déséquilibre qui caractérise aujourd'hui les échanges internationaux d'informations.
2.7 L'analyse de la problématique mondiale et les orientations du Plan à moyen terme pour 1984-
1989 situent le Projet de plan dans une vision d'ensemble des réalités du monde actuel et de leurs  perspectives d'évolution et énonce les missions et les actions essentielles qu'il est proposé de  confier à l'Unesco jusqu'à la fin de la présente décennie. Cette approche répond au souci exprimé  par la Conférence générale à Belgrade de voir le point de départ du processus de planification  être l'analyse des problèmes mondiaux. Il ne saurait d'ailleurs en être autrement car la réflexion  sert de plate-forme à l'action et l'action éclaire à son tour la réflexion.
2.8 Monsieur le Président, l'analyse des problèmes mondiaux contenue dans la première partie du  Projet de plan devrait obtenir l'adhésion de la majorité des Etats membres sinon de tous car elle  refiète les tendances concernant l'évaluation des problèmes auxquels l'humanité est confrontée.  Elle offre un tableau objectif de la situation de la majorité des Etats membres de l'Organisation, en  particulier celle des pays en développement. Parmi ces derniers, les pays les moins avancés con-  naissent la situation la plus préoccupante car ils ont le revenu le plus faible et sont les plus  affectés par toutes les autres conditions défavorables. L'analyse relève enfin avec perspicacité le  fossé grandissant qui existe entre les pays développés et les pays en développement.
2.9 Les cinq grandes missions de l'Unesco pour les années à venir procèdent de l'analyse de la  problématique mondiale et permettent la poursuite non seulement de la réflexion prospective, mais  aussi des actions entamées dans le premier Plan à moyen terme. Elles indiquent ce qu'il faut faire  pour relever les défis auxquels le monde aura à faire face dans les domaines de l'éducation, de la  science, de la culture, de la communication et de l'information.
2.10 Dans le domaine de l'éducation, l'analyse de la problématique mondiale relève qu'eu égard à  la situation qui existait lors de l'adoption du premier Plan à moyen terme, de nombreux problèmes  attendent encore une solution. Le nouveau Plan est la poursuite des efforts antérieurs. Les acti-  vités relatives à l'éducation proposées dans les grands programmes II, IV et V ont notre ferme  soutien, car dans les pays en développement, auxquels mon pays appartient, l'éducation occupe  une position centrale dans les efforts de développement.
2.11 Au cours de la présente décennie et sans doute au-delà, la politique éducative du Burundi  a et aura pour objectif d'éliminer l'analphabétisme en scolarisant tous les enfants d'âge scolaire.  Mon pays s'intéresse également aux questions relatives à l'amélioration de la qualité de l'ensei-  gnement, au développement de l'enseignement technique et professionnel, aux rapports entre édu-  cation et travail productif, à l'amélioration de l'enseignement des sciences et de la technologie, à  l'enseignement supérieur et à une meilleure intégration des activités de formation et de recherche,  enfin à l'enseignement dans les langues nationales en tant qu'instruments d'enrichissement de la  vie culturelle et d'enracinement dans le milieu familial et social.
2.12 Dans le domaine des sciences, les grands programmes VI, IX et X exposent clairement les  relations d'interdépendance et d'influence réciproque qui unissent les sciences exactes et natu-  relles et les sciences sociales, leur rôle, leur application et leur influence sur le développement de  la société. Il convient de souligner l'importance de la coopération Nord-Sud dans des domaines  aussi importants que la diffusion des techniques, la réduction du déséquilibre actuel et la né-  cessité de tendre vers l'indépendance technologique nationale, et la formation des chercheurs.
2.13 La structure et le contenu du grand programme III, "La communication au service des  hommes”, ont notre approbation et notre soutien. Le débat sur l'instauration d'un nouvel ordre  mondial de l'information n'est pas nouveau dans cette enceinte. Il concerne essentiellement  l'équilibrage de la communication mondiale, qui représente à notre avis la troisième et peut-être la  plus importante étape de la lutte pour un nouvel ordre mondial. Notre voeu le plus ardent est que  le Programme international pour le développement de la communication puisse mobiliser les res-  sources nécessaires au renforcement des capacités endogènes des pays en développement dans les  domaines des infrastructures et de la formation.
2.14 S'agissant de la culture, ma délégation se rallie aux idées-forces contenues dans le grand  programme XI sur la préservation et la mise en valeur du patrimoine culturel, la promotion des  identités culturelles et des échanges interculturels, la créativité et la création, la dimension  culturelle du développement, le pluralisme et la démocratie culturelle.
2.15 Au sujet de la conditon de la femme, qui fait l'objet du chapitre XIV, ma délégation se  réjouit de la parfaite identité de vues qui existe entre l'Unesco et mon pays. La création au début  de ce mois d'un Ministère de la condition féminine dont les tâches majeures seront d'améliorer la  condition des femmes et de garantir leur pleine participation à la vie politique, économique, sociale  et culturelle de notre pays témoigne de l'importance que le Burundi attache à la condition de la  femme.
2.16 Monsieur le Président, bien que les programmes relatifs à l'éducation, à la science, à la  culture, à la communication et à la condition de 1a femme soient très importants pour l'avenir du  monde, je souhaite ne pas m'y attarder et me conformer à la recommandation du Conseil exécutif  pour consacrer la substance de mon intervention aux grands programmes I, VIII, XII et XIII.
2.17 Les études prospectives envisagées dans le cadre du Plan à moyen terme nous paraissent  conformes à la fonction intellectuelle et à la mission de l'Unesco en matière d'avancement du savoir  dans un domaine aussi complexe que la problématique mondiale. Il importe de reconnaître que ces  études contribuent d'une manière significative à l'enrichissement du débat international, à  l'évolution des idées et à la formation de l'opinion dans de nombreux pays. Grâce à ces études,  l'Unesco, plus que toute autre organisation du système des Nations Unies, constitue un cadre  irremplaçable pour la coopération intellectuelle, permettant la libre expression de tous les courants  de pensée. Il est opportun de réaffirmer que la réflexion de caractère prospectif et permanent sur  les problèmes mondiaux fait’ partie intégrante de la vocation traditionnelle de l'Unesco d'être la  conscience morale du monde. Mon pays est disposé à apporter sa modeste contribution à la réali-
11   sation des objectifs de ce programme par sa participation active au débat sur ce sujet. A cet  égard, nous sommes convaincus que la participation active des Etats membres ayant adhéré à  l'Organisation après avoir accédé en masse à l'indépendance, et qui sont traditionnellement absents  des débats sur l'avenir du monde, apportera un souffle nouveau tout en favorisant la réorienta-  tion et l'adaptation des actions de l'Organisation.
2.18 Ma délégation est d'avis que le grand programme VIII constitue le prolongement logique de  la réflexion menée sur la problématique mondiale. L'approche interdisciplinaire et intersectorielle  qui y est prônée mérite un ferme soutien. En effet, pour assurer la réalisation des aspirations  matérielles et spirituelles et pour faciliter l'épanouissement de chacun, le développement doit  englober les dimensions de la vie. C'est l'intégration de l'ensemble des politiques dans les  domaines de l'éducation, de la science, de la culture, de la communication et de l'information qui  doit constituer le levier essentiel de l'action pour le développement.
2,19 Nous sommes d'accord avec la stratégie envisagée qui consiste à associer étroitement la  réflexion et l'action en vue d'aider, d'une part, à clarifier les interrelations entre les différents  facteurs et finalités du développement et, d'autre part, à promouvoir dans les Etats membres la  formulation des politiques et des plans ainsi que la mise en oeuvre de projets dans les domaines  de compétence de l'Unesco. La traduction en termes concrets des trois programmes envisagés, à  savoir d'abord l'étude et la planification du développement, ensuite la coopération avec les Etats  membres en vue de mener des études intersectorielles et sectorielles pouvant conduire à l'identi-  fication, à la préparation et à l'exécution de projets prioritaires pour le développement, et enfin  la mise en oeuvre de l'action pour le développement, devrait pouvoir aider toute la communauté  mondiale à franchir un pas important.
2.20 Monsieur le Président, les efforts pour la paix et le développement ne sauraient avoir de  sens si dans plusieurs parties du monde subsistent encore des fléaux comme le racisme, l'intolé-  rance et la discrimination raciale. Les impératifs de la sécurité collective légitiment notre  inquiétude.
2.21 Ma délégation est heureuse de constater que la lutte contrc ces fléaux a toujours figuré  parmi les préoccupations de notre Organisation qui, depuis sa création, s'efforce d'éliminer  l'origine des tensions et des guerres. Tout récemment, l'adoption par la Conférence générale à sa  vingtième session de deux déclarations - la Déclaration sur la ‘ace et les préjugés raciaux et la  Déclaration sur les principes fondamentaux concernant la contribution des organes d'information au  renforcement de la paix et de la compréhension internationale, à la promotion des droits de  l'homme et à la lutte contre le racisme, l'apartheid et l'incitation à la guerre - a prouvé de la  manière la plus solennelle la détermination des Etats membres de poursuivre et d'intensifier la  lutte par tous les moyens.
2.22 L'analyse de la problématique mondiale a mis en lumière l'existence de ces fléaux et les  conséquences néfastes qu'entraînent la persistance du colonialisme en Afrique et la perpétuation  du régime honteux et inhumain d'apartheid en Afrique du Sud. Cette analyse confirme la justesse  des orientations de ce programme. Celles-ci permettront à l'Unesco de mobiliser toutes les forces  disponibles pour une lutte qui revêt à notre avis un caractère d'urgence. Une action concertée  comme celle qu'envisage le Projet de plan à moyen terme, entre l'Unesco et les Etats membres  d'Afrique australe, les mouvements de libération nationale reconnus par l'Organisation de l'Unité  africaine et les autres organismes du système des Nations Unies conduira à une victoire définitive  sur le colonialisme, le racisme et l'apartheid qui constituent une constante menace pour la paix et  la compréhension internationale.
2.23 Monsieur le Président, le grand programme XIII, "Paix, compréhension internationale,  liberté des peuples et droits de l'homme”, est apparenté au précédent et correspond au dernier  objectif de la cinquième mission de l'Unesco découlant de la problématique mondiale, comme  l'indique le paragraphe 186 du Projet de plan à moyen terme.
2.24 La détérioration continue du climat international fait de la sauvegarde de la paix, de l'arrêt  de la course aux armements et de l'élimination de la guerre, en particulier de la guerre nucléaire  qui menace la survie de l'espèce humaine, un impératif majeur et une préoccupation constante des  hommes et des nations épris de paix, de justice et de liberté.
2.25 Il est indispensable que l'Unes.o continue à développer son rôle et sa mission dans la lutte  pour la paix et le désarmement et contre le colonialisme et l'apartheid, et qu'elle prenne une part  active au règlement des problèmes les plus pressants de notre époque.
2.26 S'agissant des droits de l'homme et des droits des peuples, force est de constater que c'est  leur méconnaissance et leur négation qui sont à l'origine des tensions et des guerres dans le  monde. Non pays défend le principe selon lequel les peuples ont leurs droits et avant tout le  droit à la vie et à l'autodétermination. Le droit des peuples à la souveraineté est énoncé dans de  nombreux documents de l'Organisation des Nations Unies et de l'Unesco. Pour ce qui est du conti-  nent africain, les droits des peuples ont été définis dans la Charté africaine des droits de  l'homme, élaborée sous l'égide de l'Organisation de l'Unité africaine et adoptée à la Conférence au  sommet des chefs d'Etat et de gouvernement de l'OUA tenue à Nairobi en juin 1981.
2.27 Dans cette perspective, nous retirons des textes pertinents la conviction que les droits de  l'homme et les droits des peuples ne peuvent être qu'indissociablement liés. Bien plus, ils ne  s'excluent pas mutuellement. L'interprétation et les clarifications données par le Conseil exécutif  et le Directeur général nous paraissent satisfaisantes et lèvent toute équivoque à ce suiet.
2.28 Monsieur Je Président, le Projet de plan à moyen terme pour 1984-1989 contient des objectifs  réalistes qui répondent aux ambitions et aux espoirs de la communauté internationale dans les do-  maines de compétence de notre Organisation jusqu'à la fin de la présente décennie. Nous nous de-  vons, pour être conséquents avec nous-mêmes, de lui donner des moyens & la mesure de ses ambi-  tions et je dirais de sa politique. La résolution 21 C/100 adoptée par la Conférence générale à sa  vingt et unième session avait invité le Directeur général à présenter des indications de ressources  pour la mise en oeuvre du Plan. Ces indications nous sont présentées sous forme de taux de crois-  sance biennale en termes réels. Ma délégation se prononce pour sa part en faveur d'un taux de  croissance biennale des ressources de l'ordre de 6 $ pour les prochains Projets de programme et  budget de l'Unesco.
2.29 Monsieur le Président, l'adoption du deuxième Plan à moyen terme de l'Unesco se situe à un  moment crucial où le monde est plus que jamais confronté à de ‘multiples défis. Cependant, à  chaque tournant de l'histoire, des hommes et des femmes ont su surmonter leurs différends et  trouver des solutions appropriées. Aujourd'hui, notre présence à tous ici témoigne de notre  volonté commune de relever les différents défis qui nous sont lancés. L'adoption de ce Plan cons-  tituera la réaffirmation de notre attachement aux idéaux de l'Unesco, et notamment à la paix, au  dialogue, à la compréhension, à la coopération, qui portent les espoirs de nos peuples. Je vous  remercie, Monsieur le Président.  Lu ï  Lei yl i 1905 ohne (Jane 1 609815 melody ae) ANS asl 5 1 Gate Sa ot SET
(3) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Arabic):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Burundi. 1 now give the floor to Mr Tuliameni Kalomoh, the  representative of the South-West Africa People's Organization to France.
4,1 Mr KALOMOH (South-West African People's Organization):  Mr President, distinguished delegates, ladies and gentlemen, allow me on behalf of SWAPO  and the oppressed people of Namibia to express our deep gratitude to Unesco for having invited  our movement to participate in the fourth extraordinary session of the General Conference of  Unesco. 1] should also like to associate our delegation with all those who have spoken before us  and to extend congratulations to Mr Margan on his re-election as President of this Conference.  At the same time, I] should like to congratulate the Director-General on the meticulous and excep-  tionally high-quality Draft Medium-Term Plan.
4.2 SWAPO and the oppressed people of Namibia are aware of the efforts of Unesco under the  leadership of the Director-General and of the consistent support it renders to us in our legiti-  mate aspiration or struggle for self-determination and national independence. Recently, Unesco  has commissioned a number of studies on conditions in Namibia. One such study involved re-  search into the effects of apartheid in Namibia in the fields of education, science, culture and  information, A second study involved research into the effects of apartheid on education and  culture. Unesco has since published two well-researched and informative booklets which SWAPO  and the people of Namibia find very useful. We would like to request Unesco to undertake  further research in such fields and in other related subjects. The booklets that have been pub-  lished by Unesco clearly expose how our culture has been and continues to be falsified, dis-  torted and deliberately despised by the racist regime of occupation in South Africa. They also  expose the harm imposed on our people by racist South Africa. Under the Bantu education system,  sur people are denied education. They are denied every other opportunity to a decent life. For  this reason in particular, SWAPO is grateful to Unesco for granting scholarships and fellowships  to our young people who have been subject to this Bantu education so that they can pursue  their studies in various institutions and in different fields and for training our people so as to  enable them to shape their own destiny. And we hope that this Conference will reaffirm its sup-  port for the granting of fellowships and scholarships to Namibians and will increase its support  in respect of the training of manpower. We also wish to appeal to this Conference to enable  Unesco to continue to supply adult education materials, which SWAPO uses in its refugee settle-  ments in Zambia and Angola and which we find extremely useful in our efforts to eradicate illi-  teracy amongst our refugees.
4.3 Mr President, having said that, 1 would like to refer to a statement the other day by a  representative of a leading imperalist power who, in order to mislead this Conference, con-  demned apartheid; who, in order to mislead the delegates at this Conference, declared that her  country supports the principle of self-determinatior and independence. But, at the same time  that representative questioned the support and co-operation that exist between Unesco and the  national liberation movement; questioned the support that Unesco gives to the liberation move-  ment, to people who are denied the basic right to independence and self-determination. How is  it that her country claims to support the principles of self-determination and national inde-
403   pendence? The representative in question was speaking on behalf of a country that has as a  cornerstone of its relationship with South Africa a policy of so-called ‘constructive engagement.  To the colonized, brutalized people of Namibia and to the victims of apartheid in South Africa  this policy of so-called engagement, when translated into practical effects, actually means a  policy of destructive engagement. It means direct participation by that leading imperialist power  in the mass murder of our people, in random, cold-blooded murders of our people by the  racist, fascist, illegal occupation regime of our country. It means open encouragement of the  racist regime of occupation to commit persistent naked aggression against practically all the  frontline states but particularly the People's Republic of Angola and, in very recent times, the  People's Republic of Mozambique, the Republic of Zimbabwe and, indeed, the Republic of  Zambia. For the victims of those aggressions, there can be no policy of engagement other than  destructive engagement.
4.4 When we addressed the last General Conference in Belgrade two years ago, Mr President,  there were hopes that Namibia would have by this time attained its nationhood. The inter-  national community through the medium of the United Nations has been making persistent efforts  to assist the people of Namibia achieve their independence and freedom. Four years ago the  Security Council adopted--as some of you may be aware--the well-known Security Council Resol-  ution 435 which envisaged elections in Namibia under the supervision and control of the United  Nations and which would definitely have resulted in an independent Namibia. But these hopes  have been dashed: dashed because the occupation regime has been encouraged to defy the demands  of the international community and the expressed wishes of the people of Namibia that it should  relinquish its occupation of our country. This encouragement has been much more forthcoming  from the Reagan administration in the United States--an administration which has maliciously and  so arrogantly sought illegally to link the decolonization of our country with an entirely separate  issue, that of the withdrawal of Cuban troops from Angola. This demand is a blatant and flag-  rant interference in the internal affairs of a sovereign and independent state, and we in SWAPO  and all people of goodwill unreservedly condemn this linkage. Also, Pretoria is being en-  couraged by the Reagan administration, which has lifted a number of sanctions that have been  imposed on that regime for its abominable apartheid policy in South Africa and the illegal occu-  pation of our country. It, that is the Reagan administration, has sought to give considerable  amounts of money to boost the defence capabilities of the racist Pretoria regime. But because it  is not honourable for self-respecting people to give 1.7 billion dollars directly to an apartheid  regime, the Reagan Administration has used the machinery of the United Nations system, namely  the IMF, which of course the Americans control. We know that the racist regime will use this  money to acquire more sophisticated weapons which will enable it to engage much more fre-  quently and arrogantly in criminal aggressions and to perpetuate its illegal occupation of  Namibia and its acts of atrocity against the people of South Africa. 1 believe that it is unjust  that the Reagan Administration should have decided to link the decolonization of our people and  the independence of our country to an unrelated issue. And we believe it is just that the inter-  national community should condemn their position.
4.5 Mr President, the situation in Namibia continues to be grave. For the racist apartheid  regime commits untold atrocities against our people. Our people are now disappearing at an ever  increasing and very alarming rate. People suspected of association with SWAPO or sympathetic  to the movement simply disappear. That is the end of them. The destruction of villages and the  removal of villagers to so-called operational areas are also causes for concern, and SWAPO  appeals to the international community vigorously to condemn these atrocities. But despite all  this, Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, one thing is certain: that is the determination and  the will of our people to struggle relentlessly until Namibia is finally truly free and genuinely  independent. And whatever Reagan does and whatever his clients in Pretoria do, the will of a  united and progressive mankind behind the just struggle of the people of Namibia will finally  prevail and of that there should be no doubt.
4.6 Mr President, the world has recently witnessed horror and genocide committed against the  Palestinian patriots and the Lebanese people by an equally arrogant Zionist regime, a regime  supported by the United States. In proclaiming its solidarity with the people of Palestine under  the leadership of the PLO, SWAPO condemns the massacres at Sabra and Chatila. We want our  comrades in the PLO to know that our struggle and their struggle are a single struggle  designed to achieve genuine independence for our respective peoples. 1 would also like to seize  this opportunity, Mr President, to extend our fraternal support to the comrades of the African  National Congress of South Africa in their just struggle against the terrible system of apartheid  and in their struggle to achieve a multiracial, democratic South Africa based on the will and the  democratic wishes of the people of South Africa under the leadership of the African National Con-  gress of South Africa. And, finally, 1 would also like to extend, on behalf of SWAPO and the  people of Namibia, our warm salutations to the heroic people of the western Sahara, the  Saharawi Democratic Arab Republic, under the leadership of the vanguard Polisario Front, in  their just struggle against colonialism andd expansionism. We believe it is the duty of mankind  to support independence not selectively but to support the principle of independence and to con-  demn whoever violates that principle. 1 thank you, Mr President.  : usb o  gdtodl gel apd babe | phil GO Lau) dodSTI hel 5 owt Lil op Osta hobiie Shes Sal  * oligdl Ass purty gS gl od pil adi
(5) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Arabic):
1 thank the representative of the South-West Africa People's Organization. 1 now give the floor to  His Excellency Ambassador Aristote Phrydas, Permanent Delegate to Unesco and Head of the Delegation of  Greece.
6.1 M. PHRYDAS (Grèce).-  Monsieur le Président, je voudrais, au nom de ma délégation, m'associer aux félicitations qui  ont été adressées à M. Ivo Margan pour son élection à la présidence de la Conférence générale  pour sa présente session. Monsieur le Président, nous considérons le Projet de plan à moyen terme  que nous avons devant nous comme une expression adéquate des préoccupations, des besoins, des  aspirations et des possibilités de notre Organisation. À juste titre, ce Plan s'adresse tant à la  réflexion qu'à l'action, parce que l'Unesco, croyons-nous, a la double tâche d'être un foyer  d'idées et un mécanisme d'action.
6.2 Les problèmes auxquels notre planète est confrontée sont complexes. Plusieurs de ces pro-  blèmes, ou quelques aspects de ceux-ci, font l'objet d'un examen approfondi, tant en ce qui  concerne la réflexion à leur propos que l'action à entreprendre pour les résoudre au sein d'autres  organisations. Cela n'a pas facilité le travail de rédaction de ce Projet, dans lequel est cependant  proposé, sur la base d'une appréciation de la problématique mondiale propre à l'Organisation, un  schéma d'action valable, un schéma qui paraît s'orienter vers la coordination de l'activité de  l'Unesco avec celle de toute organisation qui pourrait avoir une compétence parallèle ou conver-  geante dans l'un ou l'autre des domaines abordés.
6.3 Le Plan proposé est un plan cohérent qui s'efforce de rester dans les limites imposées par  les réalités, réalités découlant de la situation générale, des déséquilibres entre niveaux de  développement économique, social et culturel et de la situation financière dans le monde.
6.4 Je me bornerai ici à quelques brèves remarques. L'importance fondamentale de l'acquisition  des connaissances justifie la part importante que ce Plan consacre à la lutte contre l'analpha-  bétisme ainsi qu'à la promotion et à l'amélioration de l'éducation.
6.5 Les grands programmes qui concernent l'éducation sont bien choisis. Je crois opportun de  relever un aspect de ces programmes, celui qui concerne plus particulièrement l'éducation en  faveur des travailleurs migrants et de leurs familles. Il est nécessaire que la possibilité soit  offerte aux travailleurs migrants et à leurs enfants de s'éduquer de façon à pouvoir mieux  s'adapter aux conditions de la société du pays d'accueil, fût-ce temporairement, et de s'intégrer  dans celle de leur propre pays au moment de leur retour.
6.6 Il est évident que ce problème est particulièrement crucial s'agissant des enfants des tra-  vailleurs migrants. Parfois ces enfants n'ont pas connu leur pays d'origine et n'ont entendu leur  langue que dans le cercle très restreint de leur famille. Pour ces enfants, si l'on ne s'en soucie  pas à temps, le danger est grand qu'ils deviennent des analphabètes dans les deux langues et des  marginaux dans les deux cultures, avec tout ce que cela peut comporter. Ma délégation a soumis  une proposition qui a pour but de faire étudier les différents modèles, les différents systèmes  d'enseignement en usage pour les enfants des travailleurs migrants. Ces études nous permettront,  croyons-nous, de choisir les modèles, les systèmes qui donnent les meilleurs résultats.
6.7 Monsieur le Président, on a l'impression que la soif de progrès de l'homme, son désir d'aller  au fond des choses dans toute recherche ou étude scientifique, et les exigences des Etats et des  sociétés en évolution constante font que l'enseignement se concentre sur des matières bien défi-  nies, directement liées à la science étudiée. Aussi l'humanisme, qui a pendant des siècles carac-  térisé l'éducation et guidé la pensée, au moins dans une grande partie du monde, a-t-il finalement  cédé le pas à la spécialisation. Pourtant toutes les activités humaines, toutes les préoccupations  ne cessent d'avoir comme centre l'homme. C'est donc en fonction de cette réalité que les sciences  et la technologie devraient être abordées. Permettez-moi ici de reprendre, en m'y associant plei-  nement, ce que dit le Directeur général dans son exposé sur la problématique mondiale : " {M1 faut  introduire] dans la formation des scientifiques, des ingénieurs et des techniciens des éléments qui  relèvent de la sphère des 'humanités'".
6.8 Cette idée que le centre de toute activité est l'homme nous amène à souligner l'importance de  l'action en faveur du développement dans sa dimension culturelle. Nous croyons que le développe-  ment culturel est un facteur de renforcement de l'attachement de l'homme aux valeurs qui lui per-  mettront de vivre dans un monde meilleur, juste et paisible. Aussi croyons-nous opportun que des  moyens adéquats soient affectés à la mise en oeuvre du grand programme relatif à l'action pour le  développement.
6.9 C'est à juste titre qu'il est largement fait place, dans le Projet de plan à moyen terme, au  thème de l'identité culturelle et du patrimoine culturel. Ce sont là des notions qui vont de pair,  qui en fait sont inséparables ; s'il est vrai que les monuments culturels les plus marquants d'une  nation font partie du patrimoine culturel mondial, il ne l'est pas moins que ces monuments  n'acquièrent l'intégralité de leur valeur esthétique et spirituelle que dans l'environnement, dans  l'ambiance dans lesquels ils ont été conçus et réalisés. Le message que chacun de ces monuments  porte en lui ne peut jaillir dans toute sa plénitude que quand tous les facteurs qui l'ont fait  naître sont présents. L'ambiance dans laquelle telle oeuvre d'art a été créée est un facteur fon-  damental. Voilà une question que l'action de l'Unesco pourrait utilement contribuer à régler.
6.10 Monsieur le Président, à la veille de l'Année internationale de la jeunesse, nous pensons  qu'il serait bon de mettre en relief, dans le cadre des programmes biennaux, la dimension de la  jeunesse. Etant donné le temps très limité prévu pour la durée de la présente session, nous  n'avons pas voulu soumettre un projet de résolution à cet effet, mais nous savons que le Direc-  teur général tiendra compte de ce voeu qui a été exprimé par plusieurs délégations au cours de  nos débats qui ont ainsi fait écho aux voix de la jeune génération à travers le monde.
6.11 Dans ce cadre, des initiatives pourraient être encouragées afin d'associer plus étroitement  les jeunes aux activités de l'Unesco, de façon qu'ils participent activement à l'effort d'amélioration  de la qualité de la vie, de développement do la culture, de promotion de la créativité. On contri-  bucrait par là à l'action de la jeunesse en faveur de la sauvegarde de la paix.
6.12 Ma dernière remarque portera sur le chapitre des droits de l'homme. Ce chapitre est d'une  telle importance qu'il est bon que s'en occupent, dans les limites de leur compétence, autant  d'orgarisations internationales que possible en plus de celles qui sont principalement compétentes  en la matière.
6.13 Le Projet de plan, en accordant au chapitre des droits de l'homme une place de choix, sou-  ligne avec raison l'importance que ces droits ont en eux-mêmes, mais aussi dans le cadre de  l'organisation internationale qui a pour tâche de s'occuper de l'éducation, de la science et de la  culture. Aussi trouvons-nous justifié l'intérêt que le Projet porte à l'évolution de la pensée dans  le monde au sujet des droits des peuples.
6.14 La définition juridique de certains droits des peuples, tel le droit à l'autodétermination, a  été à la base de la transformation qui s'est produite au cours des dernières décennies, celles de  l'ère de la décolonisation. La consécration du principe de l'autodétermination, traduit en un droit  avec un contenu bien défini, a été une contribution substantielle au progrès et à la primauté de  la justice et de la paix dans le monde.
6.15 C'est dans cet esprit que nous croyons qu'il serait opportun d'entreprendre une étude qui  contribuerait à clarifier les idées et à définir ce qui est aujourd'hui qualifié de droits des peuples  sans qu'il soit certain pour autant que tout le monde entende ces droits de la même façon. Cette  étude, qui serait un travail de réflexion conforme à la mission de l'Unesco, sera sûrement utile à  l'organisation internationale principalement compétente en la matière, au moment où celle-ci sera  appelée à s'occuper de la définition juridique des droits des peuples. Elle le sera d'autant plus  qu'en traitant des droits des peuples, elle contribuera à rappeler à la mémoire des hommes  quelques principes qui ces derniers temps ont été, et hélas continuent à être, négligés, bafoués,  violés, comme le principe du non-emploi de la force à des fins politiques, le principe de l'invio-  labilité du territoire, le principe de la non-ingérence dans les affaires intérieures, etc.
6.16 Il y a malheureusement encore, au moment où nous nous réunissons, des territoires appar-  tenant à des Etats indépendants, membres de notre Organisation, membres de l'Organisation des  Nations Unies, qui ont été envahis, il y a des peuples qui sont opprimés par des troupes étran-  gères. L'exercice de droits de l'homme tels les droits à l'éducation ou à la liberté de conscience  s'y heurtent aux restrictions imposées par l'occupant, et le patrimoine culturel y est soustrait au  contrôle et aux soins des autorités légitimes et reste exposé à l'arbitraire.
6.17 On ne peut que souscrire à toute action qui pourrait contribuer à ce que tous prennent cons-  cience que rien ne peut excuser la violation des droits de l'homme ni l'atteinte aux libertés des  peuples. Merci, Monsieur le Président.  Lp Y  Sunt gd sod pal Cgaiedl «oly smile eid Boland GISI bel yg + ul gl 55 US) sal  lydatl Lutys Sg ents
(7) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Arabic):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Greece, and 1 now give the floor to His Excellency Ambassador  Mathieu Bado, Permanent Delegate to Unesco and Head of the Delegation of Upper Volta.
8.1 M. BADO (Haute-Volta).-  Monsieur le Président, la délégation de la Haute-Volta se réjouit de la brillante élection de  M. Ivo Margan à la présidence de cette Conférence et lui exprime toutes ses félicitations. Hono-  rables déiégués, en prenant part à cette session extraordinaire de la Conférence générale de  l'Unesco, la délégation de la Haute-Volta souligne par ce geste tout le soutien que ce pays ne  cesse d'apporter à l'Organisation et à son Directeur général et le lui réaffirme en cette phase  délicate d'élaboration des grandes orientations à donner à l'action de l'Unesco pour les années à  venir.
8.2 L'établissement du futur plan se situe, tout le monde s'accordera à le reconnaître, à une pé-  riode particulièrement cruciale pour l'avenir de nos sociétés et de l'humanité tout entière, qui  traverse des moments bien difficiles. Comment en effet ne pas s'inquiéter des graves menaces qui  pèsent quotidiennement sur l'équilibre précaire des Etats, mettant la paix du monde constamment
406   en danger ? L'Afrique du Sud continue à imposer sa politique d'apartheid et à occuper de façon  illégale la Namibie ; au Moyen-Orient, Israël intensifie sa politique d'agression contre le peuple  palestinien ; les ingérences des grandes puissances dans les affaires intérieures des Etats dému-  nis sont quasi permanentes. Comment ne pas s'inquiéter de la course effrénée aux armements des  super-grands qui engloutit des sommes considérables et menace la survie de l'humanité en relan-  cant une compétition économique et militaire absurde au détriment de l'aide nécessaire au déve-  loppement ? Comment ne pas s'inquiéter de la crise de l'énergie, des désordres monétaires, du  renchérissement du prix des produits manufacturés, phénomènes qui renforcent la déperdance de  pays comme le mien vis-à-vis des nations développées en menaçant les bases mêmes de notre  développement ?
8.3 L'Afrique, dans ce contexte, se présente plus que jamais à ses partenaires comme un conti-  nent de régression économique, sociale, culturelle et politique. C'est conscient de cette situation  intolérable que mon pays, la Haute-Volta, a toujours tenu à être présent dans les grandes réu-  nions internationales pour conjuguer ses efforts avec ceux des autres nations éprises de justice  en vue de l'avènement d'un monde plus équitable, plus solidaire, en un mot plus humain.
8.4 Mon pays, la Haute-Volta, a toujours tenu à être présent à des assemblées comme celle qui  nous réunit aujourd'hui, pour réaffirmer sa confiance en la coopération internationale et sa  conviction profonde qu'une institution comme l'Unesco peut aider à faire comprendre la communauté  de destin qui unit aujourd'hui les individus comme les peuples.
8.5 Notre Organisation, à travers des programmes pertinents de coopération duns les domaines  qui sont traditionnellement de sa compétence, devrait favoriser une prise de conscience plus  élevée par les populations de leurs problèmes, afin de permettre leur participation consciente à  l'effort de développement et de coopération, deux facteurs nécessaires à la promotion et au main-  tien de la paix.
8.6 Son rôle majeur pourrait donc être la promotion de la coopération internationale, d'une part  en favorisant le savoir et sa diffusion et d'autre part en garantissant le développement des  nations par la réduction des écarts de croissance et des dépendances. C'est pourquoi, mon pays  souhaite que l'Unesco mette en priorité l'essentiel de ses moyens et de ses capacités au service  des pays les plus démunis pour les aider à résoudre eux-mêmes leurs problèmes.
8.7 Dans cet ordre d'idées, trois grands axes d'action se dégagent pour l'Organisation : la  promotion de la réflexion et de l'échange d'informations, le développement de l'assistance tech-  nique et la promotion d'activités opérationnelles d'envergure.
8.8 Ma délégation voudrait dire que tout programme tenant compte de ces préoccupations ne peut  que rencontrer son agrément. Elle apporte donc tout son appui au Projet de plan élaboré par le  Directeur général de l'Unesco après une large consultation de toutes les parties prenantes.
8.9 Je sais que tous les Etats ici réunis n'ont pas la même conception de la mission de l'Unesco  et des actions que cette institution devrait conduire. Le débat sur la question reste ouvert et le  sera toujours, tant que cette assemblée n'aura pas réussi à établir les voies et moyens d'un déve-  loppement planétaire, en situant clairement les responsabilités respectives des granies nations  dont dépend en grande partie le sort de l'humanité et des autres nations qui doivent développer  leur capacité de s'autodéterminer et de s'autodévelopper.
8.10 Au Nord comme au Sud, on commence à comprendre que la survie de l'humanité, et notam-  ment des pays en développement, passe par la création d'un nouveau cadre de développement et  de coopération. La communauté internationale et l'Unesco, en particulier, doivent favoriser la  recherche de nouvelles approches du développement susceptibles de contribuer à l'instauration  d'équilibres nouveaux. Je crois qu'il nous faut être réalistes, nous persuader que nos problèmes  sont intimement liés et rechercher des terrains d'action où se développent des solidarités  nouvelles.
8.11 L'action de l'Unesco pour les années à venir, telle qu'elle est conçue par le Directeur  général et proposée dans le document 4 XC/4, est orientée vers la solution des problèmes mon-  diaux vécus par les Etats membres, en insistant plus particulièrement sur les besoins urgents des  pays du Tiers Monde et sur la nécesssaire instauration d'un nouvel ordre mondial de la coopéra-  tion. C'est pourquoi mon pays réaffirme son appui à ce Projet qui propose des programmes, des  projets et des actions dans les domaines de l'éducation, des sciences, de la culture et de la  communication qui sont de nature à favoriser le développement global et rapide de nos sociétés en  remettant en cause le modèle de développement qui a inspiré, au cours de la dernière décennie,  les politiques nationales et les actions d'aide et d'assistance.
8.12 Les missions de l'Unesco, telles qu'elles sont précisées par le Directeur général, et les  grands problèmes qui s'y rattachent sont bien définis. Ma délégation souscrit à cette analyse qui  lui paraît susceptible de favoriser la réduction des déficits et des dépendances qui ont marqué  profondément notre existence ces dernières années. Ma délégation voudrait souligner le fait que la  réflexion sur les problèmes mondiaux doit réellement aboutir à une prise de conscience au niveau  des nations et des peuples et non à nous donner bonne conscience.
8.13 L'essentiel de la première mission à laquelle répond le grand programme intitulé "Réflexion  sur les problèmes mondiaux et études prospectives", qui consistera en études et recherches de  caractère interdisciplinaire, pose le problème fondamental de la recherche. Il y a en effet ceux  qui peuvent faire des recherches et ceux qui ne peuvent en faire. Il y a les chercheurs et les  autres, qui sont objets d'enquêtes et de recherches. Cette situation appelle "un nouvel ordre de  la recherche”, une recherche qui doit être décentrée du Nord vers le Sud. Cette recherche doit  également faire appel, du point de vue de la méthodologie, à une collaboration réelle entre cher-  cheurs et non-chercheurs pour l'identification des problèmes, la mise au point de solutions et leur  application. 11 nous faut aller au-delà des modèles actuellement en vigueur et trouver des mé-  thodes qui ne font pas de la recherche l'affaire exclusive des milieux spécialisés.
8.14 Pour ce qui est de l'éducation, l'analyse des problèmes est tout à fait juste et il est  souhaitable que l'Unesco développe son action dans ce domaine en menant une lutte impitoyable  contre l'analphabétisme et en assurant la promotion de l'enseignement dans les langues nationales,  le développement de l'enseignement technique et le renforcement des liens entre l'éducation et la  vie. La stratégie globale d'action envisagée par l'Organisation pour appuyer les efforts des Etats  membres, visant à faire en sorte que leurs systèmes éducatifs correspondent davantage. aux carac-  téristiques actuelles de leur environnement local, national et international, est pertinente. À cet  égard, la redéfinition du rôle du processus éducatif et du système d'éducation, envisagés dans  leurs interrelations étroites avec d'autres domaines de la vie de la société, l'élargissement de leur  place, la réorientation des contenus de certains de leurs éléments, méritent une attention spéciale.
8.15 "L'éducation pour tous" constitue un vaste programme qui est de nature à encourager la par-  ticipation consciente des incividus et des groupes d'individus à la vie de leur société. Une action  prioritaire pour mon pays et pour la région africaine, durant la période du prochain plan, reste  le projet majeur que mon pays réclame et qui doit avoir pour objet la lutte contre l'ignorance et  l'analphabétisme.
8.16 Dans le domaine des sciences et de la recherche scientifique et technologique, les grands  programmes prévus me paraissent satisfaisants. Le développement des sociétés ne peut se conce-  voir sans le développement d'un potentiel scientifique et technique endogène. La Haute-Volta  souscrit à l'ensemble des programmes dans la mesure où ils peuvent aider les sociétés à maîtriser  le processus d'innovation technologique nécessaire à la dynamique du changement et du développement
8.17 S'agissant de la culture, les programmes proposés répondent pour la plupart à nos préoccupa-  tions nationales. Ainsi toute la réflexion envisagée sous le thème de la "dimension culturelle du  développement" est pertinente, dans la mesure où la contradiction constatée entre le discours cul-  turel et le choix des priorités nationales repose sur l'idée fausse d'un cloisonnement des terri-  toires respectifs du culturel et du développement entendu au sens économique, industriel et  technologique.
8.18 L'action en matière de communication devra être renforcée dans le sens de la promotion du  nouvel ordre de l'information, afin d'aider les pays à promouvoir leurs capacités endogènes en ce  domaine.
8.19 D'un point de vue général, les grandes missions et les programmes de l'Unesco pour 1934-
1989 cadrent parfaitement avec nos préoccupations nationales et régionales ; c'est pourquoi ma  délégation souscrit à l'ensemble du Projet de plan. Elle félicite le Directeur général et son  Secrétariat d'avoir su, comme à l'accoutumée, traduire dans ce document les aspirations légitimes  des Etats membres.
8.20 Roste l'épineux problème des moyens à mettre à la disposition de l'Unesco. L'Organisation ne  peut faire face à l'immense tâche qui l'attend si les moyens nécessaires ne lui sont pas fournis.  C'est pourquoi ma délégation lance un appel aux Etats réunis en son sein afin qu'ils l'encouragent  dans le combat qu'elle mène pour le respect des droits de l'homme en lui donnant des ressources  en rapport avec son ambitieux programme. Le Directeur général a tout le soutien de mon pays  dans touies les actions qu'il sera amené à entreprendre pour faire face aux nombreux défis qu'il  va rencontrer dans l'exécution de la mission que la Conférence générale est sur le point de lui  confier.
8.21 La délégation de la Haute-Volta est heureuse de saisir cette occasion pour féliciter le  Directeur général du dynamisme avec lequel il conduit l'action de l'Unesco grâce à sa grande luci-  dité, à sa profonde connaissance des problèmes mondiaux et à son courage qui n'a d'égal que son  idéal - faire jouer à l'Unesco le rôle qui lui revient dans un univers qui a besoin de develop-  pement, de justice et de paix. Je vous remercie.  Dost pl à  pt ad Cganedl 1 pete omy Sw dl ddl olan] ÉOMSIN hel yo lodadl Ladys as punt) Sal  cdl rl ay Geet yg 9S go) sa
(9) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Arabic):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Upper Volta and 1 now give the floor to His Excellency  Ambassador Owen Harries, Permanent Delegate to Unesco and Head of the Delegation of Australia.
10.1 Mr HARRIES (Australia):  Mr President, it gives me great pleasure to join all previous speakers in congratulating  Mr Ivo Margan on his election to the Presidency of this General Conference and to assure him  of Australia's full support and co-operation. 1 also wish to say at the outset that Australia fully  appreciates the monumental effort on the part of the Director-General and the Secretariat which  the Draft Medium-Term Plan represents. We do not underestimate either the size of the task or  its intrinsic difficulties, both intellectual and organizational. 1 want to stress this because, in  the nature of things, this intervention will have to concentrate to a considerable extent on what  worries, rather than pleases, us. But 1 assure you, Mr President, that our goal is the positive  one of achieving as sound, effective and coherent a Plan as possible.
10.2 1 shall restrict myself to making three general points relating to the Draft Plan as a  whole, and then turn to the four particular major programmes which are to be dealt with in  plenary. Our views on other aspects of the Draft Plan have already been given by my col-  leagues in Commissions 1 and ll,
1n,3 My first general point relates to the question of demarcation. Australia believes that, in  addressing this Draft Medium-Term Plan, it is very important to recognize and to give full  weight to the delimitation of responsibility between Unesco and other hodies.
10.4 We wish to stress this for several reasons. Firstly, because Unesco, together with all  other international agencies, ig operating in an atmosphere which is in some ways, and for under-  standable reasons, antithetical to demarcation--an atomosphere of change and flux and urgency  which encourages the view that it is unduly formalistic and legalistic to insist on a division of  functions and on limits of competence. We are living in the age of the interdisciplinary and  intersectoral approach, in which the tendency is to make connections, not distinctions. A  reminder of the importance of the latter is not therefore inappropriate.
10.5 Secondly, it is important to stress the matter of demarcation because Unesco does not  exist as a free-standing institution, complete in itselt. It is a member of the United Nations  family, along with other Specialized Agencies, and it co-operates with them in a common enter-  prise. In such a situation, we believe that co-operation and clear demarcation do not stand in  opposition; on the contrary, each requires the other, they are the different sides of the same  coin. It was the poet Robert Frost, 1 believe, who made ihe point very concisely when he ob-  served that: 'Good fences make good neighiours'. If the United Nations system is to work well,  if it is to avoid duplication, confusion and--ultimaiely--destructive rivalry, its constituent parts  must respect fully both the letter and the spirit of the division of functions. And indeed, the  effectiveness of Unesco's own work--and in the long run its prestige--depend on its using its  limited resources where it is truly competent and where it can make a distinctive contribution.
10.6 We therefore urge that, wherever any uncertainty or ambiguity exists in the Draft Plan in  this respect, it be attended to.
10.7 My second general point concerns the principle of decentralization. Now, Mr President, if  one equates efficiency with tidiness and order, one is always likely to come down in favour of  centralization. But we believe that that equation is false. Efficiency comes from the release and  effective utilization of the energy of people throughout the Organization. That, in turn, is  achieved by spreading widely tho opportunity for the exercise of initiative and enterprise--  always, of course, within an agreed policy framework.
10.8 Australia therefore strongly supports and welcomes the proposed increase in the staffing  and programme responsibilities of Regional Offices, as set out in paragraph 15045 of the Draft  Plan. This seems to us to be an entirely healthy proposition.
10.9 Indeed, we believe that it should be matched by a greater involvement of Regional Offices  and regional bodies in the formulation of the C/5 document, so that the needs and capacities of  each of the programme regions can be taken fully into account in that process. In other words,  we believe it desirable that there be programming by as well as for the regions. This conclusion  is, moreover, based on our own experience in the Asia-Pacific region--one which is huge, very  diverse and separated from Unesco Headquarters by very great distance.
10.10 My third general point concerns evaluation. This is surely a matter which is of equal  concern to contributors to, and beneficiaries of, Unesco's activities alike: one in which there is  a clear mutuality of interest in getting the maximum return from scarce resources. We therefore  welcome very much the references to evaluation in paragraphs 46-50 of the Foreword to the  Draft Medium-Term Plan, as well as document 4 XC/INF.6, which contains an evaluation of acti-  vities under the current Medium-Term Plan.
10.11 We would make two further proposals in this respect. First, there should be less  emphasis--in our view--on evaluation undertaken within the Secretariat and more use made of  independent experts. For, however much some contemporary educationalists may believe in self-  assessment, it is rarely the case that someone is the best or most convincing examiner of his  own performance. Second, we : so believe that more of what one might call "consumer evaluation’  ie highly desirable. The opinion of those whose lives are being most directly influenced by  Unesco's programmes should be heard loud and clear as to their merits and demerits.
10.12 Mr President, 1 turn now to the particular programmes which are to be discussed in  plenary: Major Programmes 1, VIII, XII and XIII.
10.13 As far as Major Programme 1 is concerned, the Australian delegation understands fully  the logic of tile case for its inclusion. If Unesco's Medium~Term Plans are to be intimately  linked with, and derived from, an extended analysis of world problems, then it is necessary  that the analysis be of as high a quality as possible and that it be forward-looking. On that  basis, we support both the programmes included in this Major Programme. But while we support  the first without reservation, we do feel it necessary to enter some caveats with respect to the  second--i.e, the international future-oriented study. In the first place, we counsel a certain  modesty and caution, both in its implementation and in responding to its results. We do so for  many reasons: because the dictum that 'what you put in is what you get out' is particularly  applicable to futurology; because at any given time one can construct many plausible alternative  futures: because, in the nature of things, the scientific tests of verification and falsification  cannot be applied until the future becomes the present (which is rather late in the day); and  finally Eecause many have a strong interest--sometimes conscious, sometimes unconscious--in the  ideological capture of the future to justify current policies. We certainly need some kind of map  with which to enter the unknown territory of the future. But if we are to avoid unpleasant  surprises, we should regard any map that is offered as provisional and as something to be  scrutinized with a degree of scepticism,
10.14 Finally, we believe that in implementing this major programme, Unesco should make full  use of outside expertise, both in utilizing work already in existence and in contracting new  work out to specialists with an established record of competence. We trust that we are right in  interpreting paragraph 1033 as meaning that both these things will in fact be done.
10.15 I now come to Major Programme VIII, 'Principles, methods and strategies of action for  development'. Mr President, 1 wish to emphasize that Australia attaches great importance to this  major programme and strongly supports its basic thrust, and we believe that it can and should  be further improved. The Australian Jovernment regards the desperate poverty and gross in-  equality which exist in the world today as constituting both a moral outrage and a serious  danger to the peace and security of the world. We do not think it is sensible or prudent or  smart to neglect these problems, to put them on the 'back burner' as the saying goes, or to  play for time in the hope that the political impetus for their solution will ebb away. In this  matter, time is very much a wasting asset.
10.16 Against this background, it should be clear that the problems we have with this major  programme as now drafted concerr means not ends. And the draft resolution which we have  submitted on it is aimed at strengthening a sense of the urgency of the problems involved. It is  also intended to strengthen the appeal for positive co-operation between developing and devel-  oped countries, based on mutual interest; for we are convinced, on the grounds of pragmatism  and realism, that this is the only basis on which the attention of the developed countries can  be engaged--as it must be if a concerted international effort is to eventuate. As experience has  shown, particularly over the last decade, these countries cannot be forced or shamed or fright-  ened into action; they can only be persuaded and convinced on the basis of shared interests  and a full awareness of what is at stake for themselves, as well as for the developing coun-  tries. The strategy of those, in both North and South, who are deeply and genuinely concerned  about development should be framed accordingly, and we believe there is scope for an important  initiative on Unesco's part in helping to lay the groundwork for such a strategy.
10.17 Beyond that, our draft resolution is concerned to emphasize the need for a combination  of effective international, regional and domestic action to promote development. Any one of  these types of action alone, any two of them, is not enough. They are not alternatives--they  are complementary.
10.18 On Major Programme X11, 1 will say only that Australia is utterly opposed to the evils of  prejudice, intolerance, racism and apartheid--as indeed it is to other forms of discrimination  based on factors such as religion, language, sex and political opinion. We agree very much with  the observation of the distinguished delegate for France that it is not just a matter of assuag-  ing consciences, but of taking practical steps to reduce and ultimately remove these evils.  Australia has actively supported such steps, in the Commonwealth of Nations and elsewhere,  and it will continue to do so.
10.19 Lastly, Mr President, 1 come to Major Programme XIII. Concerning this, Australia shares  many of the misgivings felt and already expressed by a number of other countries. 1f I do not  cover the same ground, it is only because it has already been covered thoroughly from this  podium. But there should be no doubt as to the fundamental importance Australia attaches to  human rights, nor about our concern that the centrality of these rights in Unesco's work  should in no way be challenged or undermined.
10.20 1 shall make three additional points. First of all, on the vital question of peace and  disarmament, we trust that the implementation of the subprogrammes envisaged under Pro-  gramme XIII.1 will reflect a particular awareness of the extreme sensitivity, complexity and  controversial nature of the subjects involved, and that the studies undertaken will pay parti-
410   cular attention to objectivity and balance. There is plenty of polemical activity surrounding  these topics already; precisely because they engender such strong emotions, the most appro-  priate and effective contribution Unesco can make is in the form of hard, compelling analysis  designed to clarify the choices facing mankind.
10.21 Secondly, we are concerned about the treatment of the relationship between the well-  established and defined concept of human rights, on the one hand, and the still imperfectly  developed concept of peoples' rights, on the other. In this respect, we welcome and are re-  assured by the revisions already made by the Director-General, and we believe that further  changes would strengther. the programme. 1 should like to suggest that the problem respecting  peoples' rights is not only that the rights involved are not yet clearly defined, but that what  exactly is meant by 'people' in this context is also not altogether clear. It is not irrelevant, we  believe, to point out that if the word 'people' is defined in one way so that each significant  socio-cultural group is seen as a people, then the notion of peoples' rights may have potentially  disintegrative implications for many pluralistic societies. lf, on the other hand, it is defined in  a way which avoids these implications, the notion could become an instrument for freezing an  existing situation, thus preventing the further evolution of that process of self-realization  which has been such an outstanding and desirable feature of recent decades. We suggest that  this aspect deserves careful consideration by all Member States.
10.22 ‘ Thirdly, Mr President, we wish to welcome the inclusion in Major Programme XII] of para-  graph 13033 referring to the special problems of refugees. We ask that there be added to it an  unequivocal recognition that the ultimate solution to this problem must lie in the creation of  respect for human rights in all countries so that the incentive for people to seek refuge outside  their homelands is removed,
10.23 Mr President, may 1 end by again placing such critical remarks as I have made in the  appropriate context. Much of the Draft Plan we find admirable and the great bulk of it accept-  able. Our comments are made in good faith and for the purpose of helping to strengthen the  Plan, and we assume that in Unesco, of all places, honest criticism is not only appropriate but  welcome. We trust that, as a result of the dialectical process which is taking place during this  session, we shall succeed in framing a Plan which respects both the principles on which Unesco  is founded and the great diversity of views held by its Member States.  a AR  + paipotl i Sed dels hel (Ll ul ay geet Sal
(11) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Arabic):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Australia. 1 now give the floor to the Secretary of the  Conference.
12.1 Le SECRETAIRE.-  Monsieur le Président, je voudrais d'abord indiquer que le Bureau de la Conférence géné-  rale, lors de sa réunion de cet après-midi, a décidé de fixer au mardi 30 novembre à 18 heures la  date limite de dépôt des projets de résolution relatifs aux points à traiter en séance plénière.
12.2 Monsieur le Président, je voudrais ensuite vous dire quel emploi du temps est prévu pour  les jours qui suivent, à la fois pour le plénière et pour les deux commissions. Il n'y aura pas de  séance plénière dans la matinée du mercredi ler décembre. Dans l'après-midi, le Directeur général  répondra au débat général, puis la Conférence adoptera les résolutions relatives aux points traités  en Commission I et en Commission II. Elle sera également invitée à prendre note du rapport de la  Commission II. Toute la journée du jeudi et si nécessaire une partie de celle du vendredi seront  consacrées à l'examen et à l'adoption des projets de résolution relatifs aux points à traiter en  plénière. La clôture de la session aura lieu dans l'après-midi de vendredi. La Commission I quant  à elle va adopter son rapport en deux parties, à savoir mercredi matin la première partie, pro-  gramme de l'éducation, des sciences et de la communication, et mercredi soir la deuxième partie,  concernant les parties relatives à la culture, les femmes et le Programme général d'information.  Enfin, la Commission I! adoptera son rapport demain mardi dans l'après-midi. Merci, Monsieur le  Président.  yell \Y  il gy como] lag) gs) kd del Saad ROIS has pashedl es Se Sal  SUCRE RE Lt Aigues ‘édly dl 5 sling
(13) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Arabic): .
1 thank the Secretary of the Conference. I now give the floor to The Honourable Felipe Ondo Obiang  Alogo, Minister of Education, Culture and Sport and Head of the Delegation of Equatorial Guinea.
(14.1) Mr ONDO OBIANG ALOGO (Equatorial Guinea) (Translation from the Spanish):  Mr President, Mr Director-General, distinguished delegates, ladies and gentlemen, it is a great  honour for me to express, on behalf of the people, the Government and the delegation of Equatorial Guinea  and on my own behalf, our appreciation of the opportunity given us to participate in this important  occasion.
(14.2) 1 take this opportunity to congratulate Mr lvo Margan on his re-election to the Presidency of the  General Conference. The experience which he has acquired in discharging these important duties and his  thorough knowledge of the problems of Unesco are a sure guarantee that the work of the Conference will be  conducted with due authority, sureness and efficiency.
(14.3) We should also like to extend our greetings to all the members of the General Committee and to  express our special appreciation of the efforts made by the Director-General of Unesco, Mr M'Bow, to  promote the principles and objectives of our Organization.
(14.4) Our pride and pleasure are all the greater since this Conference is being held in a country rich in  traditions, freedom, justice and dignity, whose brilliant civilization is well known in Africa. It thus gives  us great satisfaction to express to the people of France our appreciation of the warm welcome and  hospitality and the expressions of friendship and goodwill which we have received since we arrived in this  historic city.
(14.5) We likewise congratulate those new states which have just joined our Organization, which is yet  another illustration of the universality of Unesco. We look forward to working with them in a spirit of  harmony and progress.
(14.6) 1 also take this opportunity to express publicly our hopes for future mutual co-operation, so that  my country may attain the same educational and cultural level as other countries, especially those in our  particular region of the world.
(14.7) Our presence at this meeting is a measure of the importance which my Government and President  Obiang Nguema Mbasogo attach to the United Nations Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organization, from  which my country has already obtained considerable benefits that represent for us a model of international  solidarity--a solidarity in whose name ! hope the countries here represented and the Specialized Agencies  will join forces in order to combat the underdevelopment against which our country is now struggling. We  feel that our presence here implies a commitment in the struggle for peace and development. Progress in  education over the last decade and the advances in science and technology which this progress promotes  have stimulated men's aspiration for freedom and justice and have encouraged peoples to seek to assert  their national identity and their independence. All this bears witness to the Organization's efforts to  promote awareness. and its action in this regard.
(14.8) As you know, my country has just taken one of the most important steps in the history of a nation:  it has decided upon a more worthy historic destiny for its people, the democratization of the country and  the adoption of a fundamental law which provides for the necessary political, legal and administrative  institutions, the necessary individual guarantees and respect for human dignity and which embodies those  elements essential to a nation wishing to live in peace and to enjoy justice and social progress. This  achievement of the people of Equatorial Guinea was realized through the heroic action of the distinguished  armed forces of the nation, under the command of President Obiang Nguema Mbasogo, who put an end to  the shameful dictatorship on the historic date of 3 August 1979.
(14.9) Distinguished delegates, 1 think that there is no need for me to describe the consequences of a  dictatorship; nor do we wish to evince impotence and pessimism in the face of the immense task which such  consequences--which we cannot ignore--have involved and continue to involve for my people.
(14.10) We are facing an economic crisis that has arisen as a result of a state of disorder that goes back  beyond the last three years and which has affected our economic relations and production system. We  consider that in order to overcome this critical phase we must affirm our solidarity and make use of all the  margin for manceuvre at our disposal. My government has already defined or taken measures in this regard  and is receiving all possible assistance from the international community. We believe that the world does not  consist of a single culture; its richness lies in its diversity of cultures. We have our own culture and  history and are resolved to live in community with all peoples who are fighting for peace, justice and  progress, and we have many resources which we must exploit.
(14.11) Our motive in coming to these meetings is not to air our problems and grievances; we come here to  join together in analysing and seeking solutions to the problems facing our societies, backing up our words  with action. My government has stepped up its efforts to achieve national well-being and is actively  engaged in ensuring the application of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, a policy which has  brought peace to the country and, as a result, an increase in the population in general and, above all, in  the school population. Certain fundamental principles have for this reason been incorporated in our  Constitution,
(14.12) In the immediate, we are faced with an educational situation fraught with all kinds of needs, both  quantitative and qualitative, in respect of staff, equipment and resources of all kinds.
(14.13) The following statistical detail will iliustrate what 1 mean: at the end of 1979, sixteen primary or  basic schools in Malabo, the capital, catered for a school population of 4,500 pupils at various levels. In the  current year, 1982, eight of those schools accommodate over 6,000 children. It should be noted that most of  these establishments were turned into schools out of sheer necessity, since they were not designed or built
416   with that end in view. They are mostly stores which were converted into improvized schools and/or  classrooms to meet the crying need for accommodation and facilities of some kind for as many pupils as  possible. Moreover, in spite of the measures taken by the government, there are still instances of 100 or  more children occupying an area of ten square metres and it is equally common to find a teacher having to  deal singlehanded with 200 pupils at various levels of advancement.
(14.14) The lack of adequate premises and the ever-increasing school population have obliged us to  shorten the school day by two to three hours.
(14.15) As far as teachers are concerned, about 300 of those actively employed have no professional  qualifications whatsoever in the field, a very significant figure in negative terms when compared with the  growth in the school population. On top of all this there is a crisis with regard to equipment: tables,  chairs, desks, exercise books, pencils, blackboards, textbooks, which the teachers themselves have to copy  out by hand on ordinary paper, etc.
(14.16) It may be that our problems no longer coincide--because of our late start--with those of many  other countries in our region; but if we are to improve our standards we have no alternative but to tackle  these problems on a priority basis.
(14.17) Our objective must therefore be: to raise enrolment rates, both qualitatively and quantitatively, as  a matter of urgency and using the widest possible range of means, with particular emphasis on primary  education.
(14.18) Simultaneously and in overall relationship with economic and social development, we must reform  the education system so that is is more in keeping with other aspects of modern African life.
(14.19) We must establish lifelong education throughout the country by introducing the systems required  for that purpose. Illiteracy has increases in the last decade. As in many other African countries, the  pressure of populaiion growth rates has greatly overtaxed our educational structures, which were in any  case inadequate. The resulting lack of facilities has led to high absenteeism.
(14.20) We are aware that this task will call for extensive resources. But as we wish to fulfil it in the  shortest possible time, we are embarking here and now, with all the energy at our disposal, on a campaign  to secure international understanding and the support of all countries, especially the members of the great  Unesco community and the regional and subregional organizations.
(14.21) In view of our country's situation, our future social and economic development urgently requires  that we lay the basis for the adequate educational development of individuals and society, endeavouring as  of now to combine education and productive work.
(14.22) Our plans for expanding and reforming education include the overhauling of administrative  infrastructures and executive bodies, so that our strategies reflect the new educational policy objectives set  forth in our Constitution, among them the provision of primary education for all.
(14.23) My government has recently invested a great deal of effort into reconstructing the country and  restoring normal conditions, especially in the field of education, laying the basis for a gradual development  of methods and strategies and of funding sources. A large number of countries have already offered us  their assistance during the difficult years we have experienced since 1979. We should like to make special  mention of the aid given to us by Spain in the field of education. But our needs are great and costly, so  that we have to resort to other funding sources, and technical aid if necessary, to impart the greatest  possible speed to educational development and hence also to economic, social and cultural development.
(14.24) In this new phase of its history on which my country embarked on 12 October, with its new  Constitution and government, we intend to solve many serious problems confronting the nation, including as  a matter of priority those relating to education.
(14,25) My department has addressed itself to this task, drawing up short- and medium-term plans
(1983-1985 and 1986-1988) designed to maximize educational and cultural development.
(14.26) But these urgent and priority objectives call for costly financing which we cannot at present  supply by our own unaided efforts. International co-operation, substantial and generous though it may be,  is currently inadequate to enable us to realize our intended new objectives for the years to come and  thereby approach the levels attained by the other countries of our region.
(14.27) Requests for increased financial assistance have already been made to friendly countries and  organizations, to whom we wish on this occasion to express our thanks and to repeat our requests; we are  particularly anxious to do so in this institution, in the hope that it will come to the assistance of our people  through its many specialized regional and subregional bodies.
(14.28) In spite of the shortcomings and difficulties referred to, we are at present executing a series of  programmes, among which we should like to mention the following.
(14.29) Retraining of teachers. On the one hand, Unesco has initiated project EQG/80/012 for the further  training of assistant teachers over a period of three years. In addition, the Spanish technical co-operation  service is in the process of finalizing a further training and specialization programme for teachers, at the  primary, intermediate and vocational levels.
(14.30) Adult education. An agreement has been signed recently--in August 1982--with the Ibero-American  Bureau of Education and with Spain for the introduction of a system of adult literacy education by radio.
(14.31) Teacher training, In addition to the university-level teacher-training colleges and the higher  teacher-training institute, a new teacher-training plan has been drawn up with a view to providing the  country with the thousand teachers which is the quota we have calculated as being absolutely essential at  present. To this end, we have launched a training programme to bring those currently employed as  assistant teachers up to the level of fully qualified teachers.
(14.32) Reform of curricula, Conclusion of one phase and the initiation of another.
(14.33) Publication of our own testbooks. Teams are at present engaged in drafting original works to be  published shortly. These textbooks will be used in the first four grades of compulsory primary education.
(14.34) Purchase of schoolbooks and equipment. We have recently received a donation of US $25,000 from  Unesco for the purchase of equipment for primary schools. To this should be added the 15 million pesetas'  worth of textbooks which we are at present receiving as a donation from Spain.
(14.35) Strengthening of primary education infrastructures. Project 2624/0 of the World Food Programme,  designed essentially to improve existing infrastructures in primary education through repairs to certain  school buildings, is at present being implemented.
(14.36) Apart from the projects we have mentioned, we should like to take this occasion to thank the  international organizations and national associations--notably UNICEF and its Spanish office--for their help  and for the programmes of assistance which they have carried out in our country to date.
(14.37) We hope that through the projects adopted in the future within the context of Unesco--through its  regional and subregional plans--we shall be successful in achieving the praiseworthy objective of 'education  for all' proposed by the Conference and that such plans will include, albeit as a special case, the small and  very needy country of Equatorial Guinea.
(14.38) We affirm our political resolve to develop education in our country within our own cultural context,  taking account of both African and universal values as well as those which constitute our own identity. We  must bear in mind the fact that education is a basic right of all individuals without distinction, but that  investment on an ever-increasing scale is required to achieve this goal. Developing countries therefore run  the risk of being unable to provide such education, both in terms of quantity or quality, owing to their  major economic and financial difficulties, a situation which creates serious inequalities between countries.
(14.39) Mr President, we should be happy if the objective mentioned at the Lagos Conference in 1976 were  soon to become a reality in our country: '... to make education available to the masses that want it but are  still deprived of it'. And we know that this will not be possible without the determined collaboration of all  countries dedicated to peace. In this connection, 1 wish to make a very special appeal to the countries  belonging to the great Hispanic community, with which we have strong cultural, historical and other ties.
(14.40) Our President and Head of Government, Obiang Nguema Mbasogo, has made education one of the  priority programmes in his major drive for national reconstruction and he has instructed me to report on  our present situation to this fourth extraordinary session of the General Conference.
(14.41) With regard to the Draft Medium-Term Plan submitted by the Director-General, we consider--  despite the short time we had to examine it in detail--that it is a programme which lays down guidelines for  the future of our Organization; we wish to express our support for the Plan and the nucleus of programmes  it contains, as well as our admiration and praise for the Director-General and his colleagues for the  excellence of the work submitted to us. My government will do its utmost to implement and put into practice  the Medium-Term Plan.
(14.42) 1 should like incidentally to inform the Conference of our wish to see the development of physical  education and sport included in the Plan, since my government attaches great importance to such activities  in educational establishments in accordance with the saying: mens sana in corpore sano.
(14.43) 1 should also like to inform this distinguished assembly that, with reference to cultural events in  my country and the provisions of Recommendation No. 150 of the World Conference on Cultural Policies held  in Mexico City in July 1982 concerning the Hispanic-African Congress on Culture, which was in principle  due to be held in October 1982 in Bata and was to be financed jointly by my government, the Government  of Spain and Unesco, the meeting has had to be postponed until further notice on account of the recent  constitutional changes in the country. However, preparations are under way and the exact dates will be  announced in due course; at all events, we wish to underline that the Congress will open the way for  research on the next stage in the forging of Equatorial Guinea's cultural identity, a project for which we  hope to be able to rely as in the past on Unesco's assistance, support and advice.
(14.44) We wish this Conference every success in the development of its projects, from which we hope to  derive benefit and which represent a mark of solidarity between peoples.
(14.45) It is essential to foster a spirit of international co-operation, since it is the only hope we have of  returning to the path of development, justice, prosperity and, ultimately, peace.
(14.46) 1 thank you all, Mr President, Mr Director-General, distinguished delegates, ladies and gentlemen,  for your kind attention. Thank you very much.  sb Yo  bys ogee 0 ST gle gigle HpuSodl las] dels shel yg sist pul) Land sy Sal  Sa te BY
(15) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Arabic):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Equatorial Guinea. 1 now give the floor to Dr Maung Maung  Aye, Deputy Minister for Education and Head of the Delegation of Burma.
16.1 Mr MAUNG MAUNG AYE (Burma):  Mr President, Mr Director-General, distinguished delegates, it is my privilege and plea-  sure to extend the heartiest congratulations of the Burmese delegation to Mr Ivo Margan on his  election as President of this fourth extraordinary session of the General Conference. We believe
418   that, under his able leadership and with his dedication to the ideals ot Unesco, this session will  be a most successful one. May 1 also express our sincere congratulations and gratitude to the  Director-General and the Secretariat for preparing a comprehensive Draft Medium-Term Plan for
1984-1989, in line with the spirit and directives of the General Conference at its last session.
16.2 The statement made by the Director-General on the activities of the Organization at the  opening of the session was concise, lucid and informative. It gave a better picture of the pro-  grammes and activities undertaken by the Organization and made us think about the importance  and challenges of the programmes in real-life terms. Regarding the Draft Medium-Term Plan, my  delegation believes that some of the major programmes are of considerable importance and will  play an important part in guiding Unesco's programmes and shaping its activities. They provide  a means of identifying the problems, the issues and the strategies that are shared by many  Member States. My delegation is pleased to state that some of these programmes are in line with  the programmes and activities carried out in our country.
16.3 My delegation appreciates the emphasis laid on ‘education for all’, embracing all those  activities designed to ensure the effective implementation of the right to education, the  eradication of illiteracy and the extension and improvement of education in rural areas. My  delegation welcomes and appreciates Unesco's strategy for ensuring education for all by giving  priority in its action to the development and expansion of primary education and to the pro-  motion and intensification of efforts for the total elimination of illiteracy. 1 would like to take  this opportunity to place on record our continuing efforts in this direction.
16.4 In the 1962 policy declaration on the Burmese Way to Socialism, it is stated that 'Our  education target is to bring basic education within the reach of all'. This policy is reflected in  Article 152 of the Constitution of the Socialist Republic of the Union of Burma which states that  ‘Every citizen has the right to education. Every citizen shall be given basic education which the  state prescribes by law as compulsory'. With this objective in mind, Burma, under the leader-  ship and guidance of the Burma Socialist Programme Party, has adopted a far-reaching strategy  for quantitative expansion together with qualitative improvement in primary education, and at  the same time has launched a mass literacy movement for those illiterates who have never  received any form of education or who have not been able to receive sufficient education to play  an active part in community and social activities.
16.5 1 am very happy to state that as a result of the expansion of primary education during  the last two decades, the enrolment ratio at the primary level has been increasing year by  year. The number of primary students in 1961-1962 was approximately 1.7 million, whereas in
1981-1982 it was approximately 4.5 million, i.e. an increase of approximately 2.8 million primary  students during the last two decades. This impressive increase in student enrolment in the  primary level of education proves the sustained efforts made by Burma to implement the national  policy for the right to education. Steps are also being taken to open more and more new pri-  mary schools throughout the country to ensure education for all.
16.6 Mr President, 1 am also pleased to add that the literacy movement in our country, under  the leadership of the Burma Socialist Programme Party, and with the active voluntary partici-  pation of the people, has been gaining momentum from year to year since its inception in 1964.  Before the initiation of the literacy movement in 1964 about 4 million people between the ages of
15 and 55 were illiterate. At present, as a result of the literacy movement, and despite in-  creases in population, the number of illiterates has decreased to approximately 2.7 million; in  other words, 1.5 million people have been rendered literate. On the basis of these encouraging  experiences, the Burma Literacy Central Committee has planned for the total eradication of illi-  teracy throughout the country by the year 1990.
16.7 Mr President, 1 would like now to mention the programmes relating to the qualitative im-  provement of education in our country. Burma is attempting not only to expand primary edu-  cation and to wipe out illiteracy but also to raise the existing education standard of the country  to world level. In pursuit of this objective, all possible measures have been taken and many  new innovative programmes and projects drawn up. These measures cover all levels, from basic  to higher education, and include technical and vocational education.
16.8 Mr President, my delegation is conscious of the vital role played by science and tech-  nology in the world today in the development of mankind and society. My delegation is pleased  to observe that one of Unesco's major programmes is devoted to the essential question of how  the advancement of the sciences, technological progress and the development of society relate to  the satisfaction of human needs and inspirations. In Burma, the teaching and development of  science and technology are being carried out with the objective of satisfying to the maximum the  material, spiritual and cultural needs of the nation. If 1 may say so, the ideals underlying our  objectives are in close accord with those of Unesco.
16.9 Mr President, 1 have attempted to summarize some of the important developments and  trends of education in Burma, and to indicate some elements of our thinking on the major pro-  grammes of the Draft Medium-Term Plan. My delegation is looking forward to hearing about  other countries' experiences and to working with other delegations in identifying some common  problems and the main future directions in education in the light of global education problems.
16.10 In conclusion, Mr President, on behalf of the Burmese delegation 1 wish to express once  again our sincere appreciation of the work accomplished by the Director-General and his col-  leagues in the preparation of the Draft Medium-Term Plan in accordance with the ideals and  spirit of Unesco. Lastly, on behalf of my delegation, 1 wish to assure you of our full co-  operation in efforts to ensure that this extraordinary session of the General Conference  reaches a fruitful and successful conclusion.
16.11 Thank you, Mr President.  (Mr Darracq, Uruguay, took the Chair)
(17) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Burma and 1 give the floor to H.E. Mr Sekou Ommar Tall,  Minister of Education and Head of the Delegation of Guinea.
18.1 M. TALL (Guinée).-  Monsieur le Président, Monsieur le Président du Conseil exécutif, Monsieur le Directeur  général, Honorables délégués, Mesdames, Messieurs, vous me permettrez tout d'abord, au nom de  la délégation de la République populaire révolutionnaire de Guinée que j'ai l'insigne honneur de  conduire, de m'acquitter d'un agréable devoir, celui de transmettre à la quatrième session extra-  ordinaire de la Conférence générale les salutations chaleureuses et les voeux de plein succès ainsi  que le message de solidarité du peuple de Guinée tout entier, de son Parti-Etat, le Parti démocra-  tique de Guinée, et de son leader le responsable suprême de la révolution, le camarade président  Ahmed Sékou Touré. Nous tenons aussi à adresser au Président de la Conférence générale ainsi  qu'à tous les membres du Bureau de la Conférence nos sincères félicitations pour la nouvelle con-  fiance qui leur a été faite. La compétence d'un homme qui a su conduire avec le succès qu'on sait  les travaux de la Conférence générale à sa vingt et unième session, qui a eu lieu dans son beau  pays, garantit d'ores et déjà que les décisions qui seront prises à la présente session répondront  aux immenses espoirs que les Etats membres, et singulièrement les pays en développement, placent  en notre Organisation.
18.2 Notre délégation félicite également S. Exc. M. le Président du Conseil exécutif et tous les  membres du Conseil exécutif pour les efforts inlassables qu'ils ont déployés lors des 113e, 114e et
115e sessions afin d'apporter le soin le plus méticuleux à la préparation du Plan. Grâce à vos cri-  tiques, Monsieur le Président du Conseil, à vos réflexions judicieuses, à vos suggestions et amen-  dements pertinents, la qualité des documents qui sont mis à notre disposition force l'admiration et  le respect.
18.3 Il y a lieu de noter avec une grande satisfaction la méthode de travail scientifique qui a  présidé à l'élaboration de ce Plan. Le directeur général, M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow, par son génie  spécifique, sa clairvoyance et son respect scrupuleux de l'Acte constitutif, ainsi que des réso-  lutions et recommandations adoptées par la Conférence générale et le Conseil exécutif, par sa  volonté indéfectible de maintenir intacte la mission assignée à notre Organisation par les Nations  Unies, a réussi à donner à ce document un caractère à Ja fois sérieux et démocratique.
18.4 En effet, jamais au sein de cette Organisation l'élaboration d'un plan n'a donné lieu à une  consultation aux bases si larges et si diversifiées. Toutes les parties ont été consultées, toutes  ont été entendues avec le respect et l'attention nécessaires ; les commissions nationales, les  organisations gouvernementales et non gouvernementales, les personnalités éminentes de tous les  continents ont eu à réfléchir sur ce Plan, à l'analyser, à l'enrichir. Le mérite de l'utilisation de  cette méthode plus que louable, et qui doit constituer une source de légitime fierté pour tous les  Etats membres de notre Organisation, revient au Directeur général et à tout le Secrétariat de  l'Unesco. Compte tenu de la multiplicité des paliers de réflexion et de discussion qui ont été  franchis, nous pensons que le Plan qui nous est proposé suscitera encore des débats fructueux et  c'est pourquoi nous osons nourrir l'espoir que les points de convergence l'emporteront sur ceux  de divergence. Cela dit et sans vouloir abuser de votre temps, je voudrais vous soumettre, dans  une analyse sommaire, le point de vue de ma délégation sur les programmes qui nous sont proposés.
18.5 Tout d'abord il faut considérer ce Plan comme un tout indissociable. La première partie, "La  problématique mondiale et les orientations du Plan à moyen terme", et les 13 grands programmes  qui forment la deuxième partie constituent deux maillons essentiels d'une seule et même chaîne.  Loin d'être une analyse métaphysique qui n'aurait pas sa raison d'être ici, la problématique mon-  diale offre un cadre conceptuel permettant d'identifier avec précision les problèmes mondiaux ;  elle constitue un véritable diagnostic des maux dont souffre le monde. Si ce diagnostic a parfois  un goût amer c'est qu'il met à nu toutes les inégalités, toutes les iniquités qui sont hélas les  réalités de notre temps. Rien que l'énumération des exemples criants des déséquilibres dont  souffre le Tiers Monde suffirait à épuiser largement les quelques minutes qui me sont accordées.
18.6 Il est vrai qu'un tel diagnostic ne peut pas ne pas faire mal à certaines consciences, pour  ne pas dire à certaines politiques. Nous estimons que consacrer une telle place 4 l'analyse de la  problématique mondiale n'était que logique dans le cadre du processus de planification à moyen  terme.
18.7 Le but du Plan à moyen terme est la mise en oeuvre des activités qui relèvent de la compé-  tence de l'Unesco. Comment peut-on envisager la mise en oeuvre d'activités sans une identification  précise dans le temps des problèmes auxquels on doit trouver des solutions ? L'analyse de la  problématique mondiale constitue donc le support logistique de l'édifice que représente le Plan.
18.8 Ainsi considérée comme cadre conceptuel qui permet d'établir un lien organique entre les
13 grands programmes proposés dans la deuxième partie, l'analyse de la problématique mondiale ne  saurait s'opposer a priori ni à l'exigence de concentration ni à celle de continuité. Cependant la  concentration excessive du programme conduirait à déséquilibrer un ensemble qui constitue à l'évi-  dence un tout cohérent, mais elle risquerait en outre d'aboutir à la suppression d'activités qui, si  elles ne présentent pas d'intérêt majeur pour les pays développés au stade où ils sont parvenus,  sont à coup sûr d'une importance capitale pour les pays en développement. Par ailleurs, les acti-  vités envisagées dans le Plan étant conçues pour toute la période des années 1984-1989, elles sont  appelées à être revues périodiquement dans le cadre de la programmation biennale, ce qui permet-  tra de procéder à des ajustements chaque fois que cela se révélera nécessaire.
18.9 En somme, la problématique mondiale et les orientations du Plan à moyen terme r'offrent pas  seulement un tableau sombre de tous les maux dont souffre notre monde, elles sont aussi j'affir-  mation de la confiance des hommes dans le destin de l'humanité, de leur volonté de surmonter ces  difficultés malgré leur importance et leur complexité.
18.10 Lorsqu'on parcourt le document qui nous est soumis, Monsieur le Président, il apparaît  clairement que la clé de voûte de notre système est la mise en oeuvre d'activités multiformes de  nature à assurer un développement harmonieux et équilibré de la communauté internationale, et ce  pour une meilleure entente entre les Etats et les nations. Il est aujourd'hui établi - chacun en a  la conviction profonde - que tant que l'écart entre les niveaux de développement de nos Etats  continuera à se creuser, la concorde internationale, objectif essentiel de notre Organisation, ne  sera pas réalisée.
18.11 Certaines expressions forgées - et maintes fois reprises - ces dernières années traduisent  le fait que les nations expriment, dans les différentes organisations spécialisées, leur prise de  conscience de la nécessité d'un changement et, faute de mieux, se débuttent en vain pour obtenir  les moyens matériels et immatériels et susciter les volontés politiques qu'il faudrait libérer pour  leur donner une réalité. En effet les expressions "nouvel ordre international”, "nouvel ordre  international de l'information", "nouvel ordre international culturel", etc., indiquent pour le moins  que les rapports anciens sont périmés et ne correspondent plus aujourd'hui aux légitimes objectifs  fixés à notre Organisation.
18.12 Monsieur le Président, l'histoire du monde dans cette deuxième moitié du XXe siècle est  marquée par la libération de jure de la presque totalité des anciennes colonies et par la lutte de  ces dernières pour garantir leur indépendance politique et économique et sauvegarder leur identité  culturelle. Les anciens rapports colonies/métropoles ont une dangereuse tendance à se muer en  rapport "pays développés/pays sous-développés". Entre ces deux groupes de pays, l'inégalité gran-  dissante des termes de l'échange contribue à élargir d'autant le fossé économique. La notion de  développement est partout en filigrane dans les 13 grands programmes du Plan à moyen terme,  qu'il s'agisse des programmes sur l'éducation, des programmes relatifs aux sciences et à leur  application, des programmes concernant la communication et l'information ou de ceux relatifs aux  droits des peuples, aux droits de l'homme et à la paix.
18.13 Monsieur le Président, ma délégation estime que le développement des pays du Tiers Monde  suppose une promotion rapide et démocratique de l'éducation, la pleine utilisation de la science,  de la technique et de la technologie, la démocratisation et l'intensification de la communication et  de l'information au sens large et profond de ces termes, et en définitive la promotion des cultures  en tant que supports indispensables et dimension essentielle du développement.
18.14 "L'Afrique a été dominée par la science, elle doit se libérer par la science” nous enseigne  en Guinée le président Ahmed Sékou Touré. Cette vérité doit nous conduire à renforcer dans les  pays en développement notre arsenal de recherche dans tous les secteurs de développement et à  maîtriser la science, la technique et la technologie afin que, par nos moyens propres d'abord,  puis par le "transfert des techniques", nous puissions mettre en place des schémas technologiques  originaux parce que adaptés aux exigences éthiques et esthétiques de nos identités respectives.
18.15 Mais comment, Monsieur le Président, accéder au siade du développement harmonisé sans  passer par le nécessaire palier intermédiaire de la communication et de l'information ? La cor-  munication et l'information, par nature instruments privilégiés de liaison, donc facteurs essentiels  de rapprochement des hommes et des nations, sont devenues, en raison des iniquités qui caracté-  risent l'évolution de nos sociétés, des facteurs de division, et des hommes et des nations. Les  voix des nations du Tiers Monde sont pour ainsi dire étouffées par des myriades de faisceaux dé-  ployés par des pays développés. La communication et l'information sont aujourd'hui de véritables
11   forces d'agression économique et culturelle au service d'un groupe minoritaire de nations déve-  loppées. L'intoxication politique, l'imposition de schémas culturels importés menacent les cultures  des pays en développement et tendent à désintégrer progressivement les structures traditionnelles  de nos sociétés, en tout cas à déstabiliser sûrement nos Etats. En effet, Monsieur le Président, le  prisme déformant des messages émis vers les pays en développement reflète toujours ie sentiment  de l'informateur, mioux, traduit la couleur politique et idéologique du corps social auquel appar-  tient l'informateur. Ainsi la nécessaire objectivité en matière d'information n'existe pas.
18.16 Face à cette situation déplorable qui est à l'origine de tant de discordes entre les hommes  et les nations, il importe qu'une solution soit trouvée. Il est urgent que s'instaure un nouvel  ordre mondial de la communication et de l'information, que démarre la formation de personnels  spécialisées pour les pays en développement, que s'intensifie la coopération sous-régionale, ré-  gionale et internationale dans le domaine crucial de l'information et de la communication.
18.17 La libre circulation des idées et des connaissances, la large diffusion des informations, la  liberté de presse, mais aussi la responsabilité pleine et entière des professionnels de l'information  sont, comme l'indique le Plan à moyen terme, les facteurs essentiels de l'établissement d'un nouvel  équilibre et d'une meilleure réciprocité dans la circulation de l'information entre pays développés  et pays en développement.
18.18 Monsieur le Président, s'agissant du problème du désarmement, ma délégation estime que  l'accroissement des forces militaires n'est pas la réponse aux problèmes de sécurité des Etats.  Bien au contraire, elle accélère vertigineusement la diabolique course aux armements. Les aues-  tions du désarmement et de la paix ne doivent pas être un domaine exclusivement réservé aux  grandes puissances. Les menaces terrifiantes engendrées par les capacités de destruction collec-  tive créées par les hommes ne pèsent pas sur les seules grandes puissances, loin s'en faut. Elles  pèsent sur l'humanité tout entière, y compris les peuples à qui la fabrication des missiles ba-  listiques, des ogives nucléaires à têtes multiples et de tout l'arsenal diabolique d'anéantissement  reste étrangère. L'habitude dangereuse s'instaure de laisser un nombre infime de pays se réunir  pour discuter du sort de l'humanité et de la paix. Nous sommes tous concernés, parce que la pla-  nète est la propriété de tous. Il y va donc de notre survie. Il est temps pour les hommes, s'ils  veulent éviter le cataclysme final, de se réabreuver aux sources de l'humanisme : "Science sans  conscience n'est que ruine de l'âme”.
18.19 Les préjugés, l'intolérance, le racisme, l'apartheid sont de virulentes causes de tensions.  Le premier droit pour un peuple, pour un homme, condition de tous les autres droits, c'est la  liberté, la liberté de se choisir et de se forger un destin, d'être ce que l'on veut être. Au  Moyen-Orient, en Afrique australe, l'intolérance, le racisme, le sionisme et l'apartheid dénient ce  droit à des peuples entiers, à des hommes. Notre Organisation dans tous ses domaines de compé-  tence doit renforcer toujours davantage sa lutte contre ces fléaux.
18.20 S'agissant des droits des puuples et des droits de l'homme, ma délégation estime que pour  procéder à une analyse approfondie de cette question vitale, il faudrait revenir à la source des  Croits, non pas à leur source purement théorique, mais à leurs racines historiques et sociales.
18.21 De ce fait, toute analyse qui se veut sérieuse at complète des droits de l'homme doit partir  d'une connaissance profonde de l'histoire des peuples. Je voudrais insister particulièrement sur la  notion de droits des peuples qui, en aucun cas, ne saurait être opposée à celle de droits de  l'homme. Bien au contraire, le respect des droits des peuples protège de facto les droits de  l'homme. Quand les droits des peuples sont bafoués, il va de soi qu'une atteinte grave est ainsi  faite aux droits des hommes appartenant à ces peuples. Les rapports entre individus et société ne  doivent pas se poser en termes de conflits.
18.22 L'éducation de l'homme vise à l'insérer dans sa société, à faire en sorte qu'il soit utile à  cette société ; de même, le but le plus noble que peut rechercher cette société, c'est d'être utile  à une communauté plus large, à la communauté internationale. N'est-ce pas un tel idéal qui a pré-  sidé à la création de notre Organisation ?
18.23 Le droit ne saurait être considéré comme un simple concept abstrait. I] est une conquête  sociale liée à l'histoire, à la culture, aux traditions, au niveau de développement et à la liberté  d'action de chaque peuple. C'est ce qui lui cor “dre un caractère spécifique. De cette spécificité  clécoule la singularité des droits dont peuvent se réclamer des hommes appartenant à une société.  Aujourd'hui, l'histoire des millions d'êtres humains en Asie, en Afrique et en Amérique latine  atteste de plus en plus que les droits de l'homme ne sont rien sans les droits des peuples dont ils  découlent. En termes d'éducation, la sauvegarde de la faculté pour chaque homme de développer  son génie créateur et son équilibre interne n'est possible que dans une société libre. Dans cette  optique, ii serait trompeur de trop insister sur les nouveaux droits de l'homme quand les droits  élémentaires des peuples ne sont pas encore garantis ct reconnus universellement. Défendre les  droits de l'homme, c'est oeuvrer c'abord pour l'indépendance des nations, le progrès social et dé-  mocratique dans tous les pays, la réalisation des aspirations légitimes des peuples à un monde  caractérisé par un nouvel ordre international plus juste, plus solidaire, d'où soit bannie toute  pratique discriminatoire, toute pratique de domination et d'exploitation d'une nation par une  autre.
18.24 Nous rappelons que dans son intervention lors de la 115e session du Conseil exécutif,  M. Mamadi Keita, ministre de l'enseignement supérieur et de la recherche scientifique de notre  pays a suggéré la tenue en République populaire révolutionnaire de Guinée d'une réunion sur le  thème "droits des peuples et droits de l'homme”. Bien qu'une requête ait été déjà introduite à ce  sujet auprès de l'Unesco, nous saisissons l'occasion de cette Conférence pour réitérer cette  emande.
18.25 Monsieur le Président, pour n: pas abuser du temps précieux de cette auguste assemblée,  je voudrais indiquer avant de terminer que ma délégation approuve intégralement ce Plan et ses  grands programmes et se réserve le droit d'intervenir cn détail au sein des commissions.
18.26 S'agissant des indications de ressources, ma délégation estime qu'un plan, pour cohérent  qu'il soit, ne peut connaître une mise en oeuvre correcte que si des ressources suffisantes lui  sont affectées. 11 est donc impératif d'accroître les ressources afin de donner au Directeur général  de l'Unesco tous les moyens d'action qui lui permettront d'exécuter tous ses grands programmes  dans leur intégralité.
18.27 Puisse donc ce plan être adopté par consensus ! Puissu-t-il, ainsi adopté, favoriser le  développement des pays du Tiers Monde, en particulier pour une’ meilleure entente entre les  hommes et entre les nations. Je vous remercie.
(19) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Guinea and give the floor to I.E. Colonel Sekou Ly, Minister  of Education and Head of the Delegation of Mali.
20.1 Le colonel LY (Mali).-  Monsieur le Président, au nom de la ¢ ‘légation de la République du Mali que j'ai l'honneur  de conduire, je voudrais tout d'abord féliciter M. Ivo Margan pouar sa brillante élection, car nous  savons avec quel tact et quelle autorité il © toujours su diriger nos travaux et nous sommes déjà  persuadés que nous aboutirons à ces résultats positifs.
20.2 Quant à vous, Monsieur le Directeur gén:ral, vous sovez sans doute dans quelle estime  vous tient le peuple malien et tout le respect que nous avons pour l'homme Ge culture et d'action  que vous êtes. Je voudrais enfin vous dire toute l'admiration que nous avons pour l'excellent tra-  Vail que vous accomplissez à la tête de notre Organisatior..
20.3 Monsieur le Président, Monsieur le Directeur général, Excellences, Mesdames et Messieurs,  qu'il me soit permis, au nom de mon pays, de saluer ici les efforts que déploie nuire Organisation  pour la défense des libertés et du droit des peuples à l'autodétermination et à la paix.
20.4 Malgré les appels et les résolutions adoptées à tous les niveaux, le régime d'oppression et  de dégradation de l'Afrique du Sud continue à faire subir & d'autres hommes, nos frères, les  conséquences inhumaines de l'apartheid, et c'est l'occasion pour notre Conférence d'exiger, encore  une fois, la libération de tous les hommes privés de leur liberté en raison uniquement de la cou-  leur de leur peau et de leurs idées. Nous voudrions aussi croire que l'année 1983 verra la parti-  cipation de la Nsmibie aux réunions de notre Organisation en tant qu'Etat libre et indépendant.
20.5 Au moment où des hommes meurent de faim, de malnutrition, av moment où la sécheresse  sévit dans les régions du Sahel, au moment où avoir un peu d'eau est le voeu le plus ardent de  milliers d'hommes, d'autres hommes, entraînés par leur richesse, se livrent à une course effrénée  à la fabrication de canons, de bombes et d'armes chimiques aux fins de détruire notre humanité.
20.6 En attendant cette extermination générale, nous subissons les méfaits des pollutions atmo-  sphériques et terrestres. Il faut, Mcusieur le Président, parvenir à mettre fin à cela. La dégra-  dation de notre écosystème, avec ses conséquences dramatiques, constitue un sujet d'inquiétude.  Malgré ce tableau pessimiste des réalités que nous Vivons, nous osons croire en l'homme, en sa  capacité de créer un monde où l'éducation, la science et la culture auront à jouer un rôle pri-  mordial. C'est là un des objectifs fondamentaux de l'Unesco, que nous soutenons.
20.7 Mais la problématique mondiale, le déséquilibre entre pays pauvres et pays riches, sont des  sujets de préoccupation sur lesquels il n'est pas inutile de s'attarder. En effet, la problématique  mondiale mérite d'être examinée sous l'angle des études prospectives qui permettent un approfon-  dissement dans le sens de la recherche de voies claires conduisant à une maîtrise plus sûre des  grands problèmes auxquels se trouve confronté le monde d'aujourd'hui. L'écart entre pays pauvres  et pays riches en matière d'enseignement, ce sécurité, d'information et de communication, n'ins-  pire, Monsieur le Président, que pessimisme et sentiment d'échec et doit nous renforcer dans  notre insistance À souhaiter que notre Organisation examine sous l'angle des études prospectives  cette question capitale de la problématique mondiale.
20.8 Monsieur le Président, je me permets de rappeler à cette assemblée que mon pays fait hélas  partie des pays les moins avancés, victimes, dans leur développement, de la détérioration des  termes de l'échange. Une révision radicale du système qui engendre ce phénomène s'impose et  nous réclamons avec force l'instauration d'un nouvel ordre économique international fondé sur plus  de justice et d'équité. L'Unesco doit retenir parmi ses tâches prioritaires le lancement d'une vaste  campagne d'information dans les pays développés afin d'éclairer leur opinion publique et d'amélio-  rer ainsi l'image qu'on s'y fait d'une part des pays en développement, et d'autre part de la coo-  pération en général.
20.9 I est un autre domaine où les disparités et les déséquilibres qui en découlent s'avèrent  préjudiciables à notre développement : c'est celui de l'information et de la communication. A quoi  assistons-nous ? A l'accaparement des médias par les pays industrialisés, à l'exploitation ingé-  nieuse et raffinée de ces médias, mis au service de leur hégémonie sur les autres pays du monde,  ce qui leur assure une hégémonie politique, économique et cuiturelle. Ce monopole leur procure un  pouvoir d'information puissant, à l'inverse des pays en développement qui ne disposent très sou-  vent que d'un système d'information faible sinon inexistant.
20.10 Pour réduire sinon supprimer ces inégalité», il incombe à l'Unesco de s'employer à norma-  liser les moyens d'échange des informations grâce à l'élaboration, dans le cadre de son deuxième  Plan à moyen terme, d'une charte définissant les principes d'un nouvel! ordre mondial de l'infor-  mation et de la communication, propres à garantir dans ces domaines le respect des règles de  justice entre pays en développement et pays industrialisés. L'Unesco doit également encourager les  pays en développement à instaurer entre eux des rappor's de coopération horizontale. Elle doit  enfin s'eftorcer de faire en sorte que l:nformation devisnne un instrument privilégié de coopé-  ration, de complémentarité et de paix entre les nations.
20.11 Enfin, Monsieur le Président, le Mali appe'le de tous ses voeux l'instauration de ce nouvel  ¢ dre mondial de l'information et de la communication et appartient déjà, en tant que membre à  part entière, à des organisations internationales, régionales et sous-régionales telles que le Pool  des agences de presse des pays non alignés, l'Union des radiodiffusions et télévisions nationales  d'Afrique et l'Agence panafricaine d'information.
20.12 Notre parti et notre gouvernement ont toujours mis l'éducation au service du développement  et c'est donc guidés par ce même souci qu'ils ont prévu dans le Plan quinquinnal pour 1981-1985,  un programme d'éducation étroitement lié aux besoins du développement économique et social, mais  tenant compte aussi des ressources disponibles. Je voudrais attirer l'attention de notre Conférence  sur la problématique de l'adéquation formation ‘emploi, qui constitue à l'heure actuelle un souci  dont l'ampleur et l'impact n'échappent à personne. A cet égard, le système <ducatif du Mali met  l'accent sur l'expansion de l'enseignement de base par le développement de l'alphabétisation fonc-  tionnelle et de la formation des adultes et par l'adaptation de l'école à la vie grâce à la rura-  lisation de l'enseignement et à l'introduction progressive des langues nationales comme vihicules  d'initiation et de transmission des connaissances. La ruralisation représente un effort d'adaptation  de notre système d'éducation aux réalités socio-économiques et culturelles de notre milieu, une dé-  marche qui vise à établir une interaction réelle entre environnement et école par des activités  concrètes, en vue d'une meilleure formation ot d'une insertion plus réelle de la jeunesse dans le  milieu qu'elle est appelée à transformer. Elle se caracterise par sa fonctionnalité et son intégration  aux plans de développement communautaire. Elle doit conserver son ouverture sur le monde.
20.13 Comme l'a si bien souligné le doyen Amadou Hampêté Ba, le Mali est "vieille terre d'histoire  et de culture, mais aussi du mythe et de la légende". Mon pays a en effet toujours apprécié la  valeur des rencontres culturelles et puisé sa vitalité dans l'unité et la diversité, dans l'amour des  traditions ancestrales et dans le goût des acquisitions nouvelles. Nous entendons cependani rester  fidèles à notre identité culturelle même si nous portons sans nul doute le plus grand intérêt au  dialogue fécond des cultures. En effet, les efforts que nous déployons pour sauvegarder nos  traditions et notre identité culturelle ne freinent point notre ardent désir de nous ouvrir aux  autres cultures. Nous déployons ces efforts dans le souci de recouvrer notre patrimoine culturel  partiellement pillé et qui fait le bonheur et la fierté de co.lectionneurs et autres amateurs d'objets  d'art.
20.14 L'Unesco, espoir de tous, a un rôle capital à jouer dans cette tâche si noble, mais combien  difficile et délicate, de récupération. Elle devra enfin tout mettre en oeuvre, dans le cadre du  Plan sexennal qui nous est soumis, pour instaurer, là encore, un nouvel ordre mondial, celui de  la culture.
20.15 Je ne saurais terminer, Monsieur le Président, Monsieur le Directeur général, Excellences,  Mesdames et Messieurs, sans soumettre à votre aimable attention un dernier vueu - celui de voir  ia Conférence générale fixer à 6 % le taux de croissance des ressources allouées à la mise en  oeuvre de tous les programmes qui vont être adoptés à cette session. Je vous remercie, Monsieur  le Président.
(21) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Mali and give the floor to H.E. Mr Alphonse Blague,  Permanent Delegate to Unesco and Head of the Delegation of the Central African Republic.
22.1 M. BLAGUE (République centrafricaine).-  Monsieur le Président, je voudrais m'associer aux honorables délégués qui m'ont précédé  pour adresser mes vives {félicitations à M. Ivo Margan pour son élection aux fonctions de prési-  dent de la quatrième session extraordinaire de la Conférence générale. La délégation centrafricaine  sait déjà qu'il saura s'acquitter de cette lourde tâche avec succès grâce à la sagesse, au calme et  au sens des responsabilités dont il a déjà fait preuve à Belgrade lorsqu'il présidait les travaux de  la vingt et unième session de la Conférence générale.
22.2 Monsieur le Président, Mesdames et Messieurs les ministres, Excellences, Mesdames et Mes-  sieurs, qu'il me soit permis maintenant d'exprimer toute ma gratitude au directeur général,  M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow, à toute l'équipe du Secrétariat et aux membres du Conseil exécutif dont  la compétence et la diligence nous ont permis de disposer de précieux documents de travail des-  tinés à faciliter nos débats.
22.3 Monsieur le Président, l'examen des documents 4 XC/4, 4 XC/4 Annexe I, Annexe II,  Annexe III, et 4 XC/7, entre autres, permet à notre délégation d'affirmer que l'élaboration du  Projet de plan à moyen terme a été conforme aux dispositions de la résolution 21 C/100 de la  Conférence générale, d'une part, et aux directives du Conseil exécutif, d'autre part.
22.4 Cet examen nous permet également de soutenir que le Plan à moyen terme dont le projet  nous est soumis constitue un tout conérent et que la suppression d'une partie porterait préjudice  à l'ensemble des orientations qui y sont définies. Car ce projet trace le cadre conceptuel, les  objectifs et les stratégies d'action de l'Unesco pour la période 1984-1989. L'analyse du document
4 XC/4 nous permet enfin de soutenir les points de vue qui y sont exprimés et qui répondent  parfaitement aux préoccupations de la République centrafricaine. En effet, nous approuvons le  contenu de la problématique mondiale et des grands programmes proposés. Nous nous en expliquons.
22.5 Monsieur le Président, il apparaît que les principaux problèmes qui caractérisent la situation  internationale actuelle se cristallisent autour des problèmes de développement, auxquels sont liés  ceux de l'inégalité et du grand fossé entre le Nord et le Sud ; du problème de la paix et du dé-  sarmement, auquel sont liés ceux des conflits et de la course aux armements ; des problèmes de  violations des droits de l'homme et des peuples et du problème de l'analphabétisme ; des pro-  blèmes de l'environnement et des ressources naturelles ; des problèmes de la faim et de la misère  dans le monde.
22.6 L'identification de ces problèmes a permis de définir les cinq grandes missions qui incom-  beront à l'Unesco, comme l'a souligné le Directeur général dans sa présentation du Projet de plan  à moyen terme. Il s'agit en effet de susciter la réflexion sur les problèmes du monde ; l'éta-  blissement des conditions nécessaires à la participation la plus large des individus et des groupes  à la vie des sociétés ; le renforcement dc la capacité de résoudre les problèmes mondiaux et d'amé-  liorer les connaissances ; les changements et transitions nécessaires dans les diverses sociétés qui  composent la communauté internationale ; le renouvellement des valeurs de l'humanité dans la com-  préhension mutuelle entre les peuples, la paix et le respect des droits de l'homme et des peuples.
22.7 En s'assignant ces missions, l'Unesco demeure rigoureusement fidèle à son rôle céfini à la  fois par le préambule et par le dispositif même de son Acte constitutif et s'affirme comme la  conscience morale de la communauté internationale.
22.8 Monsieur le Président, la problématique mondiale nous invite à un véritable examen de cons-  cience sur notre attitude à l'égard des fléaux qui gangrènent notre monde actuel - l'hégémonisme,  le colonialisme, l'échange inégal, la dépendance financière, technologique et alimentaire, la misère,  le racisme et l'odieuse politique d'apartheid, le surarmement, le mimétisme culturel facteur  d'aliénation, la pollution biophysique et morale. Il nous faut avoir le courage de regarder en face  ces maux afin de mieux en cerner les causes et de définir tous ensemble des ébauches de solu-  tions pour l'ensemble de l'humanité.
22.9 Monsieur le Président, la délégation centrafricaine note avec satisfaction que les grands  programmes proposés rejoignent les préoccupations de notre pays qui a déjà débattu des sujets  évoqués dans les grands programmes II (L'éducation pour tous), IV (Conception et mise en  oeuvre des politiques de l'éducation), V (Education, formation et société), VI (Les sciences et  leur application au développement), IX (Science, technologie et société) et XI (La culture et  l'avenir) lors du Séminaire national sur l'éducation et la formation tenu à Bangui en mars-avril
22.10 Cet important séminaire avait permis de définir quatre grandes orientations à assigner à  l'école centrafricaine, à savoir : devenir une école véritablement centrafricaine, c'est-à-dire  refléter les préoccupations effectives de la nation centrafricaine, et surtout sa personnalité  spécifique ; se tourner vers l'avenir, c'est-à-dire vers le progrès scientifique et technique, tout  en s'enracinant dans notre culture nationale ; diversifier les filières de formation pour faire face  aux exigences multiformes du développement ; rechercher la qualité tout en assurant l'accès de  tous à l'éducation.
22.11 Les différentes recommandations adoptées au cours de ce séminaire national, qui portent  sur la promotion de la culture nationale dont notre langue nationale, le sango, doit être l'outil  privilégié, la promotion de l'enseignement supérieur et de la recherche ct le développement de  l'enseignement technique et professionnel, montrent bien que les grands programmes énumérés ré-  pondent aux préoccupations de la République centrafricaine. Notre pays souhaite qu'un accent par-  ticulier soit mis sur la situation particulière des pays les moins avancés et que les conclusions du  séminaire organisé récemment sur les priorités en matière d'éducation dans ces pays soient incor-  porées au Plan à moyen terme et prises en considération lors de l'élaboration du prochain Projet  de programme et de budget.
22.12 La récente misc en place d'un Office national de recherche scientifique et technique té-  moigne de la volonté de la République centrafricaine d'être présente au rendez-vous du progrès,  qui intéresse les domaines du savoir et tous les secteurs d'activité des sociétés contemporaines.  L'Office aura en effet pour tâches de mettre en oeuvre une politique scientifique et technologique  cohérente et de coordonner et administrer les activités de recherche entreprises sur le territoire  national afin de renforcer la contribution de la science et de la technique au développement. Notre  souci est de faire enfin en sorte que la science et la culture fassent purtie intégrante du Plan de  développement économique et social national.
22.13 Beaucoup de réalisations et de projets scientifiques existent dans notre pays mais je n'en  citerai que quelques exemples : recherches agronomiques, forestières et vétérinaires orientées  vers la réalisation de l'autosuffisance alimentaire et le développement des industries de trans-  formation ; recherches en biotechnologie consistant à étudier le recyclage et la transformation des  déchets biodegradables ; recherches sur l'énergie qui peut être produite à partir des feuilles et  des fumiers ; recherches ethno-pharmacologiques, anthropologiques, ethno-musicologiques,  linguistiques, historiques et archéologiques.
22.14 Nous souhaitons que l'Unesco aide davantage les pays en développement, dans le cadre du  Plan à moyen terme pour 1984-1989, à promouvoir de véritables technologies endogènes à partir de  l'artisanat local, du renforcement du potentiel national, de l'équipement de laboratoires de re-  cherche universitaires et postuniversitaires et d'actions concertées sous-régionales et régionales.  Nous encourageons l'Unesco à concrétiser et étendre sa coopération avec l'Union douanière et éco-  nomique de l'Afrique centrale dans les domaines de sa compétence, en vue d'améliorer la situation  des Etats de cette sous-région.
22.15 Nous estimons aussi, compte tenu de notre expérience nationale, que l'Unesco gagneraît à  dynamiser et à étendre les actions du Programme MAB. La collaboration de la République centra-  fricaine lui est d'ores et déjà acquise à cet effet, puisque ce programme se renforce de plis en  plus dans notre pays où il englobe une étude du fonctionnement naturel de l'écosystème forêt  dense humide à partir des données humaines réalisée dans la réserve de biosphère de  Basse-Lobaye ; une étude de l'écosystème forêt dense sèche, à réaliser dans la Réserve nationale  intégrale de la Vasako-Bolo dans le Bamingui-Bangoran : les programmes prévus dans le Parc  national Saint-Floris et les secteurs de la Vakaga-Manovo et de Goumbiri-Ouagounda, relatifs à la  protection de l'environnement, de la flore et de la faune, ainsi qu'aux études spécifiques  concernant certaines interactions animales et végétales et aux productions nationales à partir des  espèces sauvages ; les programmes de sensibilisation du public aux problèmes de l'environnement  et de la protection du patrimoine national, notamment des sites archéologiques.
22.16 Il importe également, selon nous, d'intensifier les actions envisagées au titre des grands  programmes relatifs à la communication et à la culture en insistant sur le renforcement de la capa-  cité des Etats en matière de création et préservation des infrastructures indispensables en la ma-  tière, ainsi que de formation et de recyclage de cadres qualifiés. A cet égard, la multiplication  des séminaires nationaux et sous-régionaux de perfectionnement des personnels de l'information,  de la communication et de la culture, ainsi que la promotion du livre constituent à n'en point  douter une stratégie d'action susceptible de renforcer l'impact de l'action de l'Unesco dans les  Etats membres.
22.17 Monsieur le Président, la délégation centrafricaine apporte son appui aux grands pro-  grammes I, VIII, XII et XIII soumis à l'appréciation de la plénière. Le grand programme I (Ré-  flexion sur les problèmes mondiaux et études prospectives) constitue une initiative heureuse car il  permettra à la communauté internationale de disposer d'une banque de données en la mat;*re et  renforcera le rôle intellectuel de l'Unesco. Il faudrait toutefois que les études prospectives  s'appuient obligatoirement sur des données quantitatives et concrètes. Par ailleurs nous ne par-  tageons pas le point de vue selon lequel le grand programme I n'aurait pas sa place dans le Plan  à moyen terme. Sa présence met au contraire en relief la dimension intellectuelle des activités de  l'Unesco. Tenter de restreindre la contribution de l'Unesco à l'analyse théorique des problèmes  mondiaux équivaudrait à limiter son action à une mosaïque d'activités ponctuelles et sans suite.
22.18 Le grand programme VIII (Principes, méthodes et stratégies de l'action pour le développe-  ment) permettra à l'Unesco de tirer les leçons de l'expérience vécue par tous les Etats membres et  d'autres organes du système des Nations Unies afin de mieux aider les Etats à inventer le type de  développement adapté à leurs besoins, aspirations et personnalité.
22.19 Il importe de faire observer que toute stratégie de développement doit s'appuyer sur le  bilan de l'action passée, la mobilisation et la participation conscientes et volontaires des acteurs  économiques et sociaux à la définition des objectifs et des activités, à leur mise en oeuvre et à  leur évaluation. Car le développement est un processus dont l'homme est le point de départ et le  point d'aboutissement.
22.20 Il n'est pas de stratégie viable sans politique cohérente en matière de ressources humaines.  C'est pour contribuer à sa définition que l'Unesco a réuni récemment à Harare les ministres de  l'éducation et les ministres chargés de la planification économique des Etats membres d'Afrique.  Nous sommes heureux de constater que les principes énoncés dans la Déclaration de Hurare sont  repris duns les objectifs définis au grand programme VIII.
22.21 Monsieur le Président, une stratégie nationale de développement n'est viable que si elle  s'inscrit dans le cadre de la coopération sous-régionale, régionale et internationale au service de  la recherche et de la sauvegarde de la paix, de la compréhension internationale, du respect du  droit des peuples et des droits de l'homme (c'est-à-dire de tous les hommes et de tout l'homme),  du respect de l'identité culturelle et du dialogue interculturel réaffirmés dans la Déclaration de  Mexico sur les politiques culturelles. Aussi la délégation de la République centrafricaine appuie-  t-elle le contenu du grand programme XIII (Paix, compréhension internationale, liberté des peuples  et droits de l'homme).
22.22 En effet, la paix est ce que nous recherchons tous. Mais comment peut-on vivre en paix  quand on refuse d'accepter l'autre ? Comment peut-on vivre en paix quand on aspire quotidienne-  ment à la domination du monde ? Comment peut-on vivre en paix quand certains peuples, cer-  taines catégories sociales, certaines ethnies subissent le racisme et l'ostracisme politique ?  Comment peut-on vivre en paix quand la violence, l'injustice et le mépris président encore aux  rapports internationaux ?
22.23 Plus que jamais, nous sommes invités à nous engager résolument dans la lutte concrète  pour l'élimination des préujugés, du racisme, de l'apartheid et du colonialisme qui retardent  l'avènement d'une communauté internationale réellement humaine et fraternelle. Le grand pro-  gramme XII contribuera, nous en sommes convaincus, à promouvoir une réelle victoire de l'homme  sur lui-même qui lui permettra de ne plus apparaître comme un loup pour l'homme. C'est pourquoi  notre délégation souhaite que l'Unesco renforce au cours des années à venir ses activités dans ces  domaines afin de conjurer ces fléaux qui empêchent le développement d'une véritable entente inter-  nationale.
22,24 Pour parvenir à cette fin, il est urgent que l'Unesco aide la communauté internationale non  seulement à prendre conscience de l'interdépendance des peuples et des nations mais encore et  surtout à mettre en oeuvre une véritable politique de codéveloppement dont chaque nation, quelles  que soient sa taille, sa position géographique, sera à la fois l'agent et le bénéficiaire. La  délégation centrafricaine saisit l'occasion qui lui est offerte pour inviter solennellement la  Conférence générale à adopter un taux de croissance suffisamment élevé pour permettre au Direc-  teur général de l'Unesco de mener à bien les programmes prévus dans le deuxième Plan à moyen  terme.
22.25 Monsieur le Président, pour me résumer je dirai que le Projet de plan à moyen terme qui  nous est sour's aujourd'hui rencontre l'agrément de ma délégation pour trois raisons. Tout  d'abord, il nous oriente vers la maîtrise du savoir, dans toute sa complexité, pour le bien des  peuples et de l'homme. Il pose ensuite la nécessité de la maîtrise de tous les savoir-faire de  l'homme contemporain. Il invite enfin à promouvoir un nouveau savoir-étre dans la communauté  internationale. Ces trois exigences répondent aux différentes préoccupations de notre Organisation  qui sont à la fois intellectuelles, pratiques, normatives et éthiques. Je souhaite plein succès à nos  travaux. Je vous remercie de votre aimable attention.
(23) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of the Central African Republic and give the floor to H.E. Mrs  Josefa Maria Prado, Permanent Delegate to Unesco and Head of the Delegation of Panama.
(24.1) Mrs PRADO (Panama) (Translation from the Spanish):  Mr President, Mr Director-General, distinguished ministers and heads of delegation, ladies and  gentlemen, the delegation of Panama to the fourth extraordinary session of the General Conference of  Unesco offers its warmest good wishes to you, Mr President, a distinguished representative of our region,  and also to Mr Ivo Margan, wishing him every success in his official functions.
(24.2) lt is an awesome task for us to address this august assembly and to express our opinion on the  Draft Medium-Term Plan. However, with all the seriousness and attention that this task demands, we wish  to place on record a number of comments in this regard. '
(24.3) The earnest, dedicated and co-ordinated effort to which the Medium-Term Plan bears witness cannot  but command our appreciation, and the Government and the delegation of Panama to this Conference take  this opportunity, Mr President, to congratulate the Director-General of Unesco, Mr Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow,  and his colleagues in the Secretariat on the excellent work they have accomplished. We also appreciate the  valuable and effective guidance offered by Dr Victor Massuh, Chairman of the Executive Board, which  examined the Draft Medium-Term Plan at its last session.
(24.4) And now, Mr President, 1 should like to make some comments on the First Part: world problems. In  our view, there are a number of essential considerations to which any serious effort of reflection on the  Plan gives rise: obvinusly, an investigation of world problems which is to serve as the basis for a series of  actions, as opposed to the mere juxtaposition of the cotponents of a whole, must seek to analyse with great  skill and clear-sightedness the fundamental essence of that reality we call the modern world. Guidelines for  conducting this meticulous investigation are set out in resolution 100 of the Belgrade General Conference,  decision 4.1 of the 113th session of the Executive Board and in the proposals emanating from the consul-  tation of Member States in this regard.
(24.5) The analysis of world problems explores its subject from a number of different starting-points so as  to lead us to an awareness of their interactions, interrelations and interconnections: the internal dynamics  of the international economy, the utilization of biological and other physical resources, underlying processes  in social change, peace, world hunger, social inequalities, the different social categories and the deter-  mination of individuals and groups to preserve and enrich their cultural identity. Man has now concluded  that the world crisis affecting all the nations of the world shows every sign of being a permanent rather  than a passing source of anguish--one whose impact is accentuated as the arms race assumes unprecedented  proportions.
(24.6) The Draft Medium-Term Plan seeks to examine individually each of the factors influencing the life of  society and the implications of its overall trends. In the analysis of historical processes, an effort is made  to adopt a future-oriented approach--an effort and objective in keeping with Unesco's lofty task of  defending the cause of peace in the world. Moreover, the present phenomenon of globalization is producing  changes in relationships in the international community as contacts between different groups and societies  continue to increase and local decisions have implications that transcend barriers and frontiers. Para-  doxically, however, the gulf separating the industrialized peoples from the developing world seems to be  deepening still further. As this imbalance becomes more pronounced, particularly in the economic field with  the characteristic undervaluation of the products and raw materials of the Third World countries, the pros-  pects of achieving peace and progress become steadily gloomier. At the same time, progress in the natural  sciences and technology, in which knowledge and increasing sophistication go hand in hand is proceeding at  a spectacular pace.
(24.7) The United Nations Conference on the Least Developed Countries was held last year here at Unesco  Headquarters; the studies carried out on that occasion left us with a clear picture of the poverty and need  which is the lot of millions of human beings, especially women, children and young people. And while the  economic problems of overproduction and hunger were all too starkly evident, a concomitant educational and  cultural problem which is the scourge of the least developed countries and the rest of the Third World i:ke-  wise commanded attention--that of illiteracy. The figures are scandalous: out of every 100 persons, 40 to 60  are illiterate. And the people who suffer these deprivations are also the victims of disease and ill heal:h.  They are born, survive with difficulty, experience stunted development and die in an urjust system where  poverty, hunger and ignorance are rampant. Someone said that 'when the industrialized countries sneeze,  the Third World dies of pnuemonia'. How can these people become involved in an effort to achieve endo-  genous development, when development remains an illusion for many of those living in dire poverty?
(24.8) This description, which is not intended to be apocalyptic or catastrophic, may be contrasted with  the following projection of the future: 'development may be envisaged as an attempt, among other things, to  internalize the dynamics of technological change, in other words to make science and technology serve the  interests of the community and the well-being of its members, helping them to achicve their deepest material  and spiritual aspirations’.
(24.9) The marked deterioration of natural resources and the human environment is a source of deep  concern. While one of the characteristics of human intelligence is the ability to control and modify the  natural environment, lack of awareness and guidance in the exploitation of these resources has resulted in  such dangerous phenomena as drought and erosion which impair productivity, The undesirable practice of  ‘slash-and-burn’ farming, which has been widespread for many decades in our region and which is mainly  the product of ignorance, has devastated thousands and thousands of hectares of formerly magnificent  woodland and forests.
(24.10) In the analysis of the global problems of mankind, we place special importance on the problem of  the seas. The proposals made in this connection in the Medium-Term Plan are of inestimable value, coming  as they do at the close of the General Assembly of the Intergovernmental Oceanographic Commission, a  forum in which a comprehensive analysis of this invaluable natural resource has been carried out, and just  prior to the signing of the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea, a precious victory for man-  kind in our time. My government has a special interest in problems pertaining to the cceans, since it has  sovereignty over 200 maritime miles in the Caribbean Sea and Atlantic Ocean, over 200 more in the Pacific  Ocean and over a long and narrow interoceanic passage crossing the country from north to south, a pas-  sage better known as the Panama Canal.
(24.11) Among the ideas put forward in the Draft Medium-Term Plan, we attach special importance to every-  thing connected with the biosphere, an indispensable element for the preservation of human life and one  whose deterioration calls for both individual and collective protective measures.
(24.12) There is a further essential ingredient of development at the present time, which functions as a  kind of conveyor belt linking all the day-to-day activities of society, that is to say communication. Someone  once rightly observed that communication is power. The parallel and complementary development of a number  of closely interrelated technologies has brought about a sudden and rapid change in the world of communi-  cation, with the result that it now permeates most aspects of social life. Needless to say, progress in  communication and information in the developing countries is of crucial importance for economic, political and  social development in those countries, so that it is essential that they should be able to rely on the  co-operation and equitable support of the international community.
(24.13) A remarkable and highly significant contribution to the analysis of global problems--one that we  have come to perceive clearly thanks to the activities of the Organization--is to be found in the growing  awareness of the interdependence and interconnection between science and technology and the other dimen-  sions of the social dynamic: development, peace, disarmament, the environment, communication, education,  etc. In recent years, scientific progress and modern technology have made it possible for man to solve  many of the problems of the world today if he approaches the task systematically.
(24.14) It must however be said, Mr President, that in this field too there are persistent inequalities in  respect of access to scientific research and progress, so that the build-up of scientific and technolcgical  knowledge depends largely on the needs and problems of the rich countries, its fruits remaining ‘uacces-  sible to the developing countries.
(24.15) With reference to the Draft Medium-Term Plan, one fact stands out as being one of the greatest  achievements of the modern world: recognition of education as one of the basic rights of individuals and as  a pre-condition of social progress. The spectacular development of education throughout the world from  both the quantitative and qualitative standpoints is unprecedented. Yet, despite these enormous efforts, the  worldwide democratization of education is still far from being achieved and the problem of illiteracy is still  hanging like a sword of Damocles over many societies, especially in the Third World, where it is one of the  greatest social evils.
(24.16) Aside from methodological and teaching problems, we are still faced with the problem of curriculum  content in the modern world, where the sine qua non for living in tomorrow's world will be the adoption of  a receptive attitude and awareness of the importance of belonging to the international community, the promo-  tion of knowledge and understanding of the different values of society and the preservation of the basic  constituents of the identity of a social group, which man can do at the same time as adapting to new and  unforeseen circumstances. However, the dynamic character of the life of the international community and the  future-oriented impetus of societies frequently make this task difficult to accomplish. From this standpoint,  it is worth underlining the need for a form of education which seeks to mobilize all the abilities, initiative  and creativity of both individuals and social groups with a view to pressing forward along the historical  paths of scientific, technical, philosophical or artistic creation and renewing human knowledge.
(24.17) The reshaping of social practices and norms through the revitalization of cultural and productive  traditions and aesthetic or moral values is the sign of a human society's potential for reconstruction--which  does not mean rejecting progress but rather accepting and understanding it without sacrificing one's own  identity.
(24.18) Mr President, the transition from reflection on world problems to action, as provided for in the  programmes contained in the Draft Medium-Term Plan, involved, at the methodological level, identifying  more clearly the nature of Unesco's tasks and establishing between them a two-way relationship through the  judicious application of interdisciplinarity and the interlinking implicit in the Plan's major lines of emphasis,  which are at the origin of the activities proposed in the thirteen major programmes. In the interests of  methodological rigour, 1 shall confine my remarks to tasks one, four and five and the major programmes re-  lating to them.
(24.19) Unesco's first task is 'to contribute to a continuing study of present world problems so as to  create a greater awareness of the common destiny which now unites individuals and peoples alike'. What  more appropriate setting than Unesco with its international calling to serve as a forum for the lofty task of  initiating an intellectual debate in which exchanges of information, opinions and studies may result in new  approaches and ideas that could help to solve major world problems within the propitious frumework of an  international community imbued with a spirit of solidarity and ready to provide moral and material support!  The Major Programme corresponding to this task is entitled 'Reflection on world problems and future-  oriented studies’. It is, in our view, an attempt to identify the deep, underlying currents influencing world  society and to stimulate joint action by the Organization and its Member States on the basis of analysis and  of an effortito achieve real and deep understanding between peoples and cultures. The corresponding two  programmes concern studies and research on world problems and the international future-oriented study.
(24.20) We should note the importance of identifying the intellectual approaches and methodological tools  which make it possible to take account of social and cultural factors and of their interaction with other  economic and technological factors. My country has a strong interest in this programme, mainly because of  its future-oriented character.
(24.21) Unesco's fourth task is as follows: 'to help to facilitate the changes and transitions that are now  recognized as necessary by the international community as a whole, in fields where the convergence of  aspirations gives rise to a broad consensus'. In the framework of that task, action for development is the
11   basic theme of Major Programme VIII. The innovative approach adopted essentially involves integrated  development studies of a multidimensional nature embracing all aspects and facets of human life considered  as a whole, including those of each individual society.
(24.22) My government supports the implementation of specific projects executed by Member States with the  Organization's intellectual backing, the mobilizing of financial and human resources and the organization of  staff training systems through the fellowship programme, especially if such projects can be carried out in a  regional or subregional context.
(24.23) The Organization's fifth task is 'to arouse and encourage a renewal of values within a context of  genuine understanding among peoples, thereby advancing the cause of peace and human rights'.
(24.24) In the times in which we live--when the outline of the horsemen of the apocalypse looms on the far  horizon--violence, aggression, racial warfare and wars of plunder are occurring on a scale that threatens  the very foundations of society. Moves to promote peace, international understanding and peaceful activities  are of fundamental importance in Unesco's programmes, the ultimate purpose of which is to preserve  established human rights, which represent an irreversible gain for mankind.
(24.25) The elimination of prejudice, intolerance, racism and apartheid and the intensification of efforts to  achieve peace, international understanding, freedom for all peoples and human rights are inseparable  elements of a single whole.
(24.26) Accordingly, my country, which is a peaceful and democratic one and which looks forward to  seeing Namibia achieve its independence, congratulates the Director-General and the Secretariat on their  continued efforts in the context of the Draft Medium-Term Plan to promote justice in the relations between  societies and recognition of the equality of all peoples and cultures.
(24.27) 1 should like, Mr President, to make special mention of a subject dear to our heart: 1 refer to the  programme on the elimination of the discrimination affecting women, which addresses itself among other  things to three questions of crucial importance: the fundamental rights of women and the elimination of  discrimination based on sex; the status of women; and the redefinition of men's and women's roles in  political, economic, social and cultural life. These questions may bc summarized in a single phrase: women  as the object and subject of history. Problems relating to the status of women touch on every aspect of  social life and cannot therefore be isolated from the whole range of problems facing the world today.  Women's participation in society is bound up with certain functions of crucial importanc=: the education of  children, family life, the political and social life of the community and the inculcation of the ethical and  moral values of the family. Indeed, in many parts of the world and in many social groups women act as  both father and mother and are the source of the family's livelihood. This is true of thousands and  thousands of peasant women, workers and Indians, who struggle bitterly against adversity and injustice,  especially in the countries of the Third World and more particularly in Latin America, where they have also  shown themselves capable of heroism and self-sacrifice in the fight for national independence and  sovereignty.
(24.28) All over the world, women are the victims of incalculable suffering and prejudice. Together with  children and the elderly, they belong to the most disadvantaged social category, whether for natural or  social reasons or because the social and legal structures create conditions that are unjust for them. The  situation is obviously worse in the poorest and most remote parts of the world.
(24.29) As the spiritual, educational, social and material conditions of women improve qualitatively and  ouantitatively, so will the quality of the relationship between the human couple, which is the corner-stone  of the family and of society. The fact that the international community iz forming a united front to adopt  provisions aimed at countering discrimination and inequality affecting women and to introduce the requisite  corrective measures represents a considerable advance.
(24.30) The resolution adopted by the United Nations General Assembly in December 1975 proclaiming 1976-
1985 as the decade of women was incorporated in Panamanian foreign policy and accordingly our govern-  ment's Foreign Office has taken steps to involve Panamanian women in the international assemblies,  confrrences and meetings in which our country has participated, as well as in the international bodies of  which Panama is a member.
(24.31) As a result, Panamanian women today hold office as plenipotentiary ambassadors, counsellors,  advisers and heads of diplomatic missions in various countries; they have likewise been accredited as  permanent representatives to international organizations such as the FAO and Unesco.
(24.32) In conclusion, Mr President, I should like to make two remarks: my country is particularly  concerned to support two enterprises involving my region of origin, Latin America, basically because they  are of incalculable value for development and progress in the region: 1 refer to the Latin American Faculty  of Social Sciences and the Major Project for Latin America and the Caribbean.
(24.33) Panama supports the Draft Medium-Term Flan to: 1984-1989 and the proposed draft resolutions.  Thank you, Mr President.
(25) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish): v
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Panama and 1 give the floor to Mr Ladislav Smid, Chairman of  the National Commission and Head of the Delegation of Czechoslovakia.
26.1 T-5 IIMH7| (YexoonoBakwus) :  YsaxaeMHä COCNOIHH lpencenarens, MOSBOJNbTE MHE OT HMEHH YeXOCIO3ALKOH ae-  Jerauuy MOSAPpABHTB roCMNomnHa MapraHa c H36paHHeMm llpencenaresieM Haueñ YeTBepron  sHeoyepenHoñ ceccuu l'eHepasrBHOH koHpepeHuuH WHECKO. 5H yBepeH, YTO Mon ero pyko-  BOOCTBOM HHHEIHAS, TAK Xe kak H npanuaTh MEPhRAT ceccua B Benrpagye, okaxeTrcs yc-  Memon H YTBEPIHT TaKOÏ CpedHeCPOYHHM NaH, KOTOPHÉ CTAHET KDYMHEM BKJIAMOM B nesd-  TEJNbHOCTL IOHECKO Ha npeucTosnuHH mepHOoI. .
26.2 YpaxaeMsi rocnoAuH INpencenaTelb, maMbl H rocnona, Hama KonjepeHuns MPOXOOHUT  B TPEHBOXHOË H CNOXHOË MeXayHaponHoñ o6craHoBKe. MH yb6exOeHm B TOM, UTO YXYNUECHHE  MeXIY HAPOUHOTO MONOXEHHH He GbUIO HEH36EXHEM. Ins 3TOro HET, Ha H He MOXET GHTB,  HHKAKHX OCHORAHH. MONHKTHKA paspagkKH 3a HCTEKIMe TOOH MPHHECHA KOHKpeTHHe LeHHHe  pesyJbTaTH, OKasajna MO3HTHBHOE@ BOI3MEÂCTBHE Ha XH3Hb BCeX JwleX Haueñ IJjaHeTH, C  HEIPeEJIOXHOÏË OUEeBHOHOCTBI MPOHBHIACL KAK HCTOpPHYeCKOE 3ABOC€BAHHE HAPOMOB.
26.3 CuyyBCTBOM 03a60YEHHOCTH MH MOMXKHE OTMETHTb, YTO MIA OMNPENETNEAHEX HMNEPHAT  JIMHCTHYECKHX KPYTOB H MeXnyYHAPONHOH pearuxH Boobme OTXON OT S9TOÏ BHDONHOË VIS BCEX  TIONUHTHKH CTAJ 6YKBAlIbHO NPOrpaMMHOH J .Aeñ.
26.4 CeronHs MexnyHapomHoe coobmecTBO XHBET B CJIOKHOM, MpPOTHBOPEVHBOÀ O6CTAHOBKE.  C ONHOR CTOPOHH, yrposa samepHoñ KaTacTpo®aH CTaïia Goree pearnbtoï, uem xorga-nu6o  npexue, C OPYI'OH Xe CTOPOHH, HAYYHO-TEXHHYECKHH [OTeHUHas yelloRedecTspa MO3BONHET  pellarb J106HE INIOGAIIBHHE TPOGNEMH H OTKPHBA@T nepeld YeroneueCcTBOM Heo603pHMHE TMEPC-  MEKTHBH OaJibHeHwero paidBUTHA.
26.6 UexocHosaukas generards UGHHT MOCTOSHHHE HaCTOHUHBHe YCHIHA, MpHaraeMs?  Hallep O.rannsauxet B Oehe yMPOYEHKA Bceobme. 0 MHPA. CeromHsi, B YCHOBHAX HaNn4xeH-  HOM MeXIyHAPOIHON O6CTAHOBKH, COBEPIEHHO OYEBHAHO, YTO MIP IH COBPEMEHHOro 4e70-  Beka npencTasJIgeT CaMyD BeJHKYI0 UeHHOCTh, YTO TOJIBKO B YCJIOBHSX MHpa BO3MOXHO OCY-  MECTBIEHHE ero OCHOBHO:O MNpasa - NpaBa Ha XH3Hb. H ecsn 3TO OCHOBHOe rMpaso He 6y-  MeT OGeCNEUEHO, TO HO OTHOLEHHD K YONOBEKY BCe OCTANbHOE TepseT BCHKHÂ CMbCH, Mo-  STOMY MH BHPAXAEM YIOBJETBCPeHHe B CBH3H C TEM, YTO B obmeM BBeHNeHHH K IMpoexTY BTO-  poro cpennecpouHoro IJjiaHa, B TON ero YACTH, KOTOpas MOCBANEHA AHAJHIY I[J106asbHEX  MpOGJIEM, GONbIOE BHHMAHHE YIErHETCH BONPOCAM MHpa HM pasopykeHus. CopepueHHo cnpa-  BeIJIUBO B HEM OCYXNA@TCH GECCMIICIEHHAH, AHTHDYMAHHAH TEOPHH O BO3MOXHOCTH BelleHHA  OTPpAHHUEHHOÂ S)[EPHOË BOHHH.
26.7 YpaxaeMai rocrionHH MNpencemaTerb, mAMbI H rocnlga, YEXOCIOBAUKHE OPTAHH3ALUHH H  ÿIPEXIEHHH, BAHHMANNMHECH BONPOCAM obpa3oBaHMA, HaÿKH H KYJBTYDH, BHHMATEJIBHO H3Y-  YUHJIH IpencTaBsJeHHHk MpoekT nMaHa. MH cudraeM, YTO 3TO BHOAWWHNCA B HCTOPHH IOHECKO  MOKYMeHT. B HeM NpennpHHHMaeTCH MNONHTKA MPOAHAIKN3HPOBATH COBPEMEHHHE NnpotrieMs Ye-  JHopseuecTBa H YKasaTB HANPpAaBJNeHHH H IYTH HX peueHHA.
60TKa B OBYXIOOHUHHIX MporpamMMax MACT BO3MOXHOCTb IOHECKO MpHHHMATb HenocpencTBeH-—  HOE H aKTHBHOEe YYACTHE BO BCCOÔMHX YCHIHAHX MO peueHHD COBDEMEHHHX MHPOPHX MpPO6JIEM.
26.10 ‘ O6menpuæHaHHHi MeTOHONOTHYECKHH MpHHUHI TOBOPHT O TOM, YTO OCHOBOH ycNelu-  HOTO pemleHHA MPOGNEM ABNHETCA TOYHHM AHA/IH3 HCXONHOTO COCTOSHHHS. H B CHJY STOFO  COBEDPIEHHO OGOCHOBAHHHM HBJIH@TCH BKJIQUEHHE B MpoekKT BTOPOro CpegHéèécpouHoro nuaHa  KpyrnHoñ nporpammu "AHariH3 MHPOBHX IPOGJIEM H MepCIEKTHBHHE HocregosaHHH". Mu BEpHM,  UTO, GHaronaps TON MpOrpamme JeATeNbHOCTH IOHECKO 6yleT H BNPenb OCYMECTBIATBCH  Ha MpouHoïñ MeTOIONIOTHYECKOH OCHOBE, TO ECTb Ha 6a3e UMpoKOTO BAY HOTO AHarmHsa MH-  poBkXx Npo6srieM. Oco6oe MONOoXxeHHe, KOTOpoe 3aHUMaeT Hama OpraHK3AUHÆ B CHCTEME OOH,  OGYCIOBJIHBAET HEO6XONHMOCTBL PACCMOTPEHHS BONPOCOB IHOGAJIBHO, MOCTOHHHO IIOMHSI O  rJiaBHoŸÿ 3amave OHECKO - ykpenWTb Hnen sammTH MHPa B COSHAHHH JIOKeH.
26.11 Ko65acTH O6pasoBaHHH OTHOCATCH TPH KpYNHHe MporpaMMH. Mo HaweMy MHeHHD,  BCE OHH XOPpOLNO COCTaB/IeHH, GA3HPYOTCH HA aHaïinse CymecTBYMHX rmpoôsreM, KOTOpHH  GBUT NMpopeneH Ha BHCOKOM HAYYHOM YPOBHe.
26.12 O6pa3opBaHMe NO MNpaBy HurpaeT BaxHyl0 Ponb B IEATENbBHOCTH DHECKO. BocnuTanune  NH o6pasosaHke B 3HAUHTE@JbHOÏ CTEMEHH CHOCOÛCTBYIOT PElEHHIO BCEX IJ106ann Hux TPOGIIEM  YesrIOBEXECTBA.
26.13 Ina Toro UTOÔH MOGHTBCH BbPABHHBAHHH DKOHOMHYECKOPO TIOTEHLHAJIA PpasJIHYUHHX  CTpaH, MH IMONKHE B MEPBYIO OYEPENL BOCMHTATb KBAJIHPHUHPOBAHHEIX YUCHHX, HHKEHepOB  K CNElIHAalIHCTOB Boobie. IVIH YCTPAHEHHSI 3ABHCHMOCTH HEKOTOPHX CTPAH OT TPAHCHALHO-  HAJIbHHX MOHOINOJNHHÉ B OGNACTH MACCOBOñ HHPOPMALIHH MH MOJUKHHI MOII'OTOBHTL COÛCTBEH-  HHe KAzpH, KOTOPHE CMOTYT OBJANETL CAMOÏ CJIOXHON TEXHHKOH. lNaBHOH npo6HeMmonñ,  KOoTOpas HHHE CTOHT [leper yenoBeYecTBOM, ABJMHETCH MPOÔNEMA BONHk H MHPA. Xora MH  ormaeM cebe OTYET B TOM, “TO O6LEKTHBHNE TPHYHHbI BO3HHKHOBEHHH BOÂH COBEPUEHHO  HHHe, TeM He MeHee BOCNHTaHHe B JOyXe MHpa H B3aHMOMOHHMAaHH#H MEXIY HAPOJAMH MONXK-  HO CLTPATb CBOD HHUEM He 3aMeHHMÿ" porlb B peuieHHK STOH IJMABHOH Npoôsems.
26.14  ABTOPH BHUEYNOMAHYTHX MPOFpaMM NpeKpacHO CO3HAWT 3TO, O YEM CBHMETENBCT-  ByeT MNpoXonsmas KPaCHOŸ HMTBLI0 Yepe3 BCe 3TH pasmesH MHCJNb O TOM, UTO BOCTIKTAHHE  H o56pasosaHwe IO cyMecTBy HaripaBJieHH Ha CTPOHTE@JNBCTBO HOBOro obmecTsa, Ha COINEH-  CTBHE OCYMECTBIEHHO COOTBETCTBYNVIHX COLIHAJILHO-3KOHOMHYECKHX npeobpasoBaHuft. 3a-  MeTHH YCHIHH, HMEl0IIHE LEJMbIO MNPHAATb BOCMHTAHHD eme GONbUYO OÉMECTBEHHYO 3Hauu-  MOCT» H AKTHBHOCTB. BOnplielt ONEPATHBHOCTBHO OTIHYA@TCH TaKXe MOUXON K peueHulo  MocrapleHHHX s3anau, YTO MNpOHBIISHETCH B paspaboTKe HOBHX MeTONOB H PJOPM NeATENIBHOCTH .
26.15 [lo TpagHUWH OYEHb XODOWO MOArOTOBJEHH MPONPpAMMH nesaTesbHOCTH IOHECKO B 06-  NACTH eCTEeCTBeHHHX HayK. B MPpOUVIOM 93TOTO HEJNb3H OHIO Cka3aTh O6 ypOBHe MPOTPAMM  MO COUHAJIBHHM HayKaM, KOTOPpHeE HE OTKJHKAJIHCb MOCTATOUHO onepaTHBHO Ha FOBHILi2HHe  port HayK B o6mecTse. MNosTomy HHHeuHHe TPH nporpamMMel B O6JIACTH Hayk MH PÂCLICHH-  BaeM Kak war srepeu. B HHX YeTKO CHOPMYJIHPOBAH MPHHLHIM B3AKMOCBH3H Mexny COUHAJNb-  HMMM H E@CTECTBEHHLIMH HäyÿKaMH, YUTO, pa3yMeeTcs, COBEPLIIGHHO MPABHJIBHO.
26.16 MH MOXEM Cc yMOBNETBOPeHHEM KOHCTATHPOBATb, YTO KpPYMHkE NPOEKTH B O6JIACTH  ECTECTBEHHEX HAYK, KOTODHE OCYLIECTBAANHCb B MPOLTOM (MAS, nporpamMbl MO MHIPOJIOTHH  rEONOrHnuecKoñ KOppesrsALH, OkeaHorpaduu) , MOJNHOCTBO ONpABMAïIH CE6H, H MOTOMY BKJIIO-  texte UX B MpoekKT BTOPOTO CpenHeCpouHOro NJlaHa ABJSETCA BMOJNHE OGOCHOBAHHEIM. Mu  BCeuesio MonnepxHBaeM BKJIOUEHHE HOBHX KPYIHHX MPOEKTOB, KACANWHXCH HHPOPMATHKH ;  DHEPreTHKH H GHOTEXHOJIOTHH. HO, No HaweMy yBbEXIEHHN, 3TH NPOEKTH 3ACIYKHBAIOT 60-  Jlee NMOOPOGHOM, NeTal/lbHOA pa3pabOTKH.
6H 6HITL HCIMOJNb3OBAHH TMPOTHB CAMODTO Y@JNOBENYECTRA. H TYT, Ha Hall B3rnan, HEMOCTAT-  KOM MNpoexTra sBJNHETCH TOT $akT, UYTO B HEM STOR MNpo6rieMaTHKe He yneneHo Hamtexamero  BHHMaHH#. B paccMaTPHBa@MOM DOKYMEHTE BOOÔIE€ HHUYEero He CKA3AHO O poñH H OTBETCT-  BEHHOCTH YUYGHHX B 60pbbe 3a npemoTapauente suepHok KaTacTpo®H, 3a yKpervieHHe MHpa
26.18 Kpynnax nporpamma X B LEJIOM MONTOTOBNEHA XOPOINO. OgHaKO C yuyeToM 3HAYEHHA,  Koropoe HMeeT oxpana okpyxalomeH CpemH, 9TA MPOTpaMMA HyxnaeTcd, IMO-BHIHMOMY, B  Gonee mesarnbHoï paspa6oTKe. UCCP, ABNAACE OOHON H3 Hauboslee pasBHTHX B MPOMEUVIEH-  HOM OTHOUWEHWH CTPAH MHPA, OTHOCHTCH B TO Xe BpeMH K “HCJY CTPAH, 3HAYHTE@/BHA#  TEPPHTOPHH KOTOPHX MOKPHTA JiecaMH, H MOTOMY B CHAY O06 beKTHBHHX MPHYUHH yhenseT
6oJsiplIOe BHHMaHUe MPOSIEMAM 33MUATH JIeCOB OT MPOMHIWIEHHOI'O 3arpA3HeHNs. Bot nouyemy  HeOOCTaTKOM HacTosamero MpoekTA ABNHETCA, MO HameMy MHEHHD, TO, YTO B HeM He OTBe-  Nexno MecTa Npo6sleMaM OXpaHH JIeCOB YME@peHHOÂ 3O0HH.
26.19 IOHECKO aKTHBHO yYYACTBYET B peueHHH npo6nem, CBA3aHHHX CO CcpencrsaMi Mac-  Copoñ HHÇopMauxnH. B NpouvioM y MAHHON 06J1aCTH O6HUIH MOCTHTHYTH MO3HTHBHHE pPe3ynbTa~  TH. H MOTOMy CrHenyeT BHCOKO OUEHHTL 3HAVEHHeE ICKNAPALUHÉ, NpHHATHX NO 3THM BOMPOT  Cam Ha nsaniiaToR H DBAnUaTb MEpBoñ ceccHAX l'eHepastbHOon xouhepeHuxH KWHECKO. OmHako  MH HaXOOMMCH TOJNBKO B HaYaïle NMyTH, Benymero K CO3OaHHKW HOBOTO M@X71Y HAPONHOTO MOT  panKka B OGNACTH HHQOPMAUHH. ITO GyneT HerlerkKH# nyTh, Ha KOTOPOM IILHMETCH Npeolo-~  JleBaThk CONPOTHBIGHHE TPAHCHALHOHCONbHHEX KOPMOPAUHH, HX CON3HHKOB H 3AMHTHHKOB.  Kpymnnas nporpamma III, HECMOTPH Ha H@KOTOPHE CBOH HENOCTATKH, B LeJIOM NMPaBHJILHO  OPHEHTHDPYET HeATeJIbHOCTE OPrAHHS3ALIMH .
26.20 O6NACTh XYJALTYPH B fMpoekTe BTOporo CpenHecpoyHoro mjuaHa OTBENeHA CAMOCTO#A—  TerbHa& KpyrHas nporpamMa. H 3TO copBeplleHHO ECTECTBEHHO, MOCKOJIBKY KYJBTYPA CO-  CTABJNSAET HEeoTbeMIEeMHR DJIEMEHT MOBCEIHEBHOË XH3HH KAXIONO YUelIoBeKa Hameñ rMlaHeTH.  MosToMy OpraHH3auxms MONXHa NpHIaTaTb HACTORUHBHE YCHJHA IIA MEMOKPATH3AUMH KYJNIB-  TypH, TaK Kak HEO6XONHMO HaBcerMa IMOKOHYHTB C MOHATHEM KYJIBTYPH Kak MPHBHIErHH  orpaHHYueHHOro Kpyra niomeñ.
26.21 Bcemupuan KoHGepeHuxx MO MOJNATHKE B OGNACTH KYJBTYPH, COCTORBHAACH B HKne=  asrycTe 3TOro roma B Mexuko, eme pas rouTBepaurna 3HaueHHe KYJIbTYPH B COBPE@MeHHOM
436   MHpe. Oua sHBHNACb HCKIIOUHTENbHO BAaXHHEM MO CBOEMY XapakTepy COOBHTHeM B HCTOPHH  IOHECKO. ECTECTBEHHO MO9TOMY, “TO PElIeHHH CTOSIbL ABTOPHTETHOTO ¢opyMa MOJKHeI GbITb  BKJIOYeHk B CpenHeCpPOYHHW MJaH, a Takke B IBYXTONHYHHe MpPorpamMMH IOHECKO.
26.22 Jenerauusa YexOcHOBAKHH MPHBETCTBYET TOT jJAKT, UTO yBaxaeMHH rocnonunH I'e-  HepanbHHM HOUPEKTOP B MONONHHTENbHHX NPEeIJIOKEeHHAX K OCHOBHOMY MOKYMeHTY C/4 Ha-  MeETHJI COOTBETCTBYAINHE 3AKINIOUEHHH H 3aANAYUH no CpelHECPOUYHOMYy IUIaHY, KOTOPHE MOryT  SHTL paspa6oTaHH HA TON BCEMHPHOH KOHPEepeHUHH.
26.23 Hawa penerauusa MOINIEPKHBAET BKANIOUEHHHEe B [IpOeKT KpyrmHnble nporpammia XII H  XIII. Mn y6exneHH B TOM, YUTO IOHECKO nomkHa aKTHBHO BKJIIYHTBCH B MPOILECC JIHKBHIA-  IMU TAKHX IMOSOPHHX AHAXPOHH3MOB, KAKHMH, 6eCCIIOpPHO, HABHHOTCH PpacH3M H amapTeMI.  ArpeccHs Nporus JinsaHa, HeBHOaHHAA KpoBaBasa pacrpasa, YCTpoeHHaa AarpeccopamH B  MaïleCcTHHCKHX Jlarepfix 3ananHoro BeñpyTa, eue pas rMponeMoHCTpHPOBA/IH Nepen BCeM  MeEXIY HADOIHkIM COOGIIECTBOM CBOEBPEeMeHHOCTh BKJIOUEHHH B 9TY MporpaMMy BONPOCOB
60pb6H NPOTHB TEHOUHJA.
26.24 KpynHaa nporpamma XIII, ssngwLasgcAa CBOCrO Pporna HTOTOBOH, BEPHO OPHEHTH-  PYET nesTesibHOCThL IOHECKO Ha COXPaHeHHe MHPa KaK eIHHCTBEHHO BO3MOXHOH anbTepHa-  THBH B ANEpHH Bek. JlaHHad MPOrpamMa COCTAaBJIeHA XOpouo, B Hel cnpasemiHBo non-  YEPKHBA@TCH HEO6XOAHMOCTBb YCHIHTL 3ANKTY NpaB HAPOTOB. Onnaro B Heñ, MO Hawemy  MHEHHD, cJjlefoBano 6-1 eme 60Jblle aKLIeHTHPOBATb GOPB6Y MPOTHB MACCOBHX Hapye HHH  npas yvenosexka, KOTOPHE MOXHO HabmooaTh B pasrHUHEX pañoHax MKpa.
26.25 Tocnouwx MNpencenaTenb, Mami H rocnona, 3a 36 rer CBOero CYNECTBOBAHHA  IDHECKO cHucCKkania ce6e BHCOKHHÀ ABTOPHTET B MeXIYHAaPponHoM coobmecTsBe. Ee noscenHeB-  HAA DEATENbBHOCTb CNOCOOCTBYET PAI3BHTHO MeEXIYHAPOZHOTO COTpygHHYECTBA H 9HhexKTHB-  HOMY PElIEHHHD IMpoO6IIeM, KOTOPHE BO3HHKAIOT y rCCYMAPCTB-YINCHOB.
26.26 B HacTonmee BpeMA MHPOJID6HBhE CHJH MHPA BENYT PElLHTEsNIbBHYIO GOPb6Y C peak-  UHeñ, NMHTAalieHCH CTONKHYTb MHP B NPONACTL SAEPHOR KAaTaCTPOPH. B pesyNbTaTe mo-  CTHX€HHH Halle KOHEYHOÏ II@JIH - ObECNEYEHHH MHPHOË XH3 HM DH BCEX UJ@HOB Mexny-—  HAPONHOTO coobmecTBa OTKPOETCH MYTL K HEGHBANIOMY B3JIeTY YEIOBEYECKOTO T@HHH, 6y-  OyT H3XHTH TOJIOH, HHmeTa, Mary6HHe GONe3HH, JIHKBHIHPOBAHA HErpaMOTHOCTb.
26.27 Mossonbre MHE BHPA3HTb Hamexny, UTO MTOM YETBEPTOH BHEOUEPETHOÏ CECCHH  TexepasrbHoï xonjepeHuxH IDHECKO 6ymyT CMNOCOÔCTBOBRATb MOCTHX@HHND STHX 6J1ar OPOIHHX  Uerleñ, YTO CO6YLOYTCHA Hamexns, KOTOpHe HApomH BCErO MHPA BO3NAaral0T Ha 3TOT BOpyM.  Bnaromapiw Bac, rocrnouHH llpencenarteib.
(26.1) Mr SMID (Czechoslovakia) ('lranslation from the Russian):  Mr President, on behalf of the Czechoslovak delegation, allow me to congratulate Mr Margan on his  election as President of our fourth extraordinary session of the General Conference of Unesco. ! am con-  fident that under his leadership, this session, like the twenty-first session in Belgrade, will be a success  and will approve a Unesco Medium-Term Plan that will be a major contribution to Unesco's activities in the  period ahead.
(26.2) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, our Conference is taking place in a troubled and complex inter-  national climate. We firmly believe that the deterioration of the international situation is something that was  not inevitable. There are no grounds--nor can there be any grounds--for it. The policy of détente in years  past produced tangible benefits, had a favourable effect on the life of all people throughout the world and  clearly proved itself to be an historic achievement of the world's peoples.
(26.3) We can only note with deep concern that for certain imperialist circles and the forces of inter-  national reaction as a whole, the departure from a policy that was beneficial to all has become a plank in  their policy.
(26.4) Today the international community finds itself in a difficult and contradictory situation. On the one  hand, the threat of nuclear disaster has become a greater reality than at any time in the past; on the other,  the scientific and technological potential of mankind makes it possible to solve any global problem and is  opening up immense prospects for further development.
(26.5) In such circumstances, Unesco his an increasing role to play. The international authority of our  Organization grew even stronger during the implementation of its first Medium-Term Plan. Unesco achieved  a prominent position in the United Nations system and is often called--and rightly so--a laboratory of ideas.  The Organization achieved such great authority through its active participation in tackling the pressing  problems of our times.
(26.6) The Czechoslovak delegation values the continuous and persistent efforts exerted by our Organi-  zation in strengthening universal peace. Today, in a situation of international tension, it is patently clear  that the most valuable thing for man is peace, and that only if peace prevails can he realise his funda-  mental right, the right to life, And unless this fundamental right is secured, all the rest loses all meaning  for him. It is therefore a source of satisfaction for us to note that in the Foreword to the Second Draft  Medium-Term Plan, in the part dealing with the analysis of world problems, a great deal of attention is  devoted to the questions of peace and disarmament. It quite rightly condemns the absurd, anti-humanist  theory that a limited nuclear war could be waged.
(26.7) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, Czechoslovak organizations and institutions that are concerned  with education, science and culture have carefully studied the Draft Plan that was submitted. In our  opinion, this ls an outstanding document in the history of Unesco. it attempts to analyse mankind's present-  day problems and indicates ways and means of solving them.
(26.8) In that regard we deeply appreciate the work done by the Secretariat of the Organization and by  the Director-General of Unesco personally in preparing the Draft Medium-Term Plan. We consider it to be a  document of substance, the positive aspects of which cleary predominate. This does not mean, of course,  that {t is not without its weak points which should be put right during the current session.
(26.9) The choice of thirteen major programmes was well made. Their subsequent elaboration into biennial  programmes will make it possible for Unesco to take a direct and active part in the general effort to solve  contemporary world problems.
(26.10) It is a generally accepted methodological principle that the basis for the successful solution of  problems is an accurate analysis of the situation at the start. It was, accordingly, quite correct to include  in the Second Draft Medium-Term Plan the Major Programme entitled 'Reflection on world problems and  future-oriented studies’. We think that this programme will ensure that Unesco's activities in future will be  carried out on a solid methodological basis, that is, on the basis of a broad scientific analysis of world  problems. The special position occupied by our Organization in the United Nations system requires us to  take a global view of problems while never losing sight of the main purpose of Unesco, which is to  strengthen the ideas of defending peace in the minds of men.
(26.11) Three major programmes relate to education. In our view, they are well put together and are  based on an analysis of present problems which was carried out on a high aclentific level.
(26.12) Education rightly plays an important role in Unesco's activities. To a large extent, education is an  instrumental factor in solving all the global problems of mankind.
(26.13) If we are to achieve equality of economic potential among the various countries, we must, In the  first place, train qualified scientists, engineers and specialists in general. If we are to wean certain  countrirs from dependence on transnational mass media monopolies, we must train national personnel capable  of mastering the most complex technology. The main problem that now confronts mankind is the problem of  war and peace. Although we realize that the real causes of wars lie In a quite different direction, never-  theless education for peace and mutual understanding between peoples has a unique role to play in solving  this major problem.
(26.14) The authors of the aforementioned programmes recognize this very clearly, as evidenced by the  idea running like a leitmotif through all those chapters that education is essentially designed to build a new  society and to contribute to bringing about the corresponding socio-economic changes. The efforts to en-  hance the social significance and socially active role of education are conspicuous. The approach to the  solution of the problems that have been raised is also marked by greater efficiency, and evidence of this is  seen in the development of new methods and forms of activity.
(26.15) As usual, the programmes for Unesco's natural science activities have been very well prepared.  This is something that could not have been said in the past about the social science programmes, which  failed to make an effective response to the enhanced role of science in society. We therefore regard the  present three science programmes as a step forward. The principle of the interrelationship between the  social and natural sciences is very clearly formulated in them and this, of course, is as it should be.
(26.16) We can note with satisfaction that the major natural science projects carried out in the past (MAB,  the hydrological, geological correlation and oceanographic programmes) have fully justified themselves, and  their inclusion in the Second Draft Medium-Term Plan is thus fully justified. We wholeheartedly support the  inclusion of new major projects on computer technology, energy and biotechnology. However, we feel that  such projects should be prepared more thoroughly and in greater detail.
(26.17) The rapid development of science and techuology places added moral responsibility on scientific  workers. The fact is that some remarkable discoveries have been made that could be used against mankind  itself. This aspect of the whole problem, in our view, has not been given the attention it nerits and in that  respect the Draft is deficient. In general, the document we are considering has nothing to say about the  role and responsibility of scientists in efforts to avert a nuclear disaster and to strengthen peace.
(26.18) On the whole, Major Programme X is well prepared. However, given the importance of environ-  mental protection, the programme clearly requires more detailed elaboration. The Czechoslovak Socialist  Republic is one of the most industrialized countries in the world yet at the same time it is a country much  of whose territory is covered with forests. It therefore quite naturally attaches a great deal of importance  to the protection of forests from industrial pollution. The present Draft fails to deal with the problems of  protecting forests in the temperate zone and this, in our view, is one of its shortcomings.
(26.19) Unesco is playing an active part in tackling the problems of the mass media. Satisfactory progress  has been made in the past in this fleld. We ehould therefore place a very high value on the -declarations on  these matters adopted at the twentieth and twenty-first sessions of the General Conference of Unesco. How-  ever, we are only at the beginning of the road that will lead to the establishment of a new international  information order. The road will not be an easy one since the resistance of the transnational corporations,  their allies and defenders will have to be overcome. Despite a few shortcomings, Major Programme III on the  whole lays down correct guidelines for the activities of the Organization.
(26.20) The Second Draft Medium-Term Plan includes a major programme solely devoted to culture. This is  only natural since culture is an integral part of the day-to-day life of everyone on earth. The Organization  should, therefore, make unremitting efforts to democratize culture since the idea that it is the appanage of  a limited circle of people has to be done away with once and for all,
(26.21) The World Conference on Cultural Policies, held in July/August of this year in Mexico, again con-  firmed the importance of culture in the world today. It was a distinctive milestone in the history of Unesco.
1t is thus natural that the decisions taken by such an authoritative forum should be included in the Medium-  Term Plan as well as in Unesco's biennial programmes.
(26.22) The Czechoslovak delegation welcomes the fact that in his additional texts concerning the basic  C/4 document, the Director-General noted, in connection with the Medium-Term Plan, matters whose impor-  tance was stressed in the conclusions of that worl? conference.
(26.23) Our delegation supports Major Programmes XII and XIII of the Draft. We are convinced that Unesco  should take an active part in the process of eliminating such unquestionably shameful anachronisms as  racism and apartheid. The aggression against Lebanon, the unprecedented bloody reprisals conducted by  the aggressors in the Paiestinian camps in West Beirut, demonstrated yet again to the whole international  community the timeliness of including the struggle against genocide in that programme.
(26.24) Major Programme XII], which is a kind of recapitulation, correctly directs Unesco's activities to the  maintenance of peace as tho only possible alternative in the nuclear age. The programme ls well devised  with correct emphasis on the need to strengthen the defence of the rights of peoples. In our view, how-  ever, greater stress should be placed on combating the massive violations of human rights that can be seen  in various regions of the world.
(26.25) Mr President, ladias and gentlemen, during the thirty-six years of its existence, Unesco has won  for itself a position of great authority in the international community. Through its cally activities, it con-  ‘tributes to the development of international co-operation and towards the effective solution of problems  arising in Member States.
(26.26) At the present time, the peace-loving forces of the world are waging a resolute struggle against  the forces of reaction that are attempting to push the world into the abyss of nuclear disaster. When we  succeed in redching our final goal, i.e. securing a peaceful life for all members of the international com-  munity, the way will be clear for an unprecedented soaring of the human genius. Famine, poverty and fatal  diseases will be overcome and illiteracy eradicated.
(26.27) Allow me to express the hope that the achlevements of the fourth extraordinary session of the  General Conference of Unesco will contribute to the attainment of these noble ends and that the hopes that  the peoples of the whole world place in this forum will be realized. Thank you, Mr President.
(27) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Czechoslovakia and 1 give the floor to H.E. Mr Abdulai Alieu  Njai, Minister of Education and Head of the Delegation of Gambla.
28.1 Mr NJAI (Gambia):  Mr President, Mr Director-General, distinguished delegates, allow me to begin,  Mr President, by joining previous speakers in congratulating Mr Ivo Margan of Yugoslavia on  his well-deserved election as President of the fourth extraordinary session of the General Con-  ference of Unesco. 1 have no doubt that the high standard of skill and leadership which he dis-  played in Belgrade will be used again to guide and facilitate our deliberations here in Paris.
28.2 1 should also like to congratulate the Director-General on his brilliant exposition and the  painstaking manner in which he and his devoted and competent staff conducted the preparation  of the comprehensive, well-reasoned and very balanced document before us--document 4 XC/4.  The Gambian delegation is particularly impressed by the wide range of high-level consultations  which were undertaken du-ing the preparation of the thought-provoking document that is now  placed at our disposal for consideration and approval. The impressive quality of the Draft  Medium-Term Plan once again reflects the resourcefulness and intellectual competence of the  guiding spirit of Unesco, Mr M'Bow, and the unswerving support and confiderice he continues  to enjoy from all the constituent organs of Unesco.
28.3 Mr President, 1 shall make some brief remarks on specific programmes contained in the  Draft Medium-Term Plan. 1 would in particular wish to focus attention on how these programmes  can help to alleviate the socio-economic problems that continue to beset the overwhelming  majority of our people, and above all, to highlight the crucial role the international community  must play in attaining this objective.
28.4 In his analysis of world economic problems, the Director-General painted a pathetic but  accurate picture of the conditions prevailing in developing countries. Whilst the per capita  income in most developed countries is almost $11,000, in less developed countries it is approx-  imately $250, or forty-two times less. In his recent and most informative book, 'Where the  future begins', the Director-General reveals that there are over 814 million adult illiterates in  the world today and that over 125 million children of school-going age cannot attend primary  school. The picture in the least developed countries, including my own, is appalling.
28.5 1 would now draw the attention of the Conference to the specific programmes in docu-  ment 4 XC/4 which address these problems and to which my government accords top priority.  The first that immediately comes to mind is the need to combat illiteracy. The best-conceived  development plans of countries like mine will achieve little if high rates of illiteracy persist in  our countries. In agreeing with the Director-General that the formal and non-formal sectors  should be closely involved in our efforts to eradicate illiteracy and while assuring the Con-  ference that the Gambia is deeply committed to the democratization of education, 1 must point
11   out a major constraint that must be vigorously tackled by Unesco if our endeavours are to  achieve the desired results. The continued pursuit of the goal of universal primary education,  Mr President, in conformity with the relevant resolutions adopted by the United Nations and  Unesco, has resulted in an explosion in primary education which has created a host of new prob-  lems for countries like mine. The sudden realization of the importance of education and of the  material and other benefits it gives has induced many villagers in the Gambia to join together in  constructing modest schools and pay for them out of their meagre resources in response to the  President's call for self-reliance. When such schools are completed, requests are invariably  addressed to my government for assistance in the regular supply of teachers and teaching  materials.
28.6 This phenomenon, Mr President, has resulted in the appearance of a hydra-headed monster.  Firstly, it has led to an increase in the number of unqualified teachers who now account for
70 per cent of the teaching force in the primary sector, with all the attendant ill-effects on the  quality of the education we impart to our children. Secondly, it has led to the creation of a  bottleneck at the secondary-entrance stage on account of the inadequate number of secondary-  school places. Owing to financial constraints, there is no room for the majority of children who  finish primary schooling in our secondary schools, and their fate is a major source of concern  for my government, particularly because they are often ill-equipped for the world of work. To  prevent them from relapsing into illiteracy, my government is making every effort to absorb  these primary-school leavers in the non-formal sector. This imposes additional strain on the  non-formal sector, whose existing human financial and material resources are too meagre to  permit it to cope with these school-leavers as well as the adults who have never had any con-  tact with any type of formal education. We therefore have to sustain the new power of ex-  pression and communication of the newly literate through the supply of suitable reading mat-  erials, and this implies the establishment of low-cost production units and consequently the  need for tec’«nical assistance, the training of personnel and the acquisition of basic equipment.  Unless the: : requirements are met, the literacy drive of the developing countries will suffer  very serious setbacks.
28.7 1 must take this opportunity to acknowledge with gratitude the assitance we have received  from Unesco in the establishment of our Book Production and Material Resources Unit and would  earnestly request this Organization to provide additional assistance in the form of equipment  and training so that this very useful unit may expand sufficiently to cater for both the formal  and non-formal sectors. My government has been doing its utmost to meet the requirements of  the education sector as a whole. This sector currently absorbs the largest share of total govern-  ment recurrent expenditure, and an increased allocation of funds for education would jeopardise  activities or developments in other equally important sectors of the domestic economy.
28.8 The importance of science and technology in the development efforts of the developing  countries is very well highlighted in the Draft Plan. It would therefore be highly appreciated if  Unesco could assist in the production of low-cost science equipment relevant to the needs of our  children. Here 1 must mention the Gambian Government's full support for the programmes des-  cribed in paragraphs 5054-5057.
28.9 Paragraph 4016 of document 4 XC/4 refers to stimulating ‘the establishment of pre-service  and in-service training for teachers'. Mr President, the shortage of qualified teachers and the  explosion in the primary sector 1 mentioned earlier is no mystery to anyone. The in-service  training exercise for teachers that leads to qualification is of paramount importance to the  Gambia, and my government would wish to have the two subprogrammes in paragraph 4038  approved by the Conference.
28.10 Our primary-school curriculum has an integrated approach with a slight emphasis on  science, based on the environment, and the basic function of intellectual training is supple-  mented by actual participation in practical and productive activities. We would like to establish  a closer link in the secondary sector between education and work, and I consequently fully  support the programmes outlined in paragraphs 5064-5068.
28.11 Mr President, the President of the Republic of the Gambia is noted the world over for  his stand on human rights, and this was admirably shown by the events that occurred after  last year's abortive rebellion. It is therefore, to say the least of it, rather shocking that in the  last quarter of the twentieth century there should be so much flagrant disregard for the basic  and fundamental rights of people. My government gives its total support to the activities of  Unesco that are aimed at putting a stop to excesses against the human being and at helping  such people in their fight to rid themselves of oppression, racism, intolerance, prejudice and  apartheid.
28.12 Mr President, while three-quarters of the human race continues to suffer from poverty,  hunger and disease, it is indeed lamentable to observe that over US $500 billion are annually  spent on nuclear armaments by the nuclear powers, thus allowing the proverbial sword of
440   Damocles to hang over the entire human race. These powers must realize that nuclear weapons  are no respecters of non-aligned states or boundaries or ideological differences. The arms race  not only subjects mankind to a state of perpetual fear, there is also the frightening and catas-  tropic risk of its escalating to a nuclear war which will result in the total annihilation of  mankind and all that it has achieved.
28.13 1 wish, Mr President, to make a special appeal to the nuclear powers to halt the arms  rare and to utilize 1 per cent of their gross national product, as was demanded by the General  A.,sembly of the United Nations at the beginning of the first Development Decade, to improve  the lot of the developing countries. 1 further appeal to the developed countries to divert the  enormous resources which are currently being utilized to amass weapons of mass destruction, to  the alleviation of human suffering and misery. It is regrettable to note that a number of indus-  trialized countries have still not fulfilled the 1 per cent United Nations target for development  assistance.
28.14 Mr President, distinguished delegates, 1 would further urge the developed countries to  support the 4 per cent to 6 per cent growth rate that has been recommended by the Director-  General for very convincing reasons. The representatives of many of these countries have  already highlighted the ill-effects of the world recession. The developing countries are fully  aware of these, since they are the hardest hit by them. In spite of the problems created by the  recession however, it remains our conviction that the developed countries can still come to the  rescue of their less fortunate partners.
28.15 In conclusion, Mr President, 1 sincerely hope that this Conference session will be  remembered not only for the lofty resolutions it passes or the overwhelming support it accords  the brilliant Medium-Term Plan prepared by the Director-General and his able staff, but will  above all be remembered for the volume of resources mobilized from the international community  and the developed countries for the sole purpose of improving the socio-economic lot of the  developing countries. 1 thank you all.
(29) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Gambia and 1 give the floor to H.E. Mr Nissanka Wijeyratne,  Minister of Justice and Head of the Delegation of Sri Lanka.
30.1 Mr WIJERATNE (Sri Lanka):  Mr President, distinguished delegates, 1 bring to all of you here the warm greetings of  Sri Lanka and its peoples and its President, His Excellency J.R. Jayawardene, who has just  been re-elected by popular mandate to head the destinies of our country. May 1 take this oppor-  tunity of congratulating you, and also, through you, the President of the Conference, and of  adding to the flowers of congratulations with which he has been garlanded on his election to  guide over the destinies of this Conference. 1 am sure that in his hands the extraordinary  session now held in Paris will reach a successful conclusion. 1 am also happy to associate myself  with other speakers in commending the distinguished role played by the Director-General and  his staff in the masterly preparation and presentation of the Medium-Term Plan. I particularly  commend its pragmatic nature which recognizes the need for priorities in action and a proper  understanding of the resources which are available for their implementation. 1 hope that the  Director-General will exercise great flexibility in its implementation and that all of us here will  grant him latitude to deploy funds to those ongoing programmes which could thereby be helped  to early realization.
30.2 Mr President, 1 do not propose to dwell at length on various projects of concern to all of  us that come within the competence of the Organization. Their implementation has been marked  by various degrees of success in our respective countries. The reports of distinguished dele-  gates already submitted are most encouraging and we hope, in the future, to draw from the ex-  perience and achievements of other nations to enrich the programmes that we have commenced in  Sri Lanka.
30.3 To save time, Mr President, 1 take the liberty of omitting certain paragraphs of my  speech. They will, however, reach delegates in the copies that will be handed out in due  course.
30.4 The countries here present are in various stages of development. Thus the political and  economic context in which we each find ourselves--particularly the less advantaged countries--  not only have a validity that requires understanding and recognition but also render it im-  possible for us to adapt ourselves to what sometimes appears an imposed unity in programmes  quite often irrelevant in our own specific context. If in the field of culture an endogenous  character is recognized, then too, in the differing political and economic ecosystems, special  recognition is a desideratum not to be overlooked.
30.5 One of the happy features of the Medium-Term Plan now presented to us is its global  vision encompassing the entire world and its different systems and levels of development and  striving towards a realistic implementation of relevant programmes avoiding an emphasis on those  lines of emphasis that may reflect only particular groups of countries or special areas of the  world.
30.6 In all the varied fields of modern life which engage the attention of Unesco, Sri Lanka  has benefited considerably. In the field of expanding general education and of higher education  and technical education, and their orientation towards our particular needs in agriculture and  technology, in the training of teachers as well as the enriching of the total ‘ife of the com-  munity in the fields of continuing education and culture, in the safeguarding of the individual  through emphasis on human rights and the role of law and in developing the status of women,  Sri Lanka owes much to the guidance and assistance so readily afforded by Unesco.
30.7 There are, however, a few areas of activity in Sri Lanka in which we would like to share  the fruits of our experience with Member States. One such area is the state-inspired system of  facilities in the field of higher education. Here, within a shert period of three years, nearly 20  per cent of our students in the universities have been supported by a scheme of specially  funded scholarships provided by government corporations and leading private institutions. Such  supplementary funds are of special value to university students who enjoy, as all students do  in our country, the benefits of free education.
30,8 We are grateful to Unesco for the financial support it has given to Sri Lanka's recently  established Centre for Human Rights which, through its programmes for the dissemination of  information to the entire school-going population, helps towards the fuller exercise of such  rights.
30.9 Sri Lanka enjoys a cultural heritage of unique value and we place on record our tribute  to Unesco and, in particular, to the Director-General for selecting for development a broad area  in which the greater part of our ancient edifices lie. Proud as we are of the monuments of the  Cultural Triangle, we recognize the inspiration we derived in the past from our great neighbour  India in their construction, the foresight with which Britain redeemed its colonial rule in our  country by preserving them, and now the debt we owe to the world community for assisting in  their restoration. We do not claim this heritage exclusively for ourselves. As citizens of the  world, we invite all countries to share in enjoyment of their beauties and interpretation of their  significance.
30.10 Mr President, 1 would like to take this opportunity to comment on Programme X.7,  'Urban systems and urbanization'. The 37th session of the United Nations General Assembly is  considering a resolution to proclaim the year 1987 as the International Year of Shelter for the  Homeless as a result of the initative taken by the Prime Minister of my country at the 35th  session of the United Nations General Assembly. This International Year could be the focal point  for the programme of action envisaged in the Medium-Term Plan in the field of urban systems  and urbanization, and 1 wish to draw your attention to operative paragraph 8 of the UNGA resol-  ution which invites organs, organizations and bodies of the United Nations systems to make  special efforts through existing and new programmes during the period 1983-1987 to help  achieve the objectives and goals of the International Year. Sri Lanka is confident that Unesco  will take cognizance of the proclamation of the International Year of Shelter for the Homeless for  appropriate action in this connection.
30.11 Mr President, we are fully aware of the strength of Unesco's contribution in this im-  perfect world. We realize that Unesco's dreams can only be fulfilled if all that is said here in all  its wide ramifications car be realized in our own lands. Otherwise, all our deliberations will  remain but pious hopes and empty words. Thus we pledge our fullest respect for Unesco's con-  clusions and our most strenuous efforts to ensure their implementation.
30.12 In doing so, we draw sustenance from the fact that a golden thread runs through the  entire fabric of the decisions reached here, reflecting as they do the eternal ethical values with  which the great religious leaders of mankind sought to inspire their followers. Sri Lanka is a  plural society where Hinduism and Buddhism, Christianity and Islam are recognized and res-  pected. Individual races with their own particularities and sometimes differing viewpoints co-  exist in what we consciously endeavour to ensure is an ever-replenished crucible of concord.
30.13 It is this ideal that encourages me to mention, not in a spirit of criticism but with  sorrow, the sufferings that the exclusiveness of an illogical apartheid imposes on fellow human  beings in South Africa and the unrepentent aggressions that have rendered thousands homeless  in other parts of the world, particularly in West Asia. It is a tragedy that a new 'Diaspora'  besmirches the world as a result of the unfeeling cruelties of power politics and racial agran-  dissement, Must mankind await once again a Darius the Great if only to restore the sacred  shrines and cultural centres of suppressed peoples?
30.14 Mr President, every day, as I come to these meetings, 1 pass the church built in honour  of St. Jean Baptiste de la Salle, and 1 am reminded of his vision when, for ‘he first time in the  modern world, he commenced instruction through formal classes tc widen the horizons of little  children and to give them a new vision of human association. Again, as 1 enter the gardens of  Unesco and see the statue of the Angel retrieved from the holocaust of Nagasaki, 1 wonder  whether civilized life is advancing or retreating.
30.15 The vast sums of money daily expended on the alters of Molloch and Mammon, the images  of debasement, the infinite variety of war toys that surround our children and the encroach-  ments on the values of human life all over the world imperatively call for our united and total  efforts to rectify them. That is why we of Sri Lanka, like all of you, are proud to belong to  this august body that also serves as the continuing conscience of mankind. Thank you.
(31) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Sri Lanka and I give the floor to H.E. Bishop Austin Tlelase,  Minister of Education, Culture and Sport and Head of the Delegation of Lesotho.
32.1 The Reverend Austin TLELASE (Lesotho):  Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, we would also like to add our voice to those which  have already been raised in praise of Mr Ivo Margan, the President of this august body, in  praise of Mr Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow as the Director-General of our auspicious organization, in  praise of the Chairman of the Executive Board and, indeed, in praise of the many men and  women who have worked hard to make this fourth extraordinary session of the General Con-  ference the success it is.
32.2 Mr President, Unesco has played an important role in the process whereby newly indepen-  dent African states have formulated regional and national policies in the fields of education,  science, culture and communication. The Unesco/OAU sponsorship of the historic continental con-  ferences of ministers held to reflect upon major issues in education, and the adoption of resol-  utions concerning strategies for coping with those issues, have had an important bearing on the  development of national education systems. The Lagos Conference of Ministers of Education in  Africa in 1976, in which the role of non-formal education was clearly articulated, and the objec-  tives of universal primary education clarified, continues to provide an important analytical  framework and guidance for Africa.
32.3 This example of reflection, analysis, dialogue and policy resolutions has inevitably  stimulated a more careful and thorough scrutiny of education systems and policies within each  nation. Following the Lagos Conference, and in recognition of the need to review its education  system, Lesotho convened a series of public hearings throughout the country. This culminated  in a national seminar, in which the views of all members of the society concerning the education  system were considered. Following this national dialogue, the government established an Edu-  cation Sector Survey Task Force to formulate policies, programmes and priorities. Throughout  these deliberations, the general guidelines established as a result of Unesco-sponsored regional  conferences, as well as the Organization's direct support, have been very helpful.
32.4 Mr President, the Draft Medium-Term Plan for 1984-1989 has the full approval of the  Government of Lesotho. The conceptualization of the plan, its strategies, objectives and pro-  grammes reflect consistently the global and specific concerns of Member States in Unesco's fields  of competence. Lesotho wishes to express its deep appreciation and thanks to the Director-  General and his staff for the work they have done.
32.5 Unesco's activities in education, culture and communication, as well as in the natural and  social sciences, cover wide areas and converge on the issues of world peace, human rights and  the promotion and deployment of knowledge for social and economic development. To this  immense task, document 4 XC/4 has addressed itself comprehensively in concept, in content and  in scope. Furthermore, the Draft Plan identifies a priority area for Unesco geared to ‘the  development and renewal of primary education and [the promotion of] the total elimination of  illiteracy'. Considering that the illiteracy rate of the world adult population runs as high as
60 per cent in Africa, 37 per cent in Asia and 20 per cent in Latin America, the high priority  accorded to the struggle for literacy is commendable. Lesotho also finds in the Draft Plar a  renewed emphasis on the contributions of education to the fields of culture, communication and  economic development, on world problems and future-oriented studies and on respect for human  rights and elimination of discrimination based on sex.
32.6 The conditions prevailing in Lesotho, its problems, endeavours and aspirations all find an  echo in the document before us; and, in considering it, my delegation wishes to highlight our  national experience in education in relation to the objectives and programmes which it embodies.
32.7 Mr President, we believe that education occupies a key position in the context of devel-  opment. Our government allocates the highest share of the recurrent budget to education, and  this has amounted in recent years to between 20 and 25 per cent. In terms of gross national  income, the percentage allotted to state expenditure on education was an estimated 6 per cent in
1980. Enrolment in primary schools has increased from 183,000 in 1970 to 245,000 in 1980, and  is thus growing at an average rate of 2.9 per cent per year. Thus, in 1980, the primary-school  population, which included about 30 per cent of over-age pupils, amounted to approximately
105 per cent of the primary school-age population. More specifically, of the school-age  population of the country, 69 per cent were enrolled in primary school while 31 per cent did  not attend school. In addition, the drop-out rate is very high, since out of 1,000 pupils  enrolled in standard 1, only about 600 may be expected to complete standard 4, and about 370  to complete the full cycle of primary education. To a significant extent, the problem of wastage  in higher primary education is due to the existence of a number of incomplete primary schools,  the upgrading of which is an important task facing the government.
32,8 According to the latest population census, the literacy rate of adults over the age of 14  was 52 per cent in 1976. This was almost entirely due to the formal education system. A peculiar  feature of the problem of illiteracy in Lesotho is its greater incidence among men compared to  women. In 1976, about 61 per cent of the adult males were illiterate in contrast to 37 per cent  of females. The disparity is due to the practice of using boys for livestock hearding and to  employment possibilities in South Africa, particularly in the mines, as migrant labour. To inten-  sify the struggle against illiteracy, the efforts of non-formal education, which at present cover  only a small proportion of the adult population, need to be greatly enhanced. The Government  of Lesotho finds renewed inspiration from the emphasis placed in the Draft Medium-Term Plan on  the eradication of illiteracy. We support wholeheartedly the principle that 'literacy education for  adults and the provision of schooling for children must be seen as two sides of the same coin  and must be tackled simultaneously'. It is one of the failures of traditional education that it  teaches the children while keeping the parents in ignorance, with untold consequences of social  imbalance. Thus we find the envisaged programme of assistance in this field to be highly rele-  vant to our country.
32.9 Mr President, in Lesotho education is the concern of each home, of each village and of  the entie nation. Our government, recognizing that the normal channels through which the  people could express their views on education were inadequate, launched a National Education  Dialogue in 1978, 'Pitsos' (public meetings) were held across the breadth and length of the  country in rural areas, villages and towns, and the people were active participants. The dia-  logue was multifaceted, among the people themselves and at the same time between the govern-  ment and the people. All sides learned from this exercise, but most of all the government. As a  sequel to this dialogue, the government initiated an Educational Sector Survey which bas been  carried out locally with assistance from Unesco. When it is completed, we intend to take our  findings and policy guidelines back to the grass-roots, where niost of the inspiration initially  arose. The experience of the dialogue followed by a sector review has thus proved most useful  to us.
32.10 Mr President, in recent years there has been a growing awareness among decision-  makers and educators in Lesotho of the need to enhance the contribution of education to  national development, especially in the economic field. Experience of primary education curri-  culum development, curriculum diversification in secondary education to include practical sub-  jects, and the expansion of vocational training in formal and non-formal education has, through  the years, strengthened the belief that education should make a greater contribution to the  development of the country. During the national education dialogue of 1978, the need to link  education and productive work was a powerful theme expressed by the people. Hence, a new  concern has emerged in the education of Lesotho. At the same time, the trends of the immediate  past in the economic growth of the country, and the likely projections into the future, underpin  the need to harness our human resources to satisfy the basic needs of our population whilst  simultaneousiy forging a motor for sustained economic growth. The objective of self-sufficiency  in food and basic commodities, and the expansion of essential services in the rural areas in  particular, are becoming increasingly imperative. This raises the question of linking education  and productive work. Therefore today in Lesotho the perspective of the educator and the econo-  mist have merged in the theme of integration of education and economic development.
32.11 The Draft Medium-Term Plan elaborates in a comprehensive and satisfactory manner on  the contributions of education to national development in the realms of economics and culture,  as well as communication. We find the connection between education and the world of work at  once complex and crucial. We thus welcome the programme for the 'promotion of interaction be-  tween education and productive work'. In Lesotho, the single most important concern in terms  of productive work is perforce rural development, for it is in the rural areas that most of the  people live and will continue to live in the foreseeable future. It has therefore become essential  to investigate how primary education can respond to the need for uplifting the conditions of life  in rural areas. The teaching of agriculture and crafts in the schools, with due regard to the  various ecological regions of the country, is of paramount importarce. However, the matter is  not that simple. As pointed out in document 4 XC/4, a division between 'urban education' and  'rural education' is clearly not the answer. The problem is how to provide on a nationwide scale
444   a rommon general education which is at the same time informed by the specific environments of  the different parts of the country. Our experience with school gardens, for instance, has con-  vinced us of the need to think afresh about the teaching of agriculture. We utilize school  gardens for the demonstration of the benefits of improved agricultural practices, so as to guide  positively the attitudes of children towards agriculture. This could be an important long-term  investment in agricultural development. But the demands made by this approach on the design  of syllabi and on teacher training cannot be underestimated.
32.12 Mr President, the contribution of education to the development of the modern sector of  the economy is also important. Modern progress requires a favourable attitude towards the appli-  cation of science in different aspects of life of society. The Draft Plan before us considers  correctly that it is the task of education 'to foster awareness among young people and adulte of  the interrelationships between science, technology and society'. In our education system,  science teaching hac been a major problem. Indeed, the first Five-Year Development Plan (1970-
1,74) expressed as its main concern in the field of education the objective:  "To gear the education system to the requirements of manpower for economic growth by  lessening the academic bias of the system, and by putting more emphasis on the teaching  of mathematics and science. This involves the qualitative improvement of secondary as  compared with primary education’.
32.13 Since the mid-1970s, we have operated different programmes, the main function of which  has been to upgrade final-year students of primary schools. While it has been necessary to  have recourse to such remedial activities as a temporary measure, we are painfully aware of the  need to improve substantially the teaching of science in our school system. Hence it is  gratifying to note that document 4 XC/4 contains a programme for 'development of school and  out-of-school teaching of science and technology'. The envisaged exchange of information among  developing conntries and the strengthening of international co-operation are essential, and of  great relevance to Lesotho. Equally, we consider the programme for the 'dissemination of scien-  tific and technological knowledge' both important in itself and a necessary component of the  overall programme for the teaching of science and technology.
32.14 Mr President, the theme of education and the world of work brings non-formal education  into greater focus, as it can be used to impart directly skills that are required at the work-  places, which are themselves in turn reinforced through practice. In the development of the  modern sector of the economy, on-the-job and in-service training can play a significant role  through the improvement of productivity. At the same time, the provision of such training faci-  lities for young people and adults constitutes an important dimension in lifelong education.  Several programmes have been undertaken in Lesotho to provide in-service training. Whilst  there is a need to expand training, our Education Sector Survey has revealed a mismatch be-  tween training programmes and the skill requirement in economy. Overall, the non-formal edu-  cation activities tended to be oriented towards white-collar jobs rather than blue-collar jobs. It  is thus intended to switch emphasis towards the training of blue-collars, especially at the  supervisory level, since it is felt that on this depends the realization of the great and hitherto  untapped potential of on-the-job training of unskilled and semi-skilled workers. In short, we  believe that a good supervisor in the factories, at the work sites, in the workshops, in the  hotels and supermarkets is a good trainer. To guide and broadly co-ordiante vocational training  in school and out of school, it is intended to establish a Vocational Training Board which coin-  cides with one of the programmes of Unesco that aims to 'foster the development of national  infrastructures for technical and vocational education’.
32.15 Mr President, let me now turn to the theme of education, culture and communication. To  provide the basis for the endogenous and harmonious development of a country, the contri-  bution of education should also be harnessed in the fields of culture, communication, environ-  ment and population. Unesco's efforts to promote better global structures of economics and com-  munication, and its activities in the Man and the Biosphere programmes, are endeavours to estab-  lish equitable and harmonious world structures for the benefit of mankind as a whole. Such  global frameworks would facilitate significantly the attainment of endogenous harmonious devel-  opment in the Third World countries. In this general context, we support the programmes on  communication, culture and the human environment, and on terrestrial and marine resources.  Regarding the interrelations between education and culture, which can serve to enrich education  when the latter is situated in a national social context and to renew culture when this is  invigorated with knowledge and values relevant to society's needs, the programme on 'edu-  cation, culture and languages of instruction' is found by my delegation to be appropriate. All  too often--and Lesotho is no exception--education in the developing countries has estranged  young people from their cultural heritage. Thus, the imparting of knowledge and appreciation of  cultural heritage in the schools is essential. Non-formal education could play a positive role in  the socialization of children through story books and could help to bridge the generation gap  through the instruction of adults.
32.16 The interaction between education and communication is another important field closely  related to the theme of education and culture. The dilemma is succinctly put in the Draft Plan  when it states: 'Man today is caught in a dense web of messages and data of all kinds and of  varied origins which he cannot always control’. In the case of developing countries, the mes-
11   sages and signals of international origin could have the cumulative effect of generating cultural  superficiality, The danger that the communication media may have 'unfavourable cognitive or  ethical effects upon children or =ven upon adults' is rightly the concern of educators. At the  same time, the potential of the communication media where education is concerned should be  expanded and utilized. In Lesotho, the Ministry of Education conducts various programmes over  the national radio and hopes to expand these activities in the future. In general, we find the  programme on 'education and communication' to be relevant to our situation.
32.17 Mr President, the interaction between man and nature has increasingly brought into  focus the need to ensure balance between development and the human environment. Calling for  both national and international efforts, this is a complex and, in some aspects, urgent issue  which, we believe, the proposed programme on the human environment and terrestrial and  marine resources has dealt with comprehensively and in an interdisciplinary manner, from the  double standpoint of the conservation of resources and the protection of the environment. We  find the design of the programme which links research, training, and the dissemination of infor-  mation to be appropriate. The principle of including general environmental education in the  curriculum is appealing for Lesotho, which is faced with a severe problem of soil erosion and  has limited known natural resources that have to be used optimally. The discovery and appro-  priate use of natural resources constitute an important aspect of development which will benefit  from the programme on 'the earth's crust and its mineral and energy resources'. Lesotho's prob-  lem of drought which hampers its agricultural development is covered in the programme con-  cerned with 'better assessment of natural hazards and their prediction'. Regarding water re-  sources, the objective of stimulating 'participation by the populations concerned in the con-  servation and development of water resources', together with research and training, is relevant  to the conditions of our country. It is the other side of the need to improve the drought predic-  tion capability. Furthermore, Mr President, we are embarking on a fairly large-scale multi-  purpose water development project to be completed towards the end of the decade. Lastly, we  wish to state that we wholeheartedly support Unesco's planned contribution through the inter-  governmental programme on Man and the Biosphere.
32.18 Mr President, Lesotho lauds the efforts of Unesco in the struggle against apartheid,  racism and prejudice, and notes with deep satisfaction the proposed programmes. The problems  of racism and those associated with minority groups, migrant workers and ethnicity require  clarity of understanding and firm action. Thus, we support the programme for studies and re-  search encompassing both theory and practice, as well as the programme for action aimed at mobi-  lizing education, communication and culture to counter prejudice, intolerance and racism. On  ‘the struggle against apartheid', to which Lesotho is committed on a daily basis, we find the  programme coherent and energetic.
32.19 Mr President, whilst endorsing the whole of the Draft Medium-Term Plan, we have pri-  marily focused our attention on education. At our stage of development, education is clearly of  immense importance, and hence our focus on this sector. None the less, as we struggle to in-  crease our command over our national destiny, the need to acquire a clearer perception of our  own process of development in its national and international context has become increasingly  crucial. Hence we note with particular satisfaction the Major Programme on 'Principles, methods  and strategies of action for development'. The envisaged activities of the Draft Medium-Term  Plan concerning the clarification of development processes and co-operation with Member States  in this endeavour, as well as in the implementation of projects, answer an increasingly impor-  tant need of Lesotho.
32.20 Thank you, Mr President.  (Mr Margan took the chair)
33. The PRESIDENT:
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Lesotho. I give the floor to H.E. Mr Abdilgasim  Salad Hassan, Minister of Culture and Higher Education, Head of the Delegation of Somalia.
34.1 Mr HASSAN (Somalia):  Mr President, Mr Director-General, Your Excellencies, distinguished fellow delegates,  ladies and gentlemen, 1 consider it a great privilege and an honour to have the opportunity of  addressing this august assembly of the General Conference of Unesco. On behalf of my dele-  gation and on my own behalf 1 should like, first of all, to express my sincere congratulations to  you, Mr President, on your re-election as President of the General Conference. My delegation is  confident that, with the co-operation of all of us present here, you will guide this important  session to a successful conclusion.
34,2 My delegation highly appreciates the great intellectual effort that has gone into the pre-  paration of the Draft Medium-Term Plan. We attach great significance to its clarity of pre-  sentation, depth of analysis and formulation of action-oriented programmes geared towards the  solution of the major world problems within Unesco's fields of competence. We are aware of the  fact that individual Member States may vary in their reactions to different parts of the Draft  Plan. But, taken as a whole, few would disagree that this document meets the guidelines set by
21 C/Resolution 100 which was adopted by the General Conference in Belgrade in 1980. It is in  the light of this that we give our full support to the Draft Medium-Term Plan for 1984-1989.
34.3 The world problems as identified and discussed in the First Part of the Draft Plan are  broadly based and concern major problems of the developing countries and the role Unesco can  play within its sphere in finding solutions to these problems. To build up a global climate of  opinion conducive to international peace, co-operation and progress, the development of any one  society must be conceived as complementary to the development of all societies. The constant  fears, doubts, frictions and confrontations between nations and peoples and the widening econo-  mic and technological gap between the developing and the developed countries all spring, in our  view, from incompatibilities in our development programmes and policies, We can therefore no  longer afford to act on the basis of totally independent and conflicting national interests. It is  in this light that we attach considerable importance to Major Programme 1 'Reflection on world  problems and future-oriented studies’.
34.4 In making a general assessment of the thirteen major programmes included in the draft  Medium-Term Plan, it is pertinent to draw attention to the close relevance of the content of  these programmes to the development strategies of the developing countries. Taking Somalia as  an example, the relevance of major programmes is more than apparent.
34,5 Since the revolution of 21 October 1969, we in the Somalia Democratic Republic have  realized that our hopes for development and survival are linked with our success in stimulating  indigenous science and technology. In that belief, we have embarked on ambitious programmes  aimed at enhancing science and technology. The first national university was established in
1969; it now has twelve faculties, six of which concern science and technology. During the same  period, we established applied research institutions for medicine, agriculture, marine resources  and animal husbandry. The Somali National Academy of Culture was recently changed into the  National Academy of Sciences, Arts and Literature, with drastic changes in its functions and  organization. We have established postgraduate programmes in the basic and applied sciences at  the university.
34.6 As regards the content of education, the view that education should be rooted in the  national culture accords with our national development programme and philosophy. The demo-  cratization of education and the emphasis placed on adult education, on the promotion of tech-  nical and vocational education, on the struggle against illiteracy, on integrated rural devel-  opment and on the status of women and their participation in development all enjoy our support  and appreciation,
34.7 Our delegation appreciates and is following with keen interest the attention paid to the  significant role of the information media in present-day society. In the area of communication,  we are happy to note the constructive and unanimous proposals put forward for the  establishment of a free, just and balanced new international information order. We are looking  forward eagerly to the translation of these proposals into practical action for the benefit of all.
34.8 We support Unesco's approach to cultural development. We are convinced that international  understanding and co-operation are based on mutual and reciprocal respect for and appreciation  of both the diversities and the parallels to be found in human cultures and civilizations.
34.9 In conclusion, I should like to express once more our full support for the programmes pro-  posed in the Draft Medium-Term Plan. For we believe that Unesco has contributed and can con-  tribute more to the solution of the central and overwhelming problems of development in the  areas of education, science and culture. But Unesco can only fulfil its role and make its  maximum contribution if it receives the generous moral and material support of its Member  States. Thank you for your attention.
35. The PRESIDENT:
1 thank the Head of Delegation of Somalia. I give the floor to H.E. Canon Siphethe  Dlamini, Minister of Education, Head of the Delegation of Swaziland.
36.1 Canon DLAMINI (Swaziland):  Mr President, Mr Director-General, Ministers, Your Excellencies, ladies and gentlemen, 1  should like to offer you, Mr Margan, my heartfelt congratulations on your election as President  of this important General Conference which will approve Unesco's Medium-Term Plan for the  period 1984-1989. 1 am also pleased that we are renewing an acquaintance first made in your  beautiful city of Belgrade during the twenty-first session of the General Conference. It is my  hope that you will continue to play a useful role in promoting peace and justice through your  continued service to the world and your beautiful country, Yugoslavia.
36.2 Mr President, 1 should first like to thank the Director-General and his colleagues for the  excellent preparations they have made for this Conference. I wish to place on record that my  small country fully appreciates the consultations that preceded the drafting of the Medium-Term  Plan. What pleased us most was the observance of the principle of the equality of the Member  States of Unesco when, in August 1981, the Director-General visited our country despite the  size of its population.
36.3 My delegation fully supports all recommendations and statements in the second chapter of  the Draft Medium-Term Plan, 'Education for all'. 1 would like to bear testimony to the fact that
11   Swaziland during the decade 1970-1980 has made enviable progress by making formal education  more widely available to its young people. Equality of educational opportunity has been assured  for various population groups. At primary school level, 54 per cent of the enrolments are girls.  In addition, special education has begun to receive a reasonable share of the national cake. In  the past three years, enrolments in schools for the blind, deaf and dumb as well as vocational  training for the handicapped have increased. It is our hope that Unesco will continue to sup-  por: such programmes by providing expertise until such time as we have locally trained  manpower.
36.4 We in Swaziland have realized that access to schooling or education is not enough. There  is a need to improve the quality of education as well. Improvement in the quality of education  implies that there should be equal opportunities for all by providing an education that will cater  for various talents and age-groups. In this regard, it follows that not only academic education  should be emphasized but that pre-vocational, vocational and technical training and programmes  should be part and parcel of our school system. In this regard, despite our limited resources,  we in Swaziland are diversifying our curriculum from the fifth grade of primary education  through high school to tertiary education. We are revising our methods and programmes at all  levels of our educational institutions, We feel encouraged indeed to realize that at international  level our endeavours are supported. Our programmes are so arranged that there is a reasonable  amount of flexibility, thereby enabling transfers between programmes to take place and giving  each individual the opportunity to receive education in accordance with his/her needs and  innate potential and abilities. Our programmes are being arranged within a framework of lifelong  education. Formal and non-formal education are part and parcel of our education structure. We  hope Unesco will continue to support our distance and adult literacy programmes.
36.5 My delegation, Mr President, supports the Director-General's proposals in 4 XC/4,  Annex 111 dealing in particular with the following issues: maintenance of peace and international  understanding (Programme Xl1I1,1); respect for human rights (X111.2); education for peace and  respect for human rights and the rights of peoples (X111.3); elimination of discrimination based  on sex (X111.4). As a peace-loving country, Swaziland urges Unesco to continue the search for  promoting better international understanding in a world torn by perpetual strife. In general,  therefore, Mr President, we support the Draft Medium-Term Plan and urge Member States to  accept the associated recommendations and proposals.
36.6 My delegation greatly appreciates the opportunity to participate in this session. Thank  you.
37. The PRESIDENT:
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Swaziland. 1 give the floor to H.E. Mrs Salome  Castellanos Delgado, Permanent Delegate to Unesco, Head of the Delegation of Honduras.
(38.1) Mrs CASTELLANOS DELGADO (Honduras) (Translation from the Spanish):  Mr President, Mr Director-General. Mr Chairman of the Executive Board, distinguished ministers and  heads of delegations, ladies and gentlemen, attending this fourth extraordinary session of the General Con-  ference «nd helping to decide what form Unesco's future action should take represents for the Republic of  Honduras a binding commitment which we are endeavouring with the keenest interest to fulfil. My delegation  is very pleased, Mr President, that you are in charge of our proceedings and considers this an excellent  opportunity to say how much we appreclate the energy and talent invested by the Director-General in  Unesco, in furthering its alms and in enhancing its standing in the world today, a world which badly needs  men and women who are willing to serve as he does our Organization, We should also like to pay tribute to  the Chairman of the Executive Board, H.E. Mr Victor Massuh, who carries out his functions with great  skill.
(38.2) We are met here together because of the importance we attach to the policies to be adopted by  Unesco in its flelds of competence for the next six years through a plan designed to strengthen and renew  the objectives of the past, the present and of all time in the light of the goals assigned to the Organization  by its Constitution and in a manner consonant with the demands of the present and the immediate future.
(38.3) The policy guidelines contained in the Draft Second Medium-Term Plan have been submitted to  various bodies: after consulting our governments, the Unesco Secretariat prepared this document, which  was ther placed before the Fxecutive Board for its consideration; at the same time, it was also submitted to  the competent authorities in each Member State. We are all aware, Mr President, of the terms of reference  with which the Unesco Secretariat was called upon to comply in drawing up the Second Medium-Term Plan so  as to serve as a basis for concentrating future programmes.
(38.4) We have come to this General Conference to express on behalf of our respective government our  views concerning the Draft Medium-Term Plan, A reading of the Foreword d the description of world  problems was sufficient to show that those responsible for drawing up the Pian were concerned to adopt a  coherent, rational and indeed sensitive approach in planning the objectives and guidelines which, it is  hoped, will serve to .dvance the causes for which Unesco was created.
(38.5) The desire of the delegation of Honduras in taking the floor at this plenary was to state, as briefly  as possible, why we are ready to support this Second Plan produced by our Organization. We feel it appro-  priate for this purpose to follow an approach based on the conviction held by my delegation that any action  by Unesco that helps to alleviate the world's needs in respect of education, science, culture and com-  munication deserves our encouragement.
(38.6) We know that Unesco, like the international community as a whole, finds itself in a situation of  conflict, in which efforts in the political, legal and technical fields to promote conciliation and harmony in  the world and among men are frustrated by divergent viewpoints. In a word, Unesco belongs to a world in  which it is still true to say that what is right for some is arbitrary in the view of others, in which the  strength of some is based on the weakness of others, in which the power of some implies the defenceless-  ness of others.
(38.7) In the midst of this conflict, it is Unesco's duty to pursie an exemplary task of global education  that sets before mankind a scheme for living together, under which men would share objectively valid con-  ceptions of the good and the beautiful and would resist the temptation to recreate the world arbitrarily in  accordance with divergent standards of conduct that embody neither truth nor faslehood because everything  depends on the colour of the spectacles one happens to be wearing. Unesco thus finds its role enhanced at  the present time because of the apparent challenge to its ethical and moral function.
(38.8) Since the establishment of Unesco, the whole world ha“ felt the impact in one way or another of  what has been achieved in its fields of competence. The sciences and the arts found in Unesco a forum and  a home, a laboratory and a forge, a banner and a victory, because Unesco came into being as a result of  reflection on the cauces of war and was created in order to help bring about peace.
(38.9) Unesco must continue to engage in an effort of reflection, so that it can go on fulfilling its  constructive functions. We therefore support the principles set forth in Major Programme 1 of the Second  Medium-Term Plan. As a body that attaches due importance to intellectual inquiry, Unesco functions within  its fields of competence as a generator for the plannirg and programming activities required in the fields of  education, science, culture and communication, thereby ministering to mankind's intellectual ngeds and  spiritual requirements, which while they do not represent man's sole aspiration remain his loftiest one.
(38.10) Having assigned certain tasks to Unesco in its Constitution, we have to ensure that it is provided  with the resources it needs to produce the results of which it is intrinsically capable. My delegation con-  siders that this requirement is conceptually met in the Draft Second Medium-Term Plan, which lays down  principles of action that commit Unesco to pursuing the tasks it has begun: such as providing literacy edu-  cation and schooling for everybody throughout the world; making science an agent of harmony between  nature, man and society; carrying its ideas in the sphere of culture further and putting them into practice,  since culture is the key to the essential well-being of mankind; and opening up those secret and sinister  caverns in whose shadows lurk the emotions which divide, separate and foment antagonism among human  beings, which stifle communication and ultimately lead to isolation, turning the world into a place inhabited  by solitary, anguished and hostile beings.
(38.11) Mr President, the Second Medium-Term Plan reaffirms and lends new emphasis to Jnesco's long-  standing prioritiec. In examining this document, the present extraordinary session of the General Con-  ference will find that it …:mbodies each and every one of these priorities. Obviously, circumstances do not  allow me to mention all of them and so 1 shall have to confine my remarks to just a few,
(38.12) Therc exists a major project whose principles and objectives were established by the governments  of the region to which I belong. The Government of Honduras attaches and will continue to attach cardinal  importance to the problem of illiteracy, since despite all the efforts that have already been made it still  constitutes an obstacle to our development. Inasmuch as this major project involves a special drive to make  the population of Latin America fully literate by the end of this century, we support Unesco's preparations  for putting it into practice, trusting that its impact will be felt in our own country.
(38.13) Following the World Conference on Cultural Policies, Honduras awaits with great interest Unesco's  future activities with regard to the protection and restoration of the cultural heritage. These activities  continue to be of importance to my country because of their connection with the assertion of the funda-  mental identity of the Honduran people.
(38.14) My delegation was very interested in the proposals concerning women in the Medium-Term Plan. We  see these proposals as a contribution to coming to terms with a set of problems which call for urgent  examination and remedial action on the basis of a balanced view of women's potential and their role in  society.
(38.15) Unesco can make a significant contribution to modifying behaviour based on discriminatory attitudes  to women. One cannot make a triang™ with only two sides, and yet many societies persist in depriving  women of their proper place in the a.tive process of economic, political and cultural development. Unesco  can do an enormous amount to help redress situations which, if left unchanged, will become yet another  source of tension in the world. In promoting the full and appropriate involvement of women in educational,  scientific, cultural and communication activities, Unesco is taking firm steps towards the establishment of  social cohesion and harmony in a world in which every living being aspires to make a distinctive  contribution.
(38.16) Finally, Mr President, 1 should like to take advantage of my presence before this international  forum to point out that Honduras is a political and social democracy whose institutions function with the  support of the Honduran people. In the current phase of the history of the Central American region,  Honduras is playing an active part in the work of the international community, basing its approach on res-  pect for the principles governing the relations between countries, and is motivated in both its domestic and  foreign policies by a sincere and deep desire for peace and co-operation. My delegation would like once  again to express the hope that this extraordinary session of the General Conference will discharge its tasks  in a spirit of mutual understanding and common determination by all the Member Staics of Unesco to con-  tinue the struggle for peace and justice. Thank you.
39. The PRESIDENT:
1 thank the Head of the Delegation of Honduras. 1 give the floor to Mr Neo Mnumzana,  representative of the African National Congress (ANC).
40.1 Mr MNUMZANA (African National Congress): :  Mr President, Your Excellencies, distinguished delegates, ladies and gentlemen, on behalf  of the African National Congress and the oppressed and struggling people of South Africa, I  wish to convey to you all the warmest of greetings. 1 wish to express our sincerest congra-  tulations to you, Mr President, on your re-election to your high office. 1 believe your re-  election is the greatest vote of confidence in your proven abilities and in you as a person. I  should also like to congratulate Mr M'Bow on the exemplary manner in which he has led Unesco  since his appointment as Director-General.
40,2 1 also wish to thank all previous speakers who in different ways have re-emphasized the  urgent need not only to eradicate apartheid but also to mobilize even greater support for the  struggle of the people of South Africa to wipe out this crime against humanity and to win their  national liberation, to construct a free, united, non-racial an . democratic South Africa in accor-  dance with the Freedom Charter.
40.3 It seems highly anomalous that even in a forum such as Unesco, a forum committed to the  struggle to uphold the highest, the most noble human ideals, there should be parties who,  while paying lip service to the condemnation of apartheid, nevertheless do all they can to pre-  vent effective action against apartheid. To be sure, these parties constitute a minority in the  family of mankind. However, they cannot be ignored for they are an inordinately powerful  minority. 1 am referring to those parties who are aligned to a certain very prominent Western  Power whose leader, in what must be either a blatant falsification of history or a lack of suffi-  cient knowledge, has had the courage recently to assert that apartheid South Africa cannot be  abandoned because it was a war-time ally.
40.4 Perhaps we need to be reminded that the priesthood of apartheid, its most ardent practi-  tioners, actually aligned themselves with Nazism and did all they could to subvert South  African's genuine contribution to the Allied effort against Hitler's Germany. Thanks to this same  priesthood of apartheid, the overwhelming majority--the black people of South Africa--have been  reduced to the status of slaves and foreigners in their own motherland. On an average, 50 per  cent of the black working-age population is permanently unemployed. Only a tiny minority of  their children are able to go to school, and it must be stressed that the education they receive  is calculated to make them sufficiently literate to follow instructions at work, and in every other  way to discourage the frce development of their personalities. Consistent with apartheid's belief  that blacks are not human being but units of actual or potential labour whose price must be  kept as low as possible in order to guarantee the highest possible profits, the racist regime  spends next to nothing on the health and general welfare «£ blacks. As a result, close to 75  black children die every day from malnutrition and related diseases. In this respect, it must  also be said that the black infant mortality rate is 13 times that of the whites.
40.5 Today, the blacks who constitute more than 75 per cent of the total population are being  forcibly herc-d into those desolate, barren wastelands--the so-called bantustans--which consti-  tute barely 13 ser cent of the land surface of South Africa. Their 'independence' is imposed  upon them, and in the end it is nothing more than independence to die from overcrowding,  poverty, and lack of medical care in conditions reminiscent of Nazi death camps.
40.6 In an attempt to thwart the national liberation struggle, the apartheid regime has trans-  formed our country into a de facto concentration camp. Those pati ots who, like Nelson Mandela  and Walter Sisulu, are not already locked up for life or for very long terms in apartheid pri-  sons live in constant fear of imprisonment. Every black person who insists on being human also  lives in constant fear for his or her life. For in South Africa, if you are black, it is a crime to  be human; it is a crime that incurs the entire range of brutal punishment up to and including  death, in the streets, in detention and at the gallows.
40.7 The apartheid regime has coupled this incredibly inhuman internal repression with a  strategy to destabilize the Frontline States through a concerted programme of political sub-  version, economic blackmail and sabotage and outright military aggression. The apartheid regime  continues to occupy a considerable portion of the souihern part of the People's Republic of  Angola. It has repeatedly launched military raids into Zimbabwe, Lesotho and the People's Repub-  lic of Mozambique. The latest information indicates that the apartheid regime is deploying  massive military build-ups along the borders of Mozambique and Zimbabwe. The aborted coup it  launched against the Government of President Albert Rene of the Seychelles is still fresh in our  memory, and everywhere the apartheid regime is dispatching its death squads to assassinate  leaders and militants of our national liberation movement. It also continues its forcible and  illegal occupation of Namibia, against the will of the struggling people of Namibia led by SWAPO  and in defiance of international opinion.
40.8 There may have been a time when apartheid was a phenomenon restricted to the frontiers  of South Africa. Its history has however shown that it is much more than that. Thanks to the  enthusiastic assistance it has received from several Western Powers, apartheid, following its  logic, has become a threat to peace and stability and an obstacle to the pursuit of development  and progress not only in southern Africa but in all of Africa. The racist regime's acquisition of  a nuclear striking military capability, again with the assistance of the same Western Powers, has  multiplied the threat of apartheid into a direct menace to world peace.’
40.9 Meanwhile, as apartheid persists, property is destroyed and human lives continue to be  lost by the thousands, and our country remains the graveyard of human, political and civil  rights, and the national sovereignty and territorial integrity of the neighbouring states remains  continually imperilled.
40.10 We cannot therefore understand the reluctance on the part of certain Western Powers to  join the rest of humanity in its effort to isolate apartheid, and we are doubly surprised by talk  of 'constructive engagement' with apartheid. The fact is that for over 30 years apartheid has  been nothing but a vicious force of destruction, and it is inconceivable that a constructive  engagement can be entered into with so destructive a force.
40.11 We have carefully studied the Draft Medium-Term Plan for 1984-1989. The high quality of  this document, its scope and thoroughness attest to the immense amount of time and effort  devoted to its preparation, For this we wish to thank and congratulate the Director-General and  all those who contributed directly or indirectly to its preparation.
40.12 In our turn, we wish to express our appreciation of the importance which has been  attached to the struggle against apartheid within the framework of the Draft Medium-Term Plan.  For the people of South Africa this represents one more proof that they are not alone in their  struggle and that the majority of mankind is increasingly prepared to assume its responsibilities  in the eradication of this crime against humanity.
40.13 Recently a young white South African woman was charged with treason and sentenced to  ten years' imprisonment. Her crime was that she was a member of the African National  Congress,
40,14 An old man, over 70 years old, Mr Oscar Mphetha, was arrested more than 18 months  ago. Since then he has not been tried. Meanwhile, his health has been deteriorating rapidly and  there is every indication that, because the apartheid regime refuses to give him access to  medical treatment, he might not only die in prison, but also die without being tried. What is his  crime? He is a genuine trade unionist,
40.15 At this very moment, as I am speaking, three young men, Jerry Mosololi, Simon  Mogoerane and Marcus Motaung, are in death row awaiting execution. What is their crime? They  are freedom fighters who dared to oppose apartheid.
40.16 These are but a few current instances of the brutal inhumanity of apartheid--an ugly  reality with which we cannot have a truce without surrendering our own humanity. We cannot  afford to lose a single minute in the struggle against apartheid.
40.17 Mr President, most of the preceding interventions have shown a great willingness to  fight against apartheid. This willingness is also amply reflected in the Draft Medium-Term Plan  and in the Director-General's introductory remarks to the same document. 1 believe that it is  time we took measures to ensure that this goodwill, this river of words, does not flow into the  desert of inaction. We must with minimum delay proceed to concrete action against apartheid. In  this connection, we offer a few suggestions.
40.18 We request Member States and Associate Members of Unesco to collectively or unilaterally  mount comprehensive sanctions against apartheid.
40.19 We ask them to increase their all-round support to the Frontline States which are con-  stantly menaced by apartheid.
40.20 We request them to use their respective mass media to expose apartheid and to oppose  apartheid's increasingly sophisticated but always false propaganda.
40.21 We request you all to intensify efforts to save the lives of the three freedom fighters  already referred to and to demand that freedom fighters arrested in the struggle be accorded  prisone’ -of-war status, in accordance with the Geneva Protocols on the Conduct of War and the  Treatment of Prisoners of War.
40.22 We request you to intensify your efforts to secure the release of Oscar Mphetha.
40.23 We request you to step up the campaign for the release of Nelson Mandela, Herman Toivo  Ya Toivo and all other political prisoners under apartheid.
40.24 We request Unesco, its Member States and Associate Members to step up their pro-  grammes of assistance in the field of manpower training, research, and the provision of general  education to the National Liberation Movement. The ANC through its own schools, such as the  Solomon Mahlangu Freedom College at Morogoro in Tanzania, is trying to give young South  Africans real education in place of the so-called Bantu education. But here again, we have very  limited resources and there is no upper limit to the amount of assistance yoi: can give us.
40.25 We wish, at the same time, to thank Unesco for all the assistance it continues to give  us.
40.26 Mr President, ! cannot speak about apartheid without referring to the tragedy that con-  tinues to unfold in the Middle East. We denounce the Israeli invasion of Lebanon, its carnage in  Beirut and the massacres it authorized at Sabra and Chatila. We reaffirm our solidarity with the  struggle of the people of Palestine led by the PLO. We uphold their right to self-determination  and to the establishment of an independent Palestinian state in their homeland.
40.27 Finally, we reaffirm our solidarity with the people of Namibia led by SWAPO, and with all  other people struggling to overcome the oppression and exploitation of man by man, for  freedom, peace and progress.
40.28 Thank you for your attention.
41. The PRESIDENT:
1 thank the representative of the African National Congress. 1 give the floor to Mr Alex  Akpofure, Director of the Education Division of the Commonwealth Secretariat.
42.1 Mr AKPOFURE (Commonwealth Secretariat):  Mr President, Mr Director-General, Your Excellencies, ladies and gentlemen, on behalf of  the Commonwealth of Nations and its Secretary-General, H.E. Mr Shridath Ramphal, 1 bring you  fraternal greetings and good wishes for the success of the fourth extraordinary session of the  General Conference--now in its second week. Let me also take this opportunity of adding our  warm sentiments, Mr President, to those of other delegations which have contragulated you on  your election to the Presidency, and on the wisdom and skill with which, together with your  Vice-Presidents, you have steered the course of our business so far.
42.2 1 take special pleasure in congratulating Unesco--under its dynamic Director-General,  Mr Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow--on its record of global concerns and specially on the construction of  a Draft Medium-Term Plan which encompasses such a comprehensive spectrum of issues, as com-  plex and intractable as those handled by any other organization of the United Nations system.
42.3 Mr President. in representing the Commonwealth of Nations, 1 am privileged to speak for  an international organization whose global concerns are parallel to and concentric with Unesco's;  whose 47 independent member countries are all Member States of Unesco; whose economic spec-  trum, while covering countries of both North and South, is overwheimingly South; and whose  geography spreads across the entire globe from East to West. The Commonwealth of Nations is  the reflection of a worldwide initiative in international co-operation between rich and poor  nations, between the cultural expressions of Africa and the Caribbean, of Asia and the Pacific,  of Europe and North America. United by bonds of history and a common working language, the  Commonwealth is a microcosm of Unesco; its members though only a third of Unesco's member-  ship include all the latter's categories of countries; and its mandate reflects all Unesco's  concerns, especially its concern for world peace and understanding and the survival of man--in  one world, in a world threatened by the seismic vibrations of insecurity, suspicion and dis-  trust. It was largely for this reason that two years ago, following the twenty-first cession of  the General Conference in Belgrade, the Secretary-General of the Commonwealth and the Director-  General of Unesco, in accordance with the statutory provisions of our two organizations, signed  an agreement on co-operation which placed us in category A status of international non-  governmental organizations in consultative relationship with Unesco and thus formalized a record  of informal co-operation which had stretched back well over a decade.
42.4 Mr President, it is in the spirit of that agreement that we make the following obser-  vations, welcoming the evidence in the Draft Medium-Term Plan of the possibility of greater co-  operation not only with organizations of the United Nations system but also with regional and  other international organizations, in pursuit of a 'complementarity' of strategies.
42.5 Mr President, the Commonwealth welcomes the broad survey of world problems contained  in the first part of document 4 XC/4 as an appropriate backdrop to the programme proposals  set out for the quinquennium. Our satisfaction derives from our common preoccupations, and  from the recognition that today's major national questions are those of one world and must in-  creasingly be tackled in that global context. Our common concern with world economic issues  and world trade, with--despite scientific advances--the growing problems of food, hunger and  poverty, with the widening gap in illiteracy between North and South, with the problems of  intercultural communication and the impact of social values on the societies of our member coun-  tries reflects in the final analysis a common preoccupation with the survival of man in the  Universe, an issue as real as our own lives today. And when the rhetoric of assemblies is  done, we must return to the stark reality of that survival.
42.6 That is why we welcome the general outline of Unesco's main tasks as set out in para-  graph 187 of document 4 XC/4, noting that through the encouragement of 'more active inter-  national co-operation in analysing world problems, their inter-relationships an. likely devel-  opment...', Unesco hopes to propagate 'a sense of global solidarity among peoples and nations'.  All of us must naturally welcome the recognition of such an urgent need--for our basic problem  today is surely that we are unable to believe that our world is shrinking, that our boundaries  are only a transient convenience and that our fortunes are truly interlocked. On the contrary,
454   we continue to believe that, safe in our own developed countries, we are insured against the  crises which threaten others and can afford to be indifferent or--at best--mildly interested. In  the throes of the present world recession, surely this is the first of our traditional certitudes  to be shattered. This is why we welcome the emphasis laid in the Draft Medium-Term Plan on  the pursuit of global solidarity and international co-operation. In our view, such co-operation  should include not only bilateral but also multilateral and inter-agency co-operation. The  Commonwealth's record of initiatives in global issues over the last few years encourages us to  offer to Unesco the modest contribution of our regular expert group studies and perspectives  on international issues: a contribution which we believe to be valuable to the global concepts  which underline Unesco's own surveys and studies of world problems.
42.7 Mr President, against this background, we welcome the five tasks identified in docu-  ment 4 XC/4 and we look forward during the quinquennium to their implementation through  appropriate strategies and concrete plans. We welcome, for example, the intention expressed in  paragraph 1015 of document 4 XC/4 to continue collaboration through the exchange of ideas and  documentation on studies and research already carried out. This avowed intention should be  positively executed, not only as a means of avoiding a wasteful duplication of efforts in 're-  inventing the wheel', but also in order to place at Unesco's disposal material obtained in more  localized contexts and often in more intensive depth. Yet, Mr President, co-operation with  Unesco would be superficial if it were confined to the exchange of material and information, or  to mutual attendance at one another's conferences. We have moved forward and shared consul-  tative meetings with Unesco since Belgrade, where we advocated closer interaction. We would  consider, as the next development and whencver possible, the implementation of a strategy of  joint planning and execution through regional programmes of groups of Member States during  the coming quinquennium; and we would hope to see further progress along this road through a  pooling of the resources of our two organizations in areas of acknowledged competence, or  where methodologies of proven effectiveness are concerned.
42.8 Mr President, distinguished delegates, with regard to strategies of action for devel-  opment, we welcome the recognition, reiterated in paragraph 8010 of document 4 XC/4, of the  integral relationship between education and development, in its human, social, economic and  cultural functions. The proposed strategies for action promise a close link between thought and  action as a means of both clarifying problems of development and of providing member countries  with studies and consultative services. Our primary concern will be to ensure that sufficient  emphasis is laid on implementation, so that studies and research do not claim a greater share of  resources than implementation, given that information and research are of course essential to  sound developmental programmes.
42.9 Mr President, we are particularly gratified to note the intention expressed in paragraph
8020 to associate Unesco more directly with the development activities of Member States through  assistance in the implementation of operational activities and ‘active participation in efforts to  mobilize financial and human resources at the national and international levels...'. While the  concept of the multiplier strategy for the creation of endogenous capability is by no means new,  it is to be hoped that training at national levels, through such resources as are envisaged, will  be applied more intensively during the next quinquennium as an addition to the traditional ele-  ments of experts, training fellowships and equipment.
42,10 1n this connection, the guideline formulated by the Executive Board, according to which  the idea of training and training activities should be at the very heart of the Organization's  various programmes, underscores this concern, and we note with satisfaction the intention in  paragraph 8037, on the one hand, 'to make greater provision for training' through fellowships  and, on the other, 'to introduce changes in the approaches and arrangements hitherto followed  in regard to fellowship administration'. We shall await the details of such changes with interest.  Meanwhile, we note that an increase is envisaged from a total of 1,200 fellowships administered  in 1980 to a total of 15,000 by 1989. If the targets and projections described under Pro-  gramme VI1I.3 are implemented and if the special allocation of funds from the regular budget for  the implementation of projects is achieved, Unesco will have taken a major step towards the  closer involvement in the development activities of Member States which is advocated in the  Draft Medium-Term Plan. It is essential in our view that the various principles involved be fully  co-ordinated when the proposals and modifications which are currently being considered in the  various Commissions of this General Conference come to be implemented.
42.11 Mr President, the Commonwealth of Nations has been in the vanguard of the struggle  against prejudice, racism and apartheid ever since its inception seventeen years ago. We there-  fore fully support the fundamental concerns expressed in Major Programme XII and particularly  welcome the initiatives described in para. 12011 of document 4 XC/4 and the publication of  Unesco's study entitled 'Apartheid--its effects on education, science, culture and information'.  We wish to suggest in this context a special dissemination strategy for such key Unesco publi-  cations to ensure their wider impact in support of Unesco's programmes objectives.
42.12 The strength of the Commonwealth's stand against racism in all its ramifications, but  especiaiy against racism in sports, is well known uid the steady support of the Commonwealth  for its Gleneagles Agreement on sporting contact with South Africa must be reassuring for  friends of anti-apartheid. Yet, Mr President, we have seen that the agents of apartheid have
11   returned in recent months to wage the battle for social prejudice with greater ferocity by means  which are attractive to those who are susceptible to the attractions of money and wealth. In  general, we endorse the thrust and the emphasis of the programmes in this area including the  strategies for research, standard-setting, education and information.
42.13 We welcome too at para. 13042, the obligation recognized by Unesco to pursue its mission  in the area of human rights 'with increasing vigour'. However, in this particular field, the need  for collaboration with intergovernmental organizations is implicit in the strategies set out at  paras. 13047, 13048 and 13049, which recognize the contribution of the international community.  That recognition must be translated into action at all levels of our Organization's executive  bodies and in every possible programme, and we would urge on the Director-General that this  is an issue which requires positive examination,
42.14 Mr President, we support the proposed strategies, including the special emphasis on the  problems of access to education, science, culture and information. In particular, we welcome the  intention to devote a special programme to apartheid. We would urge however that, within such  a programme, emphasis be laid first on the effective dissemination of the results of study and  research, and next, on their incorporation in training material for teacher-education on lines  such as those suggested in para. 12051. Finally in this context, we would support the proposals  for action under this programme and suggest that international co-operation in support of it be  extended to include not only those organizations listed at para. 12052 but also intergovernmental  organizations which have a record of action against racism or potential contributors to anti-  apartheid movements as indicated at para. 12068.
42.15 Mr President, Your Excellencies, distinguished ladies and gentlemen, Major Pro-  gramme XIII represents for us an initiative of special interest. 1 wish to add the general plea  that the effective dissemination of information and the results of research is vital to the  strategies, programmes and subprogrammes proposed in document 4 XC/4, especially if the evils  of violated human rights are to be removed. On the strategy for education for peace and res-  pect for human rights, we note the plan to take the campaign not only into schools but also  more vigorously to the adult community. We would suggest that action in pursuit of para. 13073  at secondary and even post-secondary levels will benefit from collaboration with the rapidly  growing International Schools and the International Baccalaureat Office in Europe and North  America, particularly in the establishment of suitable curriculum materials not only for schools  but, in the case of non-formal education, also for the adult population. Mr President, we en-  dorse the thrust and emphasis of the subprogrammes in this area including all the strategies for  research and study, for standard-setting, for education and for information. We welcome too the  obligation recognized by Unesco to pursue its mission in this area of human rights with in-  creasing vigour.
42.16 Mr President, Mr Director-General, ladies and gentlemen, it is now a cliché to speak of  world crises or of a more equitable world economic order. The idea persists that the indus-  trialized North does not need the raw-material producing South; that the concept of  interdependence is merely a gimmick invented by the have-nots of the South to get their hands  on the wealth of the North. Yet the message of the current world recession is clear: that  unless a will to resolve global economic problems can be found among all nations neither peace  nor economic recovery of any lasting nature will be found. What we seek in the Commonwealth  is not for the North to rescue the South but for the North in a genuine recognition of  interdependence to join with the South to rescue the world for man.
42.17 Unesco's part in this task is acknowledged, and we congratulate Mr Amadou-Mahtar  M'Bow on the construction of the present Medium-Term Plan for 1984-1989 as part of the fulfil-  ment of that obligation. 1 thank you for your attention.
43. The PRESIDENT:  I thank the representative of the Commonwealth Secretariat. 1 give the floor to Mr Ayrton  Fausto, Co-ordinator for International Co-operation of the Latin American Faculty of Social  Sciences.
(44.1) Mr FAUSTO (Latin American Social Science Faculty) (Translation from the Spanish):  Mr President, FLACSO wishes to congratulate you on your election and your contribution to the work  of this Conference.
(44.2) Mr Director-General, Mr Chairman of the Executive Board, ladies and gentlemen, during this the  twenty-fifth anniversary of its establishment the Latin American Social Science Faculty (FLACSO) considers  it a great honour to address the delegates to this Conference and the Director-General in order to con-  gratuiate Unesco on the efforts that have gone into the preparation of the Medium-Term Plan for 1984-1989  and to express its support for the content of that Plan. In doing so, it is reflecting the views expressed  by its Member States and speaking on behalf of its community of over one hundred teachers and researchers  working in our six permanent units in Latin America--located in Mexico City, San José (Costa Rica), Quito  (Ecuador), Santiago (Chile), Buenos Aires (Argentina) and Rio de Janeiro (Brazil)--or engaged in tem-  porary activities in almost all the countries of the region.
(44.3) Mr President, twenty-five years ago, as you are aware, the countries of Latin America established  FLACSO in response to a proposal made by Unesco. During the first ten years, from 1957 to 1967, this inter-  national and independent body representing the countries of Latin America and the Caribbean--a pioneering  initiative in horizontal co-operation in the social sciences and their applications designed to employ the  findings of those sciences in the interests of regional development and integration--was dependent on  Unesco. In the last fifteen years, during which responsibility for FLACSO has been taken over entirely by  its Member States, which participate in its daily activities in growing numbers and thereby play a part in  an original and successful attempt to establish a dialogue between government social scientists, Unesco has  continued to offer FLACSO its support. We have worked together on many initiatives and projects and we  have been linked for several years by an inter-organization agreement.
(44.4) It is not surprising therefore that our views coincide with those of Unesco and we are confident  that, against this background, Unesco's co-operation and support will continue and increase under the  programme which is the subject of this Conference's deliberations. The common approach of the two  institu ions is clearly reflected in the regional work plan for the next five years, recommended by the  Member States of FLACSO, which is to be discussed at forthcoming meetings of the Governing Board and  the Higher Council and which has already been enriched, Mr Director-General, by your contribution in the  form of the Medium-Term Plan.
(44.5) The basic concern underlying our efforts is the observation that the worldwide economic, political,  social and cultural crisis has created problems that are common to all regions and that a rapid strengthen-  ing of interregional relations and co-operation is ne.essary in order to overcome them.
(44.6) Against this background, FLACSO's task of promoting co-operation and integration among the coun-  tries of Latin America and the Caribbean has undergone a change and now involves helping to explain the  views of the Latin American and Caribbean region on world problems, together with its proposals and  measures for overcoming the crisis.
(44.7) We are fully in agreement with Major Programme 1 of the Medium-Term Plan and we support it  enthusiastically. It is obvious to us that any attempt to obtain an overall view of world problems and how  they are to be overcome must be based on regional efforts, which are essential to fruitful denate and  genuine interregional co-operation. You may rely, Mr Director-General, on FLACSO's wholehearted support  in this process.
(44.8) The approach that we propose with a view to stepping up regional co-operation in Latin America  and the Caribbean consists in seeking alternative policies designed to surmount the crisis, while at the same  time strengthening democracy and stimulating development in our region. This approach may be broken  down into four major themes of regional research: the state and public policy; the extension of democracy  and popular participation; international intraregional and interregional relations; and studies of the history  of Latin America and the Caribbean.
(44.9) These major themes will be explored through regional resea"ch projects drawing on the experience  in basic interdisciplinary social science research which we have accumulated over a period of twenty-five  years and on the resulting theoretical contributions tn the understanding of the region, and will be the  subject of research aimed at proposing remedial policies--veflecting FLACSO's philosophy that its research  topics are simultaneously targets for social changes that benefit the peoples of our region.
(44.10) Our postgraduate courses, of which there are six at ‘he moment and which have already catered  for some B00 professionals from all parts of the region, each coursc being attended by specialists from 10 to
15 countries, will continue to provide training facilities for over !50 postgraduates every 2 years. The  courses will be organized around regional research projects, thus m~.king it possible to combine research  and tuition, since, as we see it, tuition consists in teaching research--a further point of convergence with  Unesco's approach.
(44,11) The series of regional research projects which I shall go on to mention will provide the basis not  only for tuition but also for programmes of scientific co-operation with state-run bodies and other private  entities, which are the means whereby a specific contribution is made to development activities, policies and  projects throughout the region.
(44.12) Under the heading 'The state and public policy’, the principal regional projects concern: basic  health care; education; planning and administration cf development policies and projects; energy policies;  the social, economic and cultural impact of advanced technologies, especially in the field of microelectronics;  the environment, in particular regulation of the extension of farming land in tb~ region; rural development,  with the emphasis on alternative technologies: and science and technology policies for development.
(44.13) The projects under the heading 'Development of democracy and popular participation' deal with the  social, political, economic and cultural conditions conducive to democratization in the region; an analysis of  changes in social structures in the region over the past twenty years; and the impact of social movements,  experiments in popular participation and future prospects for popular participation in the formulation and  implementation of the public policies already referred to.
(44.14) The regional projects relating to the these 'International relations' concern Central American inte-  gration, including a postgraduate programme on the subject designed to further that process, and Latin  America's relations with the other regions of the world.
(44.15) In connection with the theme 'History of Latin America and the Caribbean', which is in our view no  leis vital than all the others, as part of the effort to strengthen interregional relations implicit in Major  Programme 1 and underlined in Major Programme VI, we intend to engage in research on aspects of sub-  regional history and, in particular, we plan to initiate a programme, with the support of the Spanish  Government, on Andean history.
(44.16) Mr President, this summary of FLACSO's regional role provides ample evidence of the parallels be-  tween FLACSO's activities and those envisaged not only under Major Programme 1 but under practically all  the other programmes as well, confirming what Mrs Nkanza stated clearly on behalf of the Director-General  in the relevant Commission, namely that the social sciences have a contribution to make to all the major  themes included by Unesco among its priorities.
(44.17) Mr President, we wish to assure Unesco once again of our support and our readiness to co-operate  ever more closely with the Organization in the future. We should also like to congratulate the Director-  General and express our conviction that this fourth extraordinary session will prove a success and a mile-  stone in the history of Unesco. Thank you.  The PRESIDENT:
1 thank the representative of the Latin American Faculty of Social Sciences. 1 give the  floor to Mrs Francoise Lafitte, President of the Standing Committee of International  Non-Governmental Organizations.
46.1 Mme LAFITTE (Comité permanent des organisations internationales non gouvernementales) .-  Monsieur le Président, Mesdames, Messieurs, je vous remercie, Monsieur le Président, de me  donner la parole au nom de la Consultation collective des organisations internationales non gou-  vernementales et de son Comité permanent. C'est un honneur que nous ressentons profondément.
46.2 Le Plan à moyen terme, dès le début des consultations à son sujet, a suscité parmi les ONG  le plus vif intérêt. Elles ont répondu nombreuses, comme vous le savez, aux questionnaires qui  leur avaient été adressés et elles ont été très sensibles au fait que chacune de leurs réponses ait  été si fidèlement reflétée dans le document 113 EX/4 (Rapport du Directeur général sur la prépa-  ration du Plan à moyen terme pour 1984-1989).
46.3 A titre collectif, les ONG ont consacré au Projet de plan à woyen terme une large part de  leur dix-huitième Conférence. Elles ont constaté avec beaucoup de satisfaction que ia résolution  issue de leur Consultation collective figurait in extenso dans ce même document 113 EX/4.
46.4 Certes, les plans et programmes de l'Unesco ont toujours été l'objet - comme le veulent  l'intérêt qu'ils présentent et les textes qui nous régissent - de l'attention la plus soutenue des  ONG, mais le deuxième Plan à moyen terme rapproche encore davantage celles-ci de l'Unesco par  l'accent mis sur l'indispensable contribution des individus et des associations à la solution des  problèmes qui se posent à l'humanité. Dans son introduction au débat, le Directeur général l'a  souligné à nouveau. De même, la conception de la culture qui est celle de l'Unesco, et qui ressort  de la Conférence de Mexico sur les politiques culturelles, permet d'intégrer toutes les ONG à une  dimension essentielle du développement.
46.5 Depuis la publication du Projet de plan à moyen terme, des ONG ont adressé séparément  leurs commentaires au Secrétariat de l'Unesco, et nous avons tenu les 18, 19 et 20 octobre der-  r°-rs la Consultation à laquelle le Directeur général a bien voulu faire allusion à l'ouverture de ce  devat. Permettez-moi, Monsieur le Président, de redire ici à M. M'Bow la reconnaissance des ONG  pour sa participation à ces journées.
46.6 C'est donc le fruit d'une longue réflexion et de trois jours de débat que j'ai été chargée de  résumer devant vous.
46.7 Les représentants des ONG ont exprimé avec une grande sincérité leur opinion sur le Projet  de plan à moyen terme. Ils trouvent - je les cite - "ce document remarquable et d'une grande qua-  lité. Ils apprécient la hauteur de vues des grandes orientations du Plan et la pertinence de la  problématique qui lui servent de cadre. Ce Projet témoigne d'une remarquable évolution de la  pensée de l'Unesco et d'un grand courage en un temps aussi chargé d'incertitudes que de pro-  messes". Ils ont noté avec satisfaction "l'effort accentué en matière de connaissance de l'homme ;  une approche plus équilibrée du rôle des sciences exactes et des sciences humaines ; une invi-  tation à la réflexion philosophique sur la destinée de l'humanité ; un apport à l'instauration d'un  nouvel ordre économique et social mondial ; une stratégie de l'éducation dirigée vers la paix, la  compréhension internationale, la liberté des peuples et les droits de l'homme ; les références  faites aux valeurs pour lesquelles les ONG s'efforceront de contribuer à l'étude de définitions".  Ils ont manifesté "... l'intérêt que leurs organisations portent à la réflexion prospective sur les  problèmes mondiaux telle qu'elle est prévue dans le grand programme I. Les ONG sont déterminées  à apporter leur contribution à cette réflexion et aux études qui seront entreprises dans ce  cadre".
46.8 Les ONG ont aussi exposé les points sur lesquels elles souhaitent plus de précisions ou un  accent plus marqué - par exemple en ce qui concerne le rôle de l'art, la créativité et l'aptitude à  innover.
46.9 Je ne fais que signaler ces points qui sont explicités dans les conclusions de la Consultation  collective : la pauvreté - sa montée dans les pays industrialisés, l'identité des plus pauvres, les  minorités ethniques ; la communication - ses aspects éthiques et juridiques, les obstacles linguis-  tiques, la nécessité d'une éducation aux médias, l'association du public à l'élaboration des pro-  grammes ; la jeunesse - un programme spécifique en liaison avec l'Année internationale de la jeu-  nesse ; l'enfant - le considérer en tant que tel, lui et ses droits, et pas uniquement dans sa  dimension scolaire ; la famille - lui accorder une attention plus grande en tant que lieu de struc-  turation de la personnalité ; la femme - le projet a été très apprécié et l'on a souligné le rôle des  femmes dans la transformation des mentalités et dans l'éclosion de nouvelles valeurs, et insisté sur  la situation des femmes rurales.
46.10 Les chapitres portant sur l'éducation, sur la paix et sur les droits de l'homme ont été bien  accueillis dans leur ensemble. En ce qui concerne les droits, l'intégration effective dans le Plan à  moyen terme du plan de sept ans sur l'enseignement des droits de l'homme a été jugé souhaitable.  "Les représentants des ONG considèrent qu'il ne saurait y avoir opposition entre 'droits des  peuples' et ‘droits individuels'. Ils souhaitent qu'une plus grande attention soit donnée, par  l'Unesco, aux questions juridiques comme vecteurs de progrès social, économique et surtout de  liberté individuelle".
46.11 Enfin - je cite toujours des conclusions de la Consultation collective - "la Consultation a  exprimé le souhait que le rôle des ONG dans la mise en oeuvre du Plan à moyen terme soit précisé  de manière explicite dans le document C/4. Ainsi, par exemple, un sous-chapitre consacré à la  coopération avec les organisations internationales non gouvernementales pourrait-il être inséré  dans le chapitre XV (Soutien du programme)".
46.12 C'est dire avec quelle satisfaction nous avons trouvé dans le document 4 XC/4 Annexe II,  page 14, le texte concernant la coopération avec les ONG - texte qui nous paraît excellent - et  dans le document 4 XC/4 Annexe III, page 66, la résolution proposée sur la coopération avec les  ONG. C'est dire aussi combien, après le bon accueil fait à cette résolution par la Commission II,  nous souhaitons son adoption définitive dont nous vous serons profondément reconnaissants.
46.13 Nous avons dit que "la contribution essentielle des ONG à la diffusion de l'information sur  le programme de l'Unesco est ‘engagement pratique de leurs membres dans des actions concrètes",  et aussi qu'il est "nécessaire de repenser radicalement les modaltiés selon lesquelles l'action des  ONG en ce qui concerne l'information sur l'Unesco pourrait le mieux avoir un impact sur le grand
460   public, plus particulièrement par les médias. Pour avoir cet impact, les ONG devraient s'efforcer 1 1  de présenter les travaux de l'Unesco qui portent sur les grands problémes contemporains, et ceci  de manière vivante, motivante et facile à comprendre." Nous avons encouragé les ONG à "envisa-  ger la possibilité de lancer des campagnes d'information du public sur les grands problèmes" et  proposé "que plusieurs ONG lancent chacune une campagne sur l'un des 13 programmes tracés dans  le Plan à moyen terme en fonction de leur champ d'intérêt : l'impact cumulatif pourrait être  significatif".
46.14 Soyez donc assurés, Monsieur le Président, Mesdames, Messieurs, que les organisations  internationales non gouvernementales, en principe et en pratique, sont toujours davantage enga-  gées au service des idéaux de l'Unesco.
47. The PRESIDENT:
1 thank the representative of the Standing Committee of Non-Governmental Organizations.  STATEMENT BY THE DELEGATE OF IRAN/DECLARATION DU DELEGUE DE L'IRAN/DECLARACION  DEL DELEGADO DI IRAN/ 3ASIWIEHME MPENCTABHTENS UPAHA/ i 1 cyan) esas! Bu fe 2580 7 A
48. The PRESIDENT:  The distinguished delegate of the Islamic Republic of Iran has asked to speak in exercise  of the right of reply. He has the floor.
49.1 Mr BIAZAR (the Islamic Republic of Iran):  Mr President, distinguished delegates, this morning the distinguished representative of  Egypt referred in his intervention to the war of aggression against the Islamic Republic of  lran. Unfortunately, and both unexpectedly and expectedly, he used a tone in which my coun-  try was introduced as the party responsible for the continuation of the war, while the invader  country was introduced as the country which has been defending itself.
49,2 1 said the statement was unexpected, because it is quite natural not to expect the repre-  sentative of a country which is reputable and well-known throughout the whole world for its  great civilization and decent Islamic culture to go this far in adopting a hypocritical approach to  a matter which is more than clear. Does not the Egyptian representative know who started the  war of aggression, and which country has suffered the most under a brutal and ruthless  invasion?
49.3 On the other hand, the statement he made was quite expected, taking into account the  nature and political character of the regime which mastered the Camp David negotiations.
49.4 Sincerely speaking, it was not necessary for the distinguished representative of Egypt to  try so hard to prove his government's aspiration to peace and tranquility. We are already  acquainted with the 'peace-making' efforts of his regime, since we have found on our own in-  vaded land tremendous quantities of Egyptian grenades and ammunition, which have been and  still are being gene.ously given to the troops occupying our land. Of course, such peace-  seeking efforts by the Government of Egypt are deeply appreciated and perhaps deserve  another Nobel Peace Prize which they might again like to share with Mr Begin!
49.5 Those distinguished delegates who had the opportunity to read the report of the interview  between the reporter of Le Monde and President Mubarak, published on 24 November, know  pretty well that the above-mentioned fact is not our claim but that the Egyptian President him-  self asserted in that interview that his regime has and still is helping the regime invading my  country.
49.6 1 hereby wish to assure the distinguished representative of Egypt of my delegation's  understanding of his profound regret that his President, in such interviews, has not left him  any grounds for successfully pretending in this forum or elsewhere that his government seeks  nothing but peace.
49.7 1 would like also to assure him that the war will be finished sooner or later but definitely  not as a result of a Camp David like agreement.
49.8 Because, unlike the Egyptian regime, we are not in favour of letting another Israeli-type  regime continue another Israeli-type occupation of another Islamic land.
49.9 If the distinguished representative of Egypt, through such statements as he made this  morning, seeks to participate in his government's efforts to make another Israel-type friend, he  is definitely free to do so. But, as a person who cares about his reputation, 1 advise him that  in his next intervention he should try to be the representative of his country's culture rather  than the representative of his regime's politics. Thank you very much.
50. The PRESIDENT:
1 thank the dis'inguished delegate of the Islamic Republic of Iran. The distinguished  delegate of Egypt has also asked to speak in exercise of the right of reply. He has the floor.  (ae) Lab ane / acd) ol  âodS (yde adidas GB Gla ge ol owl whe Jue! AG I alan] Lo le Lies à pet Gan SE  dodSUl 3 359 Lo gl 1 adel Gulisdl gel OV ASS ON ht wes mal GF so, «jae assy ent, ant  a, ol gel 9 Glad ee wad] AUS 0 Lycos bar SY) SLAG! (pa 5) gel aire Led) 5 Lio)  Ge wins le Jad] Gotan Lol «5S godl debi plies val 9 Bu gl Goal dlhie (55 pad) logos Joos  coal 12 eight Ge ST (581 BLY Ge dS eans ply ddsbie ld Geld! GLS LiL PAS  pdt y gl oT Ligne Leth pLST cpl 575 opdudl 5 + PUIS oll ylhylssmodi lols  phe) pyle) sol pga dds BF pled) poe) Les y 0 Judd GS SN AN pas GI prepaid] Lead  sp Mal He Glas CAES GE pal pads AE al uly Gl a)! 90 ger ASL Lal 5 Mad Sols Tam  bi abl 5p Gal wl inset Gy of owl 9 Gl ad! oe plead El (patil a3 ae 0S of sols wad,  Gil go Ogi 3 bell dl GILL gl dE Jad C5 Gy ole Jord le gl pid Gb Hed) petal co  cpShlinl gua ole 1509 basal pedi wll 59
(51) Mr ABDEL ZAHER (Egypt) (Translation from the Arabic):  Thank you, Mr President. In reply to the comments of the distinguished delegate of Iran on the state-  ment by the Head of the Delegation of Egypt, 1 should like to direct the attention of the Conferenc to the  following facts: the address in question included a remark, made in the course of a review of some regional  problems, including the problem of the war between Iraq and Iran, to the effect that that war constituted a  threat to the peace of the Near East, and was an issue which should claim the attention of Unesco. That  remark designed only to stimulate efforts to bring about peace, in accordance with the Constitution of this  Organization. The statement said nothing about which of the belligerents had started the war; furthermore,  the two countries concerned are brothers in Islam. Islam is the religion of peace, and it has laid down a  clear-cut system of rules of conduct for war and peace: belligerents are called upon not to be excessive in  bloodshed, and to make peace where one of the parties is so inclined. This is in fact the case in the war  between Iraq and Iran: Iraq has made overtures with a view to seeking a negotiated peace. 1 therefore feel  that the Egyptian delegation's review of the armed conflict between Iraq and Iran was consistent with truth  and was made with a view to prompting the international community and the belligerents themselves to work  for an end to the war and a resolution of the conflict by peaceful means, within the framework of the  United Nations Charter and resolutions. Thank you for your kind attention.
51. The PRESIDENT:  Ladies and gentlemen, that brings us to the end of our day's work. 1 would like to thank  you very much for your contributions, your efforts and your spirit of mutual understanding. 1  wish you a good rest, and then tomorrow morning we shall start as usual at 9 o'clock. Thank  you very much. The meeting stands adjourned.  The meeting rose at 10 p.m.  La séance est levée à 22 heures  Se levanta la sesiôn a las 22,00
3acemaune sakpumpaerca B 22.00  Flac BeLIEII 155 Gull wad,  BUT 22 MEER